Table of Contents
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☒ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE
ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2022
OR
☐TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from                 to                 
Commission File No. 1-9328
ECOLAB INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware 41-0231510
(State or other jurisdiction of
incorporation or organization)(I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.)
1 Ecolab Place, St. Paul, Minnesota  55102
(Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code)
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code:  1-800-232-6522
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Trading symbol(s) Name of each exchange on which registered
Common Stock, $1.00 par value
2.625% Euro Notes due 2025
1.000% Euro Notes due 2024ECL
ECL 25
ECL 24New York Stock Exchange
New York Stock Exchange
New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:  None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. ⌧ Yes ◻ No
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Act. ◻ Yes ⌧  No
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such
reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. ⌧ Yes ◻ No
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted
pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that
the registrant was required to submit such files. ⌧ Yes ◻ No
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller
reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller
reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer ☒ Accelerated filer ☐
Non-accelerated filer   ☐ Smaller reporting company ☐
Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the
effectiveness of its internal control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by
the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. ☒
If securities are registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act, indicate by check mark whether the financial statements of the
registrant included in the filing reflect the correction of an error to previously issued financial statements. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether any of those error corrections are restatements that required a recovery analysis of incentive-based
compensation received by any of the registrant’s executive o ﬃ cers during the relevant recovery period pursuant to §240.10D-1(b).
☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). ☐ YES ☒ NO
Aggregate market value of voting and non-voting common equity held by non-affiliates of registrant on June 30, 2022, the last
business day of the Registrant’s most recently completed second fiscal quarter: $43,775,885,223 (see Item 12, under Part III
hereof), based on a closing price of registrant’s Common Stock of $153.76 per share.
The number of shares of registrant’s Common Stock, par value $1.00 per share, outstanding as of January 31, 2023: 284,462,087
shares.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of the registrant’s Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting of Stockholders to be held May 4, 2023, and to be filed within
120 days after the registrant’s fiscal year ended December 31, 2022 (hereinafter referred to as “Proxy Statement”), are incorporated
by reference into Part III.
Table of Contents
2ECOLAB INC.
FORM 10-K
For the Year Ended December 31, 2022
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Beginning
Page
PART I
Item 1.      Business. 3
Item 1A.   Risk Factors. 17
Item 1B.   Unresolved Staff Comments. 23
Item 2.      Properties. 23
Item 3.      Legal Proceedings. 25
Item 4.      Mine Safety Disclosures. 25
PART II
Item 5.     Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer 
Purchases of Equity Securities.26
Item 6.     [Reserved]. 26
Item 7.     Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of 
Operations.26
Item 7A.  Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk. 50
Item 8.     Financial Statements and Supplementary Data. 50
Item 9.     Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial 
Disclosure.102
Item 9A.  Controls and Procedures. 102
Item 9B.  Other Information. 102
Item 9C.  Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections. 102
PART III
Item 10.   Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance. 103
Item 11.   Executive Compensation. 103
Item 12.   Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related 
Stockholder Matters.103
Item 13.   Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence. 103
Item 14.   Principal Accounting Fees and Services. 103
PART IV
Item 15.   Exhibit and Financial Statement Schedules. 104
Item 16.   Form 10-K Summary. 110
Table of Contents
3PART I
Except where the context otherwise requires, references in this Form 10-K to (i) “Ecolab,” “Company,” “we” and “our”
are to Ecolab Inc. and its subsidiaries, collectively; (ii) “Nalco” are to Nalco Company LLC, a wholly-owned subsidiary
of the Company; (iii) “Nalco transaction” and “Nalco merger” are to the merger of Ecolab and Nalco Holding Company
completed in December 2011; (iv) “Purolite” are to Purolite LLC, a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company and its
subsidiaries, collectively; and (v) “Purolite transaction” are to the Company’s acquisition of the shares of the
subsidiaries and certain other affiliated entities of Purolite Corporation and substantially all of the assets of Purolite
Corporation used or held for use in connection with its filtration and purification resins business in December 2021.
Item 1. Business.
General Development of Business.
Ecolab was incorporated as a Delaware corporation in 1924. Our fiscal year is the calendar year ending December 31.
International subsidiaries are included in the consolidated financial statements on the basis of their U.S. GAAP
(accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America) November 30 fiscal year ends to facilitate
the timely inclusion of such entities in our consolidated financial reporting.
In June 2020, we completed the separation of our Upstream Energy business (the “ChampionX business”) in a
Reverse Morris Trust transaction (the “Transaction”) through the split-off of ChampionX Holding Inc. (“ChampionX”),
formed by Ecolab as a wholly owned subsidiary to hold the ChampionX business, followed immediately by the merger
(the “Merger”) of ChampionX with a wholly owned subsidiary of ChampionX Corporation (f/k/a Apergy Corporation,
“Apergy”).
As discussed in Note 5 Discontinued Operations, the ChampionX business met the criteria to be reported as
discontinued operations in 2020 because the separation of ChampionX was a strategic shift in business that had a
major effect on our operations and financial results. Therefore, we reported the historical results of ChampionX,
including the results of operations and cash flows as discontinued operations, and related assets and liabilities were
retrospectively reclassified for all periods presented herein. Unless otherwise noted, the accompanying financial
information has been revised to reflect the effect of the separation of ChampionX and prior year balances have been
revised accordingly to reflect continuing operations only.
On December 1, 2021, we acquired Purolite for total consideration of $3.7 billion in cash, net of cash acquired. Purolite
is a leading and fast-growing global provider of high-end ion exchange resins for the separation and purification of
solutions that is highly complementary to our current offering and critical to safe, high quality drug production and
biopharma product purification in the life sciences industries. It also provides purification and separation solutions for
critical industrial markets like microelectronics, nuclear power and food and beverage. Headquartered in King of
Prussia, Pennsylvania, Purolite operates in more than 30 countries. Purolite is reported within our Life Sciences
operating segment.
Narrative Description of Business.
General
A trusted partner for millions of customers, we are a global sustainability leader offering water, hygiene and infection
prevention solutions and services that protect people and the resources vital to life. Building on a century of
innovation, we have annual sales of $14 billion, employ more than 47,000 associates and operate in more than 170
countries around the world. We deliver comprehensive science-based solutions, data-driven insights and world-class
service to advance food safety, maintain clean and safe environments, and optimize water and energy use. Our
innovative solutions improve operational efficiencies and sustainability for customers in the food, healthcare, life
sciences, hospitality and industrial markets.
We pursue a “Circle the Customer – Circle the Globe” strategy by providing an array of innovative programs, products
and services designed to meet the specific operational and sustainability needs of our customers throughout the world.
Through this strategy and our varied product and service mix, one customer may utilize the offerings of several of our
operating segments. Important in our business proposition for customers is our ability to produce improved results
while reducing their water and energy use. With that in mind, we focus on continually innovating to optimize both our
own operations and the solutions we provide to customers, aligning with our corporate strategy to address some of the
world’s most pressing and complex sustainability challenges such as water scarcity and climate change. The work we
do matters, and the way we do it matters to our employees, customers, investors and the communities in which we
and our customers operate.
Sustainability is core to our business strategy. We deliver sustainable solutions that help companies around the world
achieve their business goals while reducing environmental impacts. We partner with customers around the world to
reduce water and energy use as well as greenhouse gas emissions through our high-efficiency solutions. By
partnering with our customers to help them do more with less through the use of our innovative and differentiated
solutions, we aim to help our customers conserve more than 300 billion gallons of water annually by 2030. In 2021, we
helped our customers conserve more than 215 billion gallons of water and avoid more than 3.5 million metric tons of
greenhouse gas emissions.
Table of Contents
4The following description of our business is based upon our reportable segments as reported in our consolidated
financial statements for the year ended December 31, 2022, which are located in Item 8 of Part II of this Form 10-K.
Operating segments that share similar economic characteristics and future prospects, including the nature of the
products and production processes, end-use markets, channels of distribution and regulatory environment, have been
aggregated into three reportable segments: Global Industrial, Global Institutional & Specialty and Global Healthcare &
Life Sciences. Operating segments that were not aggregated and do not exceed the quantitative criteria to be
separately reported have been combined into Other. We provide similar information for Other as compared to our three
reportable segments as we consider the information regarding its underlying operating segments useful in
understanding our consolidated results.
Global Industrial
This reportable segment consists of the Water, Food & Beverage, Downstream and Paper operating segments, which
provide water treatment and process applications, and cleaning and sanitizing solutions, primarily to large industrial
customers within the manufacturing, food and beverage processing, transportation, chemical, primary metals and
mining, power generation, global refining, petrochemical, pulp and paper industries. The underlying operating
segments exhibit similar manufacturing processes, distribution methods and economic characteristics. Descriptions of
the four operating segments which comprise our Global Industrial reportable segment follow below.
Water
Water serves customers across industrial and institutional markets. Within Water, our light industry markets include
food and beverage, manufacturing and transportation, institutional clients including commercial buildings, hospitals,
universities and hotels, and global high technology serving customers including data centers and microelectronics.
Heavy industries served include power, chemicals and primary metals and mining.
Water provides water treatment products and technology programs for cooling water, wastewater, boiler water and
process water applications. Our cooling water treatment programs are designed to control challenges associated with
cooling water systems — corrosion, scale and microbial fouling and contamination — in open recirculating, once-
through and closed systems. Our wastewater products and programs focus on improving overall plant economics,
addressing compliance issues, optimizing equipment efficiency and improving operator capabilities and effectiveness.
We provide integrated chemical and digitally-based solutions, process improvements and mechanical component
modifications to optimize boiler performance and control corrosion and scale build-up. Our programs assist in more
effectively managing water use for plant processes by optimizing the performance of treatment chemicals and
equipment in order to minimize costs and maximize returns on investment.
Our offerings include specialty products such as scale and corrosion inhibitors, antifoulants, pre-treatment solutions,
membrane treatments, coagulants and flocculants, and anti-foamers, as well as our 3D TRASARTM technologies,
which combines chemistry, remote services and monitoring and control. We provide products and programs for water
treatment and process applications aimed at combining environmental benefits with economic gains for our customers.
Typically, water savings, energy savings and operating efficiency are among our primary sources of value creation for
our customers, with product quality and production enhancement improvements also providing key differentiating
features for many of our offerings. Our offerings are sold primarily by our corporate account and field sales employees.
We believe we are one of the leading global suppliers of products and programs for chemical applications within the
industrial water treatment industry.
Food & Beverage
Food & Beverage provides cleaning and sanitation products and programs to facilitate the processing of products for
human consumption. Food & Beverage provides detergents, cleaners, sanitizers, lubricants and animal health
products, as well as cleaning systems, digitally-based dispensers, monitors and chemical injectors for the application
of chemical products, primarily to dairy plants; dairy, swine and poultry farms; breweries and soft-drink bottling plants
as well as meat, poultry and other food processors. Food & Beverage is also a leading developer and marketer of
antimicrobial products used in direct contact with meat, poultry, seafood and produce during processing in order to
reduce microbial contamination. Food & Beverage also designs, engineers and installs CIP (“clean-in-place”) process
control systems and facility cleaning systems for its customer base. Water savings, energy savings, and operating
efficiency are among our sources of value creation for our customers. Products for use in processing facilities are sold
primarily by our corporate account and field sales employees, while products for use on farms are sold through dealers
and independent, third-party distributors.
We believe we are one of the leading global suppliers of cleaning and sanitizing products to the dairy plant, dairy,
swine and poultry farm, beverage/brewery, food, meat and poultry, and beverage/brewery processing industries.
Table of Contents
5Downstream
Downstream provides products and programs for process and water treatment applications specific to the petroleum
refining and fuels industry, enabling our customers to profitably refine and upgrade hydrocarbons. We solve our
customers’ toughest process and water challenges so they can reliably, sustainably and profitably refine fuels and
process petrochemicals. Our proven chemistry and digital technologies combined with service increase refinery and
petrochemical plant reliability and the useful life of customer assets while improving product quality and yields. Our
product portfolio includes corrosion inhibitors, antifoulants, hydrogen sulfide removal, cold flow improvers, lubricity
inhibitors, crude desalting, reactive monomer inhibitors, olefins, anti-polymerants, anti-oxidants and water treatment.
Our customers include many of the largest publicly traded oil, refining and petrochemical companies, as well as
national refining and petrochemical companies, and large independent refining companies. Our downstream offerings
are sold primarily by our corporate account and field sales employees and, to a lesser extent, through engineering,
procurement, and construction contractors (EPC), technology licensors, distributors, sales agents and joint ventures.
We believe we are one of the leading global providers of products and programs for specialty chemical applications to
downstream refineries and petrochemicals operations.
Paper
Paper provides water and process applications for the pulp and paper industries, offering a comprehensive portfolio of
programs that are used in all principal steps of the papermaking process and across all grades of paper, including
graphic grades, board and packaging, and tissue and towel. While Paper provides its customers similar types of
products and programs for water treatment and wastewater treatment as those offered by Water, Paper also offers two
specialty programs that differentiate its offerings from Water—pulp applications and paper applications. Our pulp
applications maximize process efficiency and increase pulp cleanliness and brightness in bleaching operations, as well
as predict and monitor scaling potential utilizing on-line monitoring to design effective treatment programs and avoid
costly failures. Our paper process applications focus on improving our customers’ operational efficiency, in part
through water savings, energy savings and operating efficiency. Advanced digital sensing, monitoring and automation
combine with innovative chemistries and detailed process knowledge to provide a broad range of customer solutions.
Specialty products include flocculants, coagulants, dewatering aids and digester yield additives. Our offerings are sold
primarily by our corporate account and field sales employees.
We believe we are one of the leading global suppliers of water treatment products and process aids to the pulp and
papermaking industry.
Global Institutional & Specialty
This reportable segment consists of the Institutional and Specialty operating segments, which provide specialized
cleaning and sanitizing products to the foodservice, hospitality, lodging, government, education and retail industries.
The underlying operating segments exhibit similar manufacturing processes, distribution methods and economic
characteristics. Descriptions of the two operating segments which comprise our Global Institutional & Specialty
reportable segment follow below.
Institutional
Institutional sells specialized cleaners and sanitizers for washing dishes, glassware, flatware, foodservice utensils and
kitchen equipment (“warewashing”), plus specialized cleaners for various applications throughout food service
operations, on-premise laundries (typically used by hotel and healthcare customers) and general housekeeping
functions. We also sell food safety products and equipment, water filters, dishwasher racks and related kitchen
sundries to the foodservice, lodging, educational and healthcare industries. Institutional also provides pool and spa
treatment programs for hospitality and other commercial customers, as well as a broad range of janitorial cleaning and
floor care products and programs to customers in hospitality, healthcare and commercial facilities. Institutional
develops various digital monitoring and chemical dispensing systems which are used by our customers to efficiently
and safely dispense our cleaners and sanitizers, and through these products, systems and our on-site sales and
service expertise, develop better results for our customers including water savings, energy savings and operating
efficiency. In addition, Institutional markets a lease program comprised of energy-efficient dishwashing machines,
detergents, rinse additives and sanitizers, including full machine maintenance. Through our EcoSure Food Safety
Management business, Institutional also provides customized on-site evaluations, training and quality assurance
services to foodservice operations. With the Lobster Ink business, Institutional provides our customers with end-to-end
digital training solutions designed to drive corrective actions and optimal frontline execution.
Institutional sells its products and programs primarily through its direct field sales and corporate account sales
personnel. Corporate account sales personnel establish relationships and negotiate contracts with larger multi-unit or
“chain” customers. We also utilize independent, third-party foodservice, broad-line and janitorial distributors to provide
logistics to end customers that prefer to work through these distributors. Many of these distributors also participate in
marketing our product and service offerings to the end customers. Through our field sales personnel, we generally
provide the same customer support to end-use customers supplied by these distributors as we do to direct customers.
We believe we are one of the leading global suppliers of warewashing and laundry products and programs to the food
service, hospitality and lodging markets.
Table of Contents
6Specialty
Specialty supplies cleaning and sanitizing chemical products and related items primarily to regional, national and
international quick service restaurant (“QSR”) chains and food retailers (i.e., supermarkets and grocery stores). Its
products include specialty and general purpose hard surface cleaners, degreasers, sanitizers, polishes, hand care
products and assorted cleaning tools and equipment which are primarily sold under the “Ecolab” and “Kay” brand
names. Specialty’s cleaning and sanitation programs are customized to meet the needs of the market segments it
serves and are designed to provide highly effective cleaning performance, promote food safety, reduce labor, water
and energy costs and enhance user and guest safety. A number of dispensing options are available for products in the
core product range. Specialty supports its product sales with training programs and technical support designed to
meet the special needs of its customers.
Both Specialty’s QSR business and its food retail business utilize their corporate account sales force which manages
relationships with customers at the corporate and regional office levels (and, in the QSR market segment, at the
franchisee level) and their field sales force which provides program support at the individual restaurant or store level.
QSR customers are primarily supplied through third party distributors while most food retail customers utilize their own
distribution networks. While Specialty’s customer base has broadened significantly over the years, Specialty’s
business remains largely dependent upon a limited number of major QSR chains and franchisees and large food retail
customers.
Food Safety Solutions supplies a variety of products, tools and equipment for food preparation, food rotation,
temperature management, cleaning and employee safety across all food service customers. Food Safety Solutions
also offers digital applications that automate kitchen procedures for efficiency and compliance.
We believe we are one of the leading suppliers of cleaning and sanitizing products to the global QSR market and a
leading supplier of cleaning and sanitizing products to the global food retail market.
Global Healthcare & Life Sciences
This reportable segment consists of the Healthcare and Life Sciences operating segments, which provide specialized
cleaning and sanitizing products to the healthcare, personal care and pharmaceutical industries. The underlying
operating segments exhibit similar manufacturing processes, distribution methods and economic characteristics.
Descriptions of the two operating segments which comprise our Global Healthcare & Life Sciences reportable segment
follow below.
Healthcare
Healthcare provides infection prevention and surgical solutions to acute care hospitals, surgery centers and medical
device Original Equipment Manufacturers (“OEM”). Healthcare’s proprietary infection prevention and surgical solutions
(hand hygiene, hard surface disinfection, digital monitoring systems, instrument cleaning, patient drapes, equipment
drapes and surgical fluid warming and cooling systems) are sold primarily under the "Ecolab," "Microtek," and “Anios”
brand names to various departments within the acute care environment (Infection Control, Environmental Services,
Central Sterile and Operating Room). Healthcare sells its products and programs principally through its field sales
personnel and corporate account personnel but also sells through healthcare distributors.
We believe we are one of the leading suppliers of infection prevention and surgical solutions in the United States and
Europe.
Life Sciences
Life Sciences provides end-to-end cleaning and contamination control solutions to pharmaceutical and personal care
manufacturers. These products are primarily sold under the “Ecolab” brand name, and include detergents, cleaners,
sanitizers, disinfectants, surface wipes, as well as cleaning systems, electronic dispensers and chemical injectors for
the application of chemical products. With the acquisition of Purolite, the portfolio now includes premium fluid
treatment and purification solutions with a broad range of unique products sold under the “Purolite” brand name,
particularly focusing on biopharma purification solutions, active pharmaceutical ingredients (“API’s”) and high value
industrial applications. The Life Sciences portfolio also includes decontamination systems and services utilizing
hydrogen peroxide vapor, which are sold under the “Bioquell” brand name. The pharmaceutical clean room
environment is the primary area that Ecolab and Bioquell products are utilized. Purolite products are primarily used in
the purification of biologic therapeutics, API’s and high value industrial applications. Products and programs are sold
primarily through our field sales and corporate account personnel, and to a lesser extent through distributors.
Life Sciences is comprised of customers and accounts related to manufacturing in the following industries:
pharmaceutical, animal health and medicine, blood purification and dialysis, biologic products, cosmetics and medical
devices. Our tailored, comprehensive solutions and technical know-how focus on ensuring product quality, safety and
compliance standards are met while improving operational efficiency in customers’ cleaning, sanitation and disinfection
processes. We believe we are one of the leading suppliers of process purification solutions in Europe and North
America and of contamination control solutions in Europe, with a growing presence in North America and other
regions.
Table of Contents
7Other
Other consists of the Pest Elimination, Textile Care and Colloidal Technologies Group operating segments. These
operating segments do not meet the quantitative criteria to be separately reported. We disclose these operating
segments within Other as we consider the information useful in understanding our consolidated results.
Pest Elimination
Pest Elimination provides services designed to detect, eliminate and prevent pests such as rodents and insects, in
restaurants, food and beverage processors, educational, life science and healthcare facilities, hotels, quick service
restaurant and grocery operations and other institutional and commercial customers. The services of Pest Elimination
are sold and performed by our field sales and service personnel.
In addition to the United States, which constitutes our largest operation, we operate in various countries in Asia Pacific,
Greater China, Western Europe, Latin America and South Africa.
We believe Pest Elimination is a leading supplier of high-quality outcome pest elimination programs to the commercial,
hospitality and institutional markets in the geographies it serves.
Textile Care
Textile Care provides products and services that manage the entire wash process through custom designed programs,
premium products, dispensing equipment, water and energy management and reduction, and real time data
management for large scale, complex commercial laundry operations including uniform rental, hospitality, linen rental
and healthcare laundries. Textile Care’s programs are designed to meet our customers’ needs for exceptional
cleaning, while extending the useful life of linen and reducing our customers’ overall operating costs. Products and
programs are marketed primarily through our field sales employees and, to a lesser extent, through distributors. We
believe we are one of the leading global suppliers in the laundry markets in which we compete.
Colloidal Technologies Group
The Colloidal Technologies Group (“CTG”) produces and sells colloidal silica, which is comprised of nano-sized
particles of silica in water. These products and associated programs are used primarily for binding and polishing
applications. CTG serves customers across various industries, including semiconductor manufacturing, catalyst
manufacturing, chemicals and aerospace component manufacturing.
CTG incorporates strong collaboration with customers to develop customized solutions that meet the technical
demands of their operations. Our silica-based applications are widely used for polishing of silicon wafers,
semiconductor substrates and the precision surface finishing of optics, watch crystals and other glass components.
We offer a variety of silica-based particles that can be used as binders in heterogeneous catalyst systems and as silica
nutrients for manufacturing specialty zeolites. Our silica products are used worldwide as a binder for precision
investment casting slurries, which ultimately facilitate the manufacture of near net-shape metal parts such as turbine
blades and golf club heads.
Our products are sold primarily by our corporate account employees. We believe we are one of the leading global
suppliers of colloidal silica.
Additional Information
International Operations
We directly operate in approximately 100 countries outside of the United States through wholly-owned subsidiaries or,
in some cases, through a joint venture with a local partner. In certain countries, selected products are sold by our
export operations to distributors, agents or licensees, although the volume of those sales is not significant in terms of
our overall revenues. In general, our businesses conducted outside the United States are similar to those conducted in
the United States.
Our business operations outside the United States are subject to the usual risks of foreign operations, including
possible changes in trade and foreign investment laws, international business laws and regulations, tax laws, currency
exchange rates and economic and political conditions. The profitability of our international operations is generally
lower than the profitability of our businesses in the United States, due to (i) the additional cost of operating in
numerous and diverse foreign jurisdictions with varying laws and regulations, (ii) higher costs of importing certain raw
materials and finished goods in some regions, (iii) the smaller scale of international operations where certain operating
locations are smaller in size, and (iv) the additional reliance on distributors and agents in certain countries which can
negatively impact our margins. Proportionately larger investments in sales and technical support are also necessary in
certain geographies in order to facilitate the growth of our international operations.
Table of Contents
8Competition
In general, the markets in which the businesses in our Global Industrial reportable segment compete are led by a few
large companies, with the rest of the market served by smaller entities focusing on more limited geographic regions or
a smaller subset of products and services. Our businesses in this segment compete on the basis of their demonstrated
value, technical expertise, innovation, digital technology, chemical formulations, global customer support, detection
equipment, monitoring capabilities, and dosing and metering equipment. Through the combination of our digitally
enabled end-to-end water management and hygiene solutions, data-driven insights and personalized service, our
Global Industrial businesses deliver outcomes that help our customers optimize water and energy use, improve
productivity, advance food safety, and achieve sustainability and net zero goals, while optimizing total cost of
operations.
The businesses in our Global Institutional & Specialty reportable segment and Other have two significant classes of
competitors. First, we compete with a small number of large companies selling directly or through distributors on a
national or international scale. Second, we have numerous smaller regional or local competitors which focus on more
limited geographies, product lines and/or end-use customer segments. We believe we compete principally by providing
superior value, premium customer support, training, service, and innovative and differentiated products to help our
customers protect their brand reputation and improve their operational efficiency.
Within the Global Healthcare & Life Sciences reportable segment, the Healthcare business competes geographically
with companies primarily focused on a smaller range of product categories, with few globally scaled competitors. The
Life Sciences business competes in the European market versus several mid-size and regional competitors and
competes against two large and other mid-size or regional competitors in North America. Outside of North America and
Europe competitors are much more fragmented and do not offer the same level of service or coverage as Ecolab. Our
businesses in this segment compete by enabling our customers success through improved hygiene, digitally enabled
programs in operating room and patient room space as well as a tailored approach to delivering key inputs that directly
impact our customers patients globally.
Sales
Our products, systems and services are primarily marketed in domestic and international markets by our Company-
trained direct field sales personnel who also advise and assist our customers in the proper and most efficient use of
the products and systems in order to meet a full range of cleaning and sanitation, water treatment and process
chemistry needs. Independent, third-party distributors and, to a lesser extent, sales agents, are utilized in several
markets, as described in the segment descriptions found above.
Customers and Classes of Products
We believe our business is not materially dependent upon a single customer. Additionally, although we have a diverse
customer base and no customer or distributor constituted 10 percent or more of our consolidated revenues in 2022,
2021 or 2020, we do have customers and independent third-party distributors, the loss of which could have a material
adverse effect on results of operations for the affected earnings periods; however, we consider it unlikely that such an
event would have a material adverse impact on our financial position. No material part of our business is subject to
renegotiation or termination at the election of a governmental unit.
We sold one class of products within the Global Institutional & Specialty reportable segment which comprised 10% or
more of consolidated net sales in the last three years. Sales of warewashing products were approximately 12%, 10%,
and 11% of consolidated net sales in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Human Capital
As of December 31, 2022, Ecolab employed approximately 47,000 employees, including approximately 26,000 sales
and service and 1,100 research, development, and engineering employees. Approximately 41% of the employees are
employed in North America, 21% in Europe, 7% in Asia Pacific, 17% in Latin America, 6% in India, Middle East and
Africa, and 8% in Greater China.
We are committed to developing a culture that is diverse, equitable, inclusive, and fully leverages our employees’
talents as we work together to serve the needs of our customers. We believe in providing comprehensive training and
career development opportunities and in compensating and rewarding our employees equitably. Our commitment to
the safety of our employees, contractors and customers is evident in all we do, from the way we operate, to the
products we develop and to the customers we serve. In addition, we are committed to promoting the health and well-
being of our employees, our customers, and their customers by contributing to programs and initiatives that enhance
the quality of life in the communities where they work and live. In support of these overall objectives, key areas of
focus include:
Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion: We have a long-standing belief that a diverse, equitable, and inclusive workforce is a
critical foundation for the shared success of our employees, our company, our customers, and our communities. To
build that strong foundation, we have worked to embed diversity and inclusion throughout all people processes,
including recruitment, promotional practices, training and development, and total rewards. To help guide our work and
ensure a broad commitment to progress, Ecolab utilizes a Diversity Council made up of senior leaders throughout our
company and chaired by our CEO. We review key metrics and practices, including diverse representation, hiring
practices, and retention with the Council and with senior executives and business leads monthly. We set diversity
goals at or above market availability and utilize diverse slates for all hiring activity.
Table of Contents
9We have a vibrant and growing community of Employee Resource Groups (ERGs) to help employees connect with
colleagues, take part in career and leadership development experiences, and provide important insights in support of
advancing our work in diversity, equity, and inclusion. These employee-led ERGs create community and focus across
several dimensions of diversity, including gender, race/ethnicity, gender identity, sexual orientation, ability/disability,
military service and more. All employees are welcome and encouraged to join, participate or become leaders within
any of our 12 ERGs.
Employee Training and Development: At our core, Ecolab’s growth is rooted in decades of science, learning and
innovation. We have ambitious solution-oriented teams and we continually look for ways to help our employees learn
and grow. Beyond rigorous technical, functional, and business-specific training courses, our Global Corporate Flagship
Development Programs are designed to deepen leadership capability and prepare successors for key leadership
roles.
Safety, Health and Wellness: At Ecolab, the safety of our employees and contractors is a top priority and is embedded
into our company values. Our safety goals are simple: zero accidents, zero injuries and zero violations. We
communicate that this is a collective goal all employees commit to, own, and deliver on every day. Our leadership
teams and a network of Safety, Health and Environment professionals around the world support employees with robust
safety programs, processes, and platforms. Understanding underlying and potential risks is a critical component to
improving safety outcomes. Our Global Safety Dashboard tracks our performance on a range of leading and lagging
safety indicators and helps us measure the effectiveness of our safety programs.
Additionally, a Be Well Program is available to U.S. employees and their families to empower, educate and support
their personal journey to overall well-being by making positive lifestyle choices while creating a culture of wellness
throughout Ecolab. Over the last few years, we’ve expanded our offerings to include comprehensive child and elder
caregiver resources to help employees balance the demands of work and personal responsibilities. To ensure the
safety of our employees amidst an ongoing COVID-19 pandemic environment, we follow CDC and local guidance.
We’ve continued to help our global employees garner access to vaccines and COVID-19 testing, have provided the
option for employees who can do their work remotely to work from home on a hybrid schedule, and have implemented
additional safety measures for our employees working in the field and in our plant and warehouse locations.
Future of Work: Ecolab is committed to building a best-in-class, thriving work environment for all employees —from
those who work in the field serving our customers, to those who work in our manufacturing facilities, to our employees
who work in an office environment— our focus extends across all segments of our workforce. The Future of Work at
Ecolab will embrace enhanced tools and technology and evolved practices to optimize performance, productivity, and
collaboration. We offer a hybrid work model that balances evolving work practices and norms while preserving the
practices we believe are core and fundamental to our success.
For additional detail regarding our Human Capital Management metrics and focus areas, please refer to our website
for additional detail regarding our Human Capital Management metrics and focus areas, Diversity, Equity and Inclusion
initiatives and other information and metrics, including our latest Corporate Responsibility GRI Report and EEO-1
report.
Patents and Trademarks
We own and license a number of patents, trademarks and other intellectual property, including intellectual property
from our recent acquisition of Purolite. While we have an active program to protect our intellectual property by filing for
patents or trademarks and pursuing legal action, when appropriate, to prevent infringement, except for the items listed
below, we do not believe our overall business is materially dependent on any individual patent or trademark.
● Patents related to our TRASAR and 3D TRASAR technology, which are material to our Global Industrial
reportable segment. U.S. and foreign patents protect aspects of our key TRASAR and 3D TRASAR
technology until at least 2024.
● Trademarks related to Ecolab, Nalco and 3D TRASAR, which collectively are material to all of our
reportable segments. The Ecolab, Nalco and 3D TRASAR trademarks are registered or applied for in all of
our key markets and we anticipate maintaining them indefinitely.
Seasonality
We experience variability in our quarterly operating results due to seasonal sales volume and business mix
fluctuations in our operating segments. Part II, Item 8, Note 20, entitled “Quarterly Financial Data” of this Form 10-K is
incorporated herein by reference.
Investments in Equipment
We have invested, and plan to continue to invest, in process control and monitoring equipment consisting primarily of
systems used by customers to dispense our products as well as to monitor water systems. The investment in such
equipment is discussed under the heading "Investing Activities" in Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations of this Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
10Manufacturing and Distribution
We manufacture most of our products and related equipment in Company-operated manufacturing facilities. Some
products are also produced for us by third-party contract manufacturers. Other products and equipment are purchased
from third-party suppliers. Additional information on product/equipment sourcing is found in the segment discussions
above and additional information on our manufacturing facilities is located under Part I, Item 2. “Properties,” of this
Form 10-K.
Deliveries to customers are made from our manufacturing plants and a network of distribution centers and third-party
logistics service providers. We use common carriers, our own delivery vehicles, and distributors for transport.
Additional information on our plant and distribution facilities is located under Part I, Item 2. “Properties,” of this Form
10-K.
Raw Materials
Raw materials purchased for use in manufacturing our products are inorganic chemicals, including alkalis, acids,
biocides, phosphonates, phosphorous materials, silicates and salts; and organic chemicals, including acids, alcohols,
amines, fatty acids, surfactants, solvents, monomers and polymers. Healthcare purchases plastic films and parts to
manufacture medical devices that serve the surgical and infection prevention markets. Pesticides used by Pest
Elimination are purchased as finished products under contract or purchase order from the producers or their
distributors. We also purchase packaging materials for our manufactured products and components for our specialized
cleaning equipment and systems. We purchase more than 10,000 raw materials, with the largest single raw material
representing approximately four percent of raw material purchases. Our raw materials, with the exception of a few
specialized chemicals which we manufacture, are generally purchased on an annual contract basis and are ordinarily
available in adequate quantities from a diverse group of suppliers globally. We have encountered supply chain
disruptions with impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic, war in Ukraine and the overall energy crisis (mainly in Europe).
These events have impacted the availability and cost of many raw materials. When practical, global sourcing is used
so that purchasing or production locations can be shifted to control product costs.
Research and Development
Our research and development program consists principally of developing and validating the performance of new
products, processes, techniques and equipment, improving the efficiency of those already existing, improving service
program content, evaluating the environmental compatibility of products and technical support. Key disciplines include
analytical and formulation chemistry, microbiology, data science and predictive analytics, process and packaging
engineering, digital and remote monitoring engineering and product dispensing technology. Substantially all of our
principal products have been developed by our research, development and engineering personnel.
We believe continued research and development activities are critical to maintaining our leadership position within the
industry and will provide us with a competitive advantage as we seek additional business with new and existing
customers.
Joint Ventures
Over time, we have entered into partnerships or joint ventures in order to meet local ownership requirements, to
achieve quicker operational scale, to expand our ability to provide our customers a more fully integrated offering or to
provide other benefits to our business or customers. During 2022, the impact on our consolidated net income of our
joint ventures, in the aggregate, was approximately three percent. We will continue to evaluate the potential for
partnerships and joint ventures that can assist us in increasing our geographic, technological and product reach.
Environmental and Regulatory Considerations
Our businesses are subject to various legislative enactments and regulations relating to the protection of the
environment and public health. While we cooperate with governmental authorities and take commercially practicable
measures to meet regulatory requirements and avoid or limit environmental effects, some risks are inherent in our
businesses. Among the risks are costs associated with transporting and managing hazardous materials and waste
disposal and plant site clean-up, fines and penalties if we are found to be in violation of law, as well as modifications,
disruptions or discontinuation of certain operations or types of operations including product recalls and reformulations.
Similarly, the need for certain of our products and services is dependent upon or might be limited by governmental
laws and regulations. Changes in such laws and regulations, including among others, air, water, chemical and product
regulations, could impact the sales of some of our products or services. In addition to an increase in costs of
manufacturing and delivering products, a change in production regulations or product regulations could result in
interruptions to our business and potentially cause economic or consequential losses should we be unable to meet the
demands of our customers for products.
Additionally, although we are not currently aware of any such circumstances, there can be no assurance that future
legislation or enforcement policies will not have a material adverse effect on our consolidated results of operations,
financial position or cash flows. Environmental and regulatory matters most significant to us are discussed below.
Ingredient Legislation: Various laws and regulations have been enacted by state, local and foreign
jurisdictions pertaining to the sale of products which contain phosphorous, volatile organic compounds, or
other ingredients that may impact human health or the environment. Under California Proposition 65, for
example, label disclosures are required for certain products containing chemicals listed by California.
Chemical management initiatives that promote pollution prevention through research and development of
safer chemicals and safer chemical processes are being advanced by several states.
Table of Contents
11Environmentally preferable purchasing programs for cleaning products have been enacted in a number of
states to date, and in recent years have been considered by several other state legislatures. Cleaning
product ingredient disclosure legislation has been introduced in the U.S. Congress in each of the past few
years but has not passed, and several states are considering further regulations in this area. In 2017,
California passed the Cleaning Product Right to Know Act of 2017, that required ingredient transparency on-
line and on-label by 2020 and 2021, respectively. New York has proposed similar ingredient disclosure
regulation. The U.S. Government is monitoring “green chemistry” initiatives through a variety of initiatives,
including its “Design for the Environment” (“DfE”)/“Safer Choice” program. DfE/Safer Choice has three broad
areas of work (recognition of safer products on a DfE/Safer Choice label, development of best practices for
industrial processes and evaluation of safer chemicals), and we are involved in these to varying degrees.
Our Global Institutional and Global Industrial cleaning products are subject to the regulations and may incur
additional stay-in-market expenses associated with conducting the required alternatives analyses for
chemicals of concern. To date, we generally have been able to comply with such legislative requirements by
reformulation or labeling modifications. Such legislation has not had a material adverse effect on our
consolidated results of operations, financial position or cash flows to date.
TSCA: The nation’s primary chemicals management law, the Toxic Substances Control Act (“TSCA”), was
updated for the first time in 40 years with the passage of the Frank R. Lautenberg Chemical Safety for the
21st Century Act (“LCSA”) in 2016. The LCSA modernizes the original 1976 legislation, aiming to establish
greater public confidence in the safety of chemical substances in commerce and improve the U.S.
Environmental Protection Agency’s (“EPA”) capability and authority to regulate existing and new chemical
substances. For Ecolab, the TSCA changes mainly impact testing and submission costs for new and existing
chemical substances in the United States. As a result of reform and administration changes, EPA reviews
are resulting in the majority of new substances being regulated in some manner by the agency. Compliance
with new requirements under TSCA are similar to the costs associated with REACH in the European Union,
which is discussed below.
REACH: The European Union has enacted a regulatory framework for the Registration, Evaluation and
Authorization of Chemicals (“REACH”), which aims to manage chemical safety risks. REACH established a
European Chemicals Agency (“ECHA”) in Helsinki, Finland, which is responsible for evaluating data to
determine hazards and risks and to manage this program for authorizing chemicals for sale and distribution
in Europe. We met all REACH registration requirements. To help manage this program, we have been
simplifying our product lines and working with chemical suppliers to comply with registration requirements. In
addition, Korea, Taiwan, Turkey, India, Chile and Colombia and other countries have implemented or are
implementing similar requirements. In addition, the European Green Deal will include the revision of
chemical management regulation to achieve a circular economy and toxic-free environment (Chemical
Strategy for Sustainability) which may impact sales in Ecolab’s raw material portfolio. Potential costs to us
are not yet fully quantifiable but are not expected to have a material adverse effect on our consolidated
results of operations or cash flows in any one reporting period or on our financial position.
GHS: In 2003, the United Nations adopted a standard on hazard communication and labeling of chemical
products known as the Globally Harmonized System of Classification and Labeling of Chemicals (“GHS”).
GHS is designed to facilitate international trade and increase safe handling and use of hazardous chemicals
through a worldwide system that classifies chemicals based on their intrinsic hazards and communicates
information about those hazards through standardized product labels and safety data sheets (“SDSs”). Most
countries in which we operate have adopted or are expected to adopt GHS-related legislation by 2023. The
primary cost of compliance revolves around reclassifying products and revising SDSs and product labels.
We have met applicable deadlines and are working toward a phased-in approach to mitigate the costs of
GHS implementation in remaining countries (e.g., Peru, Chile, India). Potential costs to us are not expected
to have a material adverse effect on our consolidated results of operations or cash flows in any one
reporting period or on our financial position.
Pesticide and Biocide Legislation: Various international, federal and state environmental laws and
regulations govern the manufacture and/or use of pesticides. We manufacture and sell certain disinfecting,
sanitizing and material preservation products that kill or reduce microorganisms (bacteria, viruses, fungi) on
hard environmental surfaces, in process fluids and on certain food products. Such products constitute
“pesticides” or “antimicrobial pesticides” under the current definitions of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide,
and Rodenticide Act (“FIFRA”), as amended by the Food Quality Protection Act of 1996, the principal federal
statute governing the manufacture, labeling, handling and use of pesticides. We maintain several hundred
product registrations with the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (“EPA”). Registration entails the
necessity to meet certain efficacy, toxicity and labeling requirements and to pay on-going registration fees. In
addition, each state in which these products are sold requires registration and payment of a fee. In general,
the states impose no substantive requirements different from those required by FIFRA. However, California
and certain other states have adopted additional regulatory programs, and California imposes a tax on total
pesticide sales in that state. While the cost of complying with rules as to pesticides has not had a material
adverse effect on our consolidated results of operations, financial condition, or cash flows to date, the costs
and delays in receiving necessary approvals for these products continue to increase. Total fees paid to the
EPA and the states to obtain or maintain pesticide registrations are not expected to significantly affect our
consolidated results of operations or cash flows in any one reporting period or our financial position.
In Europe, the Biocidal Products Regulation established a program to evaluate and authorize marketing of
biocidal active substances and products. We are working with suppliers and industry groups to manage
these requirements and have met all relevant deadlines of the program by the timely submission of dossiers
for active substances and biocide products. Anticipated registration costs, which will be incurred through the
multi-year phase-in period, will be significant; however, these costs are not expected to significantly affect
our consolidated results of operations or cash flows in any one reporting period or our financial position. The
same is true for emerging biocide regulations in Asia.
Table of Contents
12In addition, Pest Elimination applies restricted-use pesticides that it generally purchases from third parties.
That business must comply with certain standards pertaining to the use of such pesticides and to the
licensing of employees who apply such pesticides. Such regulations are enforced primarily by the states or
local jurisdictions in conformity with federal regulations. We have not experienced material difficulties in
complying with these requirements.
FDA Antimicrobial Product Requirements: Various laws and regulations have been enacted by federal,
state, local and foreign jurisdictions regulating certain products manufactured and sold by us for controlling
microbial growth on humans, animals and foods. In the United States, these requirements generally are
administered by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration ("FDA"). However, the U.S. Department of
Agriculture and EPA also may share in regulatory jurisdiction of antimicrobials applied to food. The FDA
codifies regulations for these product categories in order to ensure product quality, safety and effectiveness.
The FDA also has been expanding requirements applicable to such products, including proposing
regulations for over-the-counter antiseptic drug products, which may impose additional requirements
associated with antimicrobial hand care products and associated costs when finalized by the FDA. FDA
regulations associated with the Food Safety Modernization Act may impose additional requirements related
to safety product lines. To date, such requirements have not had a material adverse effect on our
consolidated results of operations, financial position or cash flows.
Medical Device and Drug Product Requirements: As a manufacturer, distributor and marketer of medical
devices and human drugs, we also are subject to regulation by the FDA and corresponding regulatory
agencies of the state, local and foreign governments in which we sell our products. These regulations
govern the development, testing, manufacturing, packaging, labeling, distribution and marketing of medical
devices and medicinal products, including Advanced Pharmaceutical Ingredients (“API”), excipients and
resins for biopharmaceutical processing. We also are required to register with the FDA as a medical device
and drug manufacturer, comply with post-market reporting (e.g., Adverse Event Reporting, MDR and Recall)
requirements, and to comply with the FDA’s current Good Manufacturing Practices and Quality System
Regulations which require that we have a quality system for the design and production of our products
intended for commercial distribution in the United States and satisfy recordkeeping requirements with
respect to our manufacturing, testing and control activities. Countries in the European Union require that
certain products being sold within their jurisdictions obtain a “CE mark,” an international symbol of
adherence to quality assurance standards, and be manufactured in compliance with certain requirements
(e.g., Medical Device Directive 93/42/EE, Medical Device Regulation (EU) 2017/745 (“MDR”), and ISO
13485). We have CE mark approval to sell various medical device and medicinal products in Europe.
Implementation of the MDR will require additional certifications and investments, including system, product
and process upgrades. Our other international non-European operations also are subject to government
regulation and country-specific rules and regulations. Regulators at the federal, state and local level have
imposed, are currently considering and are expected to continue to impose regulations on medical devices
and drug products. No prediction can be made of the potential effect of any such future regulations, and
there can be no assurance that future legislation or regulations will not increase the costs of our products or
prohibit the sale or use of certain products.
Equipment: Ecolab’s products are dispensed by equipment that is subject to state and local regulatory
requirements, as well as being subject to UL, NSF, and other approval requirements. For certain digitally
connected product offerings, Federal Communication Commission (“FCC”) and corresponding international
requirements are applicable. We have both dedicated manufacturing facilities and third-party production of
our equipment. We are developing processes to monitor and manage changing regulatory regimes and
assist with equipment systems compliance. To date, such requirements have not had a material adverse
effect on our consolidated results of operations, financial position or cash flows.
Other Environmental Legislation: Our manufacturing plants are subject to federal, state, local or foreign
jurisdiction laws and regulations relating to discharge of hazardous substances into the environment and to
the transportation, handling and disposal of such substances. The primary federal statutes that apply to our
activities in the United States are the Clean Air Act, the Clean Water Act and the Resource Conservation and
Recovery Act. We are also subject to the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986, which
imposes certain reporting requirements as to emissions of hazardous substances into the air, land and
water. The products we produce and distribute into Europe are also subject to directives governing electrical
waste (WEEE Directive 2012/19/EU) and restrictive substances (RoHS Directive 2011/65/EU). Similar legal
requirements apply to Ecolab’s facilities globally. We make capital investments and expenditures to comply
with environmental laws and regulations, to promote employee safety and to carry out our announced
environmental sustainability principles. To date, such expenditures have not had a significant adverse effect
on our consolidated results of operations, financial position or cash flows. Our capital expenditures for
environmental, health and safety projects worldwide were approximately $35 million in 2022, $28 million in
2021 and $18 million in 2020. Approximately $41 million has been budgeted globally for projects in 2023.
The increase in the projected spend reflects a return to historical annual expenditure levels prior to the
COVID-19 pandemic.
Climate Change: Various laws and regulations pertaining to climate change have been implemented or are
being considered for implementation at the international, national, regional and state levels, particularly as
they relate to the reduction of greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions. These include proposed regulations
introduced by the SEC in March 2022 relating to climate change disclosure and the European Commission’s
Corporate Sustainability Reporting Directive, which came into force in December 2022 and will apply to both
EU and certain non-EU companies with a phased introduction. These laws may directly impact the
Company. We continue to monitor the development and implementation of such laws and regulations;
however, as a matter of corporate policy, we support a balanced approach to reducing GHG emissions while
sustaining economic growth.
Table of Contents
Furthermore, climate-related risks are assessed within our Enterprise Risk Management process and Annual
Business Significance Risks Assessment, which is aligned with recommendations of the Financial Stability
Board (FSB) Task Force on Climate-related Financial Disclosures (TCFD). We report TCFD disclosures in
our annual CDP Climate report located at https://www.ecolab.com/sustainability/sustainability-reporting-
resources. We are evaluating further application of the recommendations of the TCFD in alignment with the
recommended timeline from the TCFD.
Ecolab recognizes that climate change poses potential risks and creates potential opportunities to our
organization. Ecolab has taken steps to further identify and assess the nature and magnitude of these risks
and opportunities. Ecolab has been focused on assessing climate risks for the past three years, leading up
to our TCFD-aligned climate risk assessment conducted in 2021. We expect to continue our efforts to
assess additional climate-related risks and opportunities including, exploring our supply chain resiliency, as
appropriate. Subsequently, Ecolab plans to review the results of our analysis and consider adaptation and
management plans for any relevant climate change risks and to further benefit from identified opportunities
for customer impact.
To further our climate commitment, in 2019 we announced new goals to reduce our GHG emissions by half
by 2030 and achieve net zero by 2050, in alignment with the United Nations Global Compact’s Business
Ambition for 1.5 ⁰ C. In 2020, we further committed to attempt to move to 100% renewable energy by 2030
and set a science-based target (SBT) addressing our Scope 1, 2 and 3 GHG emissions. Our SBT targets
reduction of absolute Scope 1 and 2 emissions by 50% by 2030 from a 2018 base year, and to work with our
suppliers representing 70% of our Scope 3 emissions to set science-based reduction targets by 2024. In
2021, we invested over $1.2 million in continuous improvement projects focused on water and energy
reductions at over 20 of our facilities across the globe. In all, these projects reduced annual energy
consumption by almost 5.4 billion BTUs, reduced GHG emissions by 324 MT CO2e and saved 27 million
gallons (~103,000 cubic meters) of water across our global supply chain manufacturing facilities. The scope
of energy consumption reductions is calculated using a combination of direct measurements and
estimations using best-practice methodologies. The scope of reduction in GHG emissions consumption data
is an estimated annual impact and includes both Scope 1 and 2 emissions. Water reduction is calculated
using the water meters and utilities data that measure the savings since our base year of calculations which
was 2018.
In addition to managing our operational and supply chain sustainability performance, we partner with
customers at more than three million customer locations around the world to reduce energy and GHG
emissions through our high-efficiency solutions in cleaning and sanitation, water, paper, and energy
services. Showcasing our global team’s dedication to helping our customers thrive and make a positive
impact in the world, we have set a 2030 goal to help our customers reduce their GHG emissions by 6.0
million metric tons. Ecolab recognizes the climate-water nexus. As part of our 2030 Impact Goals, we have
planned to restore greater than 50% of our water withdrawal and achieve Alliance for Water Stewardship
Standard certification in high-risk watersheds. In addition, we aim to reduce net water withdrawals by 40%
per unit of production across our enterprise. We also magnify our impact through the water-saving solutions
we deliver to our customers and have set a goal to help our customers conserve more than 300 billion
gallons of water annually by 2030.
The science of sustainability is an evolving one. For a discussion of the factors that may cause our
sustainability initiatives, goals and targets to differ from those expressed above, see Item 1A of this Form 10-
K, entitled “Risk Factors.”
Environmental Remediation and Proceedings: Along with numerous other potentially responsible parties
(“PRP”), we are currently involved with waste disposal site clean-up activities imposed by the federal
Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act (“CERCLA”) or state equivalents
at 17 sites in the United States. Additionally, we have similar liability at five sites outside the United States. In
general, under CERCLA, we and each other PRP that actually contributed hazardous substances to a
Superfund site are jointly and severally liable for the costs associated with cleaning up the site. Customarily,
the PRPs will work with the EPA to agree and implement a plan for site remediation.
Based on an analysis of our experience with such environmental proceedings, our estimated share of all
hazardous materials deposited on the sites referred to in the preceding paragraph, and our estimate of the
contribution to be made by other PRPs which we believe have the financial ability to pay their shares, we
have accrued our best estimate of our probable future costs relating to such known sites. In establishing
accruals, potential insurance reimbursements are not included. The accrual is not discounted. It is not
feasible to predict when the amounts accrued will be paid due to the uncertainties inherent in the
environmental remediation and associated regulatory processes.
We have also been named as a defendant in a number of lawsuits alleging personal injury due to exposure
to hazardous substances, including multi-party lawsuits alleging personal injury in connection with our
products and services. While we do not believe that any of these suits will be material to us based upon
present information, there can be no assurance that these environmental matters could not have, either
individually or in the aggregate, a material adverse effect on our consolidated results of operations, financial
position or cash flows.
We have also been named as a defendant in lawsuits where our products have not caused injuries, but the
claimants wish to be monitored for potential future injuries. We cannot predict with certainty the outcome of
any such tort claims or the involvement we or our products might have in such matters in the future, and
there can be no assurance that the discovery of previously unknown conditions will not require significant
expenditures. In each of these chemical exposure cases, our insurance carriers have accepted the claims
on our behalf (with or without reservation) and our financial exposure should be limited to the amount of our
deductible; however, we cannot predict the number of claims that we may have to defend in the future and
we may not be able to continue to maintain such insurance.
13
Table of Contents
14Our worldwide net expenditures for contamination remediation were approximately $1.4 million in 2022, $0.5
million in 2021 and $0.6 million in 2020. Our worldwide accruals at December 31, 2022 for probable future
remediation expenditures, excluding potential insurance reimbursements, totaled approximately $9.6 million. We
review our exposure for contamination remediation costs periodically and our accruals are adjusted as
considered appropriate. While the final resolution of these issues could result in costs below or above current
accruals and, therefore, have an impact on our consolidated financial results in a future reporting period, we
believe the ultimate resolution of these matters will not have a material effect on our consolidated results of
operations, financial position or cash flows.
Available Information.
We file annual, quarterly and current reports, proxy statements and other information with the SEC. The SEC
maintains a website that contains reports, proxy and information statements, and other information regarding issuers,
including us, that file electronically with the SEC at https://www.sec.gov.
General information about us, including our Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and
Current Reports on Form 8-K, as well as any amendments and exhibits to those reports, are available free of charge
through our website at https://investor.ecolab.com as soon as reasonably practicable after we file them with, or furnish
them to, the SEC.
In addition, the following governance materials are available on our web site at https://investor.ecolab.com/corporate-
governance: (i) charters of the Audit, Compensation, Finance, Governance and Safety, Health and Environment
Committees of our Board of Directors; (ii) our Board's Corporate Governance Principles; and (iii) our Code of Conduct.
We include our website addresses throughout this report for reference only. The information contained on our
websites, including the corporate responsibility, EEO-1, and climate reports identified in this report, is not incorporated
by reference into this report.
Table of Contents
15Information about our Executive Officers.
The persons listed in the following table are our current executive officers. Officers are elected annually. There is no
family relationship among any of the directors or executive officers and no executive officer has been involved during
the past ten years in any legal proceedings described in applicable Securities and Exchange Commission regulations.
Name     Age    Office     Positions Held
Since Jan. 1, 2018
Christophe Beck 55 Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Oct. 2022 – Present
Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and President May 2022 – Oct. 2022
President and Chief Executive Officer Jan. 2021 – May 2022
President and Chief Operating Officer Apr. 2019 – Dec. 2020
Executive Vice President and President – Industrial May 2018 – Mar. 2019
Executive Vice President and President – Global Nalco
WaterJan. 2018 – May 2018
Larry L. Berger 62 Executive Vice President and Chief Technical Officer Jan. 2018 – Present
Jennifer J. Bradway 46 Senior Vice President and Corporate Controller Jan. 2022 – Present
Senior Vice President and Controller, Global Institutional Jan. 2020 – Dec. 2021
Vice President Finance, Institutional North America May 2018 – Dec. 2019
Vice President and Controller, Institutional U.S. Jan. 2018 – Apr. 2018
Darrell R. Brown 59 President and Chief Operating Officer Oct. 2022 – Present
Executive Vice President and President – Global Industrial Apr. 2019 – Oct. 2022
Executive Vice President and President – Energy Services Jan. 2018 – Mar. 2019
Angela M. Busch 56 Executive Vice President – Corporate Strategy & Business
DevelopmentAug. 2018 – Present
Senior Vice President – Corporate Development Jan. 2018 – Aug. 2018
Alexander A. De
Boo55 Executive Vice President and President – Global Markets Feb. 2021 – Present
Executive Vice President and President – Western Europe Apr. 2020 – Jan. 2021
Senior Vice President and General Manager – Industrial,
EuropeOct. 2018 – Apr. 2020
Senior Vice President and General Manager – Food &
Beverage, EuropeJan. 2018 – Oct. 2018
Machiel Duijser (1) 51 Executive Vice President and Chief Supply Chain Officer Feb. 2020 – Present
Scott D. Kirkland 49 Chief Financial Officer Jan. 2022 – Present
Senior Vice President and Corporate Controller June 2019 – Dec.
2021
Senior Vice President – Finance, Global Energy Services Jan. 2018 – May 2019
Laurie M. Marsh 59 Executive Vice President – Human Resources Jan. 2018 – Present
Lanesha T. Minnix
(2)47 Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary June 2022 – Present
Gail Peterson 44 Senior Vice President – Global Marketing & Communications Jan. 2021 – Present
Vice President – Marketing Global Healthcare Jan. 2018 – Dec. 2020
Gergely Sved (3) 49 Executive Vice President and President – Global
Healthcare and Life SciencesApr. 2022 – Present
SVP and General Manager - Global Healthcare Jan. 2019 – Mar. 2022
(1) Prior to joining Ecolab in February 2020, Mr. Duijser was employed by Reckitt Benckiser Group plc (RB), a global
provider of health, hygiene and home products, as Chief Supply Officer since November 2018. Mr. Duijser joined RB
from Amazon.com, Inc., a global service provider for e-commerce, cloud computing, digital streaming, and artificial
intelligence, where he served as Vice President Worldwide Engineering from 2017 to 2018.
(2) Prior to joining Ecolab in June 2022, Ms. Minnix was employed by Flowserve Corporation, a global industrial
manufacturer of engineered flow control systems, as Senior Vice President, Chief Legal Officer and Corporate
Secretary from 2018 until 2022. Ms. Minnix joined Flowserve from BCM Stock Holdings, Inc., a buildings material
company, where she served as Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary from 2017 to 2018.
(3) Prior to joining Ecolab in January 2019, Mr. Sved was employed by GE HealthCare Technologies Inc., a global
medical technology company, where he served as Chief Executive Officer Europe Services from 2013 until 2018, and
held numerous other commercial leadership roles, including COO for Services Europe and GM for Northern Europe.
Table of Contents
16Forward-Looking Statements
This Form 10-K, including Part I, Item 1, entitled “Business,” and the MD&A within Part II, Item 7, contains forward-
looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements
include expectations concerning items such as:
● amount, funding and timing of cash expenditures relating to our restructuring and other initiatives, as well as
savings from such initiatives
● future cash flows, access to capital, targeted credit rating metrics and impact of credit rating downgrade
● adequacy of cash reserves
● uses for cash, including dividends, share repurchases, debt repayments, capital investments and strategic
business acquisitions
● global market risk
● long-term potential of our business
● impact of changes in exchange rates and interest rates
● customer retention rate
● bad debt experience, non-performance of counterparties and losses due to concentration of credit risk
● disputes, claims and litigation
● environmental contingencies
● impact and cost of complying with laws and regulations
● sustainability and human capital targets
● returns on pension plan assets
● contributions to pension and postretirement healthcare plans
● amortization expense
● impact of new accounting pronouncements
● income taxes, including tax attributes, valuation allowances, uncertain tax positions, permanent
reinvestment assertions and goodwill deductibility
● recognition of share-based compensation expense
● payments under operating leases
● future benefit plan payments
● market position
● the impact of the Covid-19 pandemic, including global economic recovery, supply shortages, inflation and
delivered product costs
Without limiting the foregoing, words or phrases such as “will likely result,” “are expected to,” “will be,” “will continue,”
“is anticipated,” “we believe,” “we expect,” “estimate,” “project” (including the negative or variations thereof), “intends,”
“could,” or similar terminology, generally identify forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements may also
represent challenging goals for us. These statements, which represent our expectations or beliefs concerning various
future events, are based on current expectations that involve a number of risks and uncertainties that could cause
actual results to differ materially from those of such forward-looking statements. We caution that undue reliance should
not be placed on such forward-looking statements, which speak only as of the date made. For a further discussion of
these and other factors which could cause results to differ from those expressed in any forward-looking statement, see
Item 1A of this Form 10-K, entitled “Risk Factors.” Except as may be required under applicable law, we undertake no
duty to update our forward-looking statements.
Forward-looking and other statements in this document may also address our sustainability initiatives, goals, targets
and progress, and the inclusion of such statements is not an indication that these contents are necessarily material to
investors or required to be disclosed in our filings with the SEC. In addition, historical, current, and forward-looking
sustainability-related statements may be based on standards for measuring progress that are still developing, internal
controls and processes that continue to evolve, and assumptions that are subject to change in the future and
performance against our goals and targets may differ from such forward-looking statements in such event.
Table of Contents
17Item 1A. Risk Factors.
The following are important factors which could affect our financial performance and could cause our actual results for
future periods to differ materially from our anticipated results or other expectations, including those expressed in any
forward-looking statements made in this Form 10-K. See the section entitled “Forward-Looking Statements” set forth
above.
We may also refer to this disclosure to identify factors that may cause results to differ materially from those expressed
in other forward-looking statements including those made in oral presentations, including telephone conferences
and/or webcasts open to the public.
Economic & Operational Risks
Our results are impacted by general worldwide economic factors.
The COVID pandemic, geopolitical instability, including the conflict between Russia and Ukraine, and other global
events have significantly increased economic and demand uncertainty. Some of the results of these events, including
supply chain challenges, inflation, high interest rates, foreign currency exchange volatility, and volatility in global
capital markets, have affected our business in the past and could continue to have a material adverse impact on our
business in the future. Countries such as Russia, Turkey and Argentina have recently experienced economic
upheaval and similar upheaval in other countries with Ecolab operations could have a material adverse impact on our
consolidated results of operations, financial position and cash flows by negatively impacting economic activity,
including in our key end-markets, and by further weakening the local currency versus the U.S. dollar, resulting in
reduced sales and earnings from our foreign operations, which are generated in the local currency, and then
translated to U.S. dollars.
Our results depend upon the continued vitality of the markets we serve.
Economic downturns, and in particular downturns in our larger markets including the foodservice, hospitality, travel,
health care, food processing, refining, pulp and paper, mining and steel industries, can adversely impact our
customers. In particular, we expect a more challenging macroeconomic environment, especially in Europe, as the war
and the energy crisis are having a significant impact on costs and demand. Additionally, the last three years we have
experienced the negative impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on the demand for our products and services provided to
customers in the full-service restaurant, hospitality, lodging and entertainment industries. In prior years, the weaker
global economic environment has also negatively impacted certain of our end-markets. During these periods of
weaker economic activity, our customers and potential customers may reduce or discontinue their volume of
purchases of cleaning and sanitizing products and water treatment and process chemicals, which has had, and may
continue to have, a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, results of operation or cash flows.
Our significant non-U.S. operations expose us to global economic, political and legal risks that could impact
our profitability.
We have significant operations outside the United States, including joint ventures and other alliances. We conduct
business in more than 170 countries and, in 2022, approximately 47% of our net sales originated outside the United
States. There are inherent risks in our international operations, including:
● exchange controls and currency restrictions;
● currency fluctuations and devaluations;
● tariffs and trade barriers;
● export duties and quotas;
● changes in the availability and pricing of raw materials, energy and utilities;
● changes in local economic conditions;
● changes in laws and regulations, including the imposition of economic or trade sanctions affecting
international commercial transactions;
● difficulties in managing international operations and the burden of complying with international and
foreign laws;
● requirements to include local ownership or management in our business;
● economic and business objectives that differ from those of our joint venture partners;
● exposure to possible expropriation, nationalization or other government actions;
● restrictions on our ability to repatriate dividends from our subsidiaries;
● unsettled political conditions, military action, civil unrest, acts of terrorism, force majeure, war or other
armed conflict; and
● countries whose governments have been hostile to U.S.-based businesses.
In light of Russia’s invasion of Ukraine and the United States’ and other countries’ sanctions against Russia, we
announced in April 2022 that we will focus our Russian business on operations that are essential to life, providing
minimal support for our healthcare, life sciences, food and beverage and certain water businesses. We may further
narrow our presence in Russia depending on developments in the conflict or otherwise. Our Russian operations
represented approximately 1% for both our 2022 and 2021 annual sales. During 2022 we recorded pre-tax charges of
$13.1 million related to recoverability risk of certain assets in both Russia and Ukraine. Depending on developments,
we may incur further charges relating to our Russia and Ukraine businesses. The conflict in Ukraine may escalate
and/or expand in scope and the broader consequences of this conflict, which have included and/or may in the future
include sanctions, embargoes, regional instability and geopolitical shifts; potential retaliatory action by the Russian
government against companies, including us, such as nationalization of foreign businesses in Russia; and increased
tensions between the United States and countries in which we operate cannot be predicted, nor can we predict the
conflict’s impact on the global economy and on our business and financial results. The Russia and Ukraine conflict
may also heighten many other risks disclosed in our report on Form 10-K, any of which could
Table of Contents
18materially and adversely affect our business and financial results. Such risks include, but are not limited to, adverse
effects on macroeconomic conditions, including increased inflation, constraints on the availability of commodities,
supply chain disruption and decreased business spending; disruptions to our or our business partners’ global
technology infrastructure, including through cyber-attack or cyber-intrusion; adverse changes in international trade
policies and relations; claims, litigation and regulatory enforcement; our ability to implement and execute our business
strategy; terrorist activities; our exposure to foreign currency fluctuations; reputational risk; and constraints, volatility, or
disruption in the capital markets.
Additionally, changes in U.S. or foreign government policy on international trade, including the imposition or
continuation of tariffs, could materially and adversely affect our business. In 2018, the U.S. imposed tariffs on certain
imports from China and other countries, resulting in retaliatory tariffs by China and other countries. While the U.S. and
China signed a Phase One trade agreement in January 2020, which included the suspension and rollback of tariffs,
the CHIPS and Science Act of 2022 with objectives including countering China’s technical ambitions was signed into
law in August 2022. Any new tariffs or policies imposed by the U.S., China or other countries or any additional
retaliatory measures by any of these countries, could increase our costs, reduce our sales and earnings or otherwise
have an adverse effect on our operations.
Further, our operations outside the United States require us to comply with a number of United States and non-U.S.
laws and regulations, including anti-corruption laws such as the United States Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and the
United Kingdom Bribery Act, as well as U.S. and non-U.S. economic sanctions regulations. We have internal policies
and procedures relating to such laws and regulations; however, there is risk that such policies and procedures will not
always protect us from the misconduct or reckless acts of employees or representatives, particularly in the case of
recently acquired operations that may not have significant training in applicable compliance policies and procedures.
Violations of such laws and regulations could result in disruptive investigations, significant fines and sanctions, which
could have a material adverse effect on our consolidated results of operations, financial position or cash flows.
Also, because of uncertainties regarding the interpretation and application of laws and regulations and the
enforceability of intellectual property and contract rights, we face risks in some countries that our intellectual property
rights and contract rights would not be enforced by local governments. We are also periodically faced with the risk of
economic uncertainty, which has impacted our business in some countries. Other risks in international business also
include difficulties in staffing and managing local operations, including managing credit risk to local customers and
distributors.
Our overall success as a global business depends, in part, upon our ability to succeed in differing economic, social,
legal and political conditions. We may not continue to succeed in developing and implementing policies and strategies
that are effective in each location where we do business, which could have a material adverse effect on our
consolidated results of operations, financial position or cash flows.
Our results could be materially and adversely affected by difficulties in securing the supply of certain raw
materials or by fluctuations in the cost of raw materials.
The prices of raw materials used in our business fluctuate, and in recent years we have experienced periods of
significant increased raw material costs. Changes in raw material prices, unavailability of adequate and reasonably
priced raw materials or substitutes for those raw materials, or the inability to obtain or renew supply agreements on
favorable terms has materially and adversely affected our business and can in the future materially and adversely
affect our consolidated results of operations, financial position or cash flows. In addition, volatility and disruption in
economic activity and conditions could disrupt or delay the performance of our suppliers and thus impact our ability to
obtain raw materials at favorable prices or on favorable terms, which may materially and adversely affect our business.
We depend on key personnel to lead our business; the labor market is very dynamic.
Our continued success will largely depend on our ability to attract, retain and develop a high caliber of talent and on
the efforts and abilities of our executive officers and certain other key employees, particularly those with sales and
sales management responsibilities to drive business growth, development and profitability. As we continue to grow our
business, make acquisitions, expand our geographic scope and offer new products and services, we need the
organizational talent necessary to ensure effective succession for executive officer and key employee roles in order to
meet the growth, development and profitability goals of our business. Our operations could be materially and
adversely affected if for any reason we were unable to attract, retain or develop such officers or key employees and
successfully execute organizational change and management transitions at leadership levels. More generally, in the
wake of the COVID-19 pandemic, expectations from qualified talent in many areas of the labor market have evolved.
In light of this, if we are unable to attract and retain employees on terms and conditions that are consistent with our
historical operating model, our business could be disrupted or our costs could increase, which may materially and
adversely affect our business
We are subject to information technology system failures, network disruptions and breaches in data security.
We rely to a large extent upon information technology systems and infrastructure to operate our business. The size
and complexity of our information technology systems and those of strategic vendors make them vulnerable to failure,
malicious intrusion and random attack. Acquisitions have resulted in further de-centralization of systems and additional
complexity in our systems infrastructure. Likewise, data security breaches by employees or others with permitted
access to our systems or to the systems of strategic vendors pose a risk that sensitive data may be exposed to
unauthorized persons or to the public. Geopolitical tensions or conflicts, such as Russia’s invasion of Ukraine, may
further heighten the risk of cybersecurity attacks. While we have invested in protection of data and information
technology, we have experienced immaterial cybersecurity attacks and incidents, and there can be no assurance that
our efforts will prevent failures, cybersecurity attacks or breaches in our systems or in the systems of strategic vendors
that could cause reputational damage, business
Table of Contents
disruption or legal and regulatory costs; could result in third-party claims; could result in compromise or
misappropriation of our intellectual property, trade secrets or sensitive information; or could otherwise adversely affect
our business. Certain of our customer offerings include digital components, such as remote monitoring of certain
customer operations. A breach of those remote monitoring systems could expose customer data giving rise to potential
third-party claims and reputational damage. There may be other related challenges and risks as we complete
implementation of our ERP system upgrade.
The COVID-19 pandemic and measures taken in response thereto have materially and adversely impacted,
and we expect may continue to materially and adversely impact, our business and results of operations, and
the full impact of the pandemic will depend on future developments, which are highly uncertain and cannot be
predicted.
Beginning in March 2020, the COVID-19 pandemic had a rapid and significant negative impact on the global economy,
including a significant downturn in the foodservice, hospitality and travel industries. Measures taken to alleviate the
pandemic (such as stay-at-home orders and other responsive measures) significantly impacted our restaurant and
hospitality customers and negatively affected demand for our products and services in these segments, resulting in a
material adverse effect on our business and results of operations. There is continued uncertainty regarding the
duration, scope and severity of the pandemic, particularly with the emergence of new variants of COVID-19 and
periodic spikes in COVID-19 cases in various geographic regions, and the impacts on our business and the global
economy from the effects of the pandemic and response measures. Travel and logistics restrictions, lockdowns,
vaccine requirements and other measures from time to time implemented by foreign and domestic authorities have
resulted in, and may continue to result in, supply chain and transportation disruptions, production delays and capacity
limitations at Ecolab and some of its customers and suppliers, as well as reduced workforce availability or productivity
at Ecolab and customer sites, and additional data, information and cyber security risks associated with an extensive
workforce working remotely.
The degree to which the pandemic ultimately impacts our business, financial condition and results of operations and
the global economy will depend on future developments beyond our control, which are highly uncertain and difficult to
predict, including the severity, duration and any resurgence of the pandemic, the extent, duration and effectiveness of
periodic lockdowns and other containment actions, the availability, public adoption and efficacy of COVID vaccines,
how quickly and to what extent normal economic and operating activity can resume, and the severity and duration of
resulting global economic volatility.
Besides the COVID-19 pandemic, the United States and other countries have experienced, and may experience in the
future, public health outbreaks such as Zika virus, Avian Flu, SARS and H1N1 influenza. A prolonged occurrence of a
contagious disease such as these could result in a significant downturn in the foodservice, hospitality and travel
industries and also may result in health or other government authorities imposing restrictions on travel further
impacting our end markets. Any of these events could result in a significant drop in demand for some of our products
and services and materially and adversely affect our business.
Strategic Risks
If we are unsuccessful in integrating acquisitions, including Purolite, our business could be materially and
adversely affected.
In December 2021 we acquired Purolite, which operates in the highly regulated life sciences, pharma and biopharma
industries and has extensive international operations which complicate integration execution. If we have difficulty
integrating Purolite operations or lose key employees or customers, our business could be materially and adversely
affected. Additionally, as part of our long-term strategy, we seek to acquire complementary businesses. There can be
no assurance that we will find attractive acquisition candidates or succeed at effectively managing the integration of
acquired businesses into existing businesses. If the underlying business performance of such acquired businesses
deteriorates, the expected synergies from such transactions do not materialize or we fail to successfully integrate new
businesses into our existing businesses, our consolidated results of operations, financial position or cash flows could
be materially and adversely affected.
If we are unsuccessful in executing on key business initiatives, including restructurings and our Enterprise
Resource Planning (“ERP”) system upgrades, our business could be materially and adversely affected.
We continue to execute key business initiatives, including restructurings and investments to develop business
systems, as part of our ongoing efforts to improve our efficiency and returns. In particular, we are undertaking the three
restructuring plans, i.e. the Europe Program, the Institutional Advancement Program and Accelerate 2020 plan to
simplify and automate processes and tasks, reduce complexity and management layers, consolidate facilities and
focus on key long term growth areas by leveraging technology and structural improvements as discussed under Note
3 entitled “Special (Gains) and Charges” of this Form 10-K. Additionally, we are continuing implementation of our ERP
system upgrades, which are expected to continue in phases over the next several years. These upgrades, which
include sales, supply chain and certain finance functions, are expected to improve the efficiency of certain financial
and related transactional processes. These upgrades involve complex business process design and a failure of certain
of these processes could result in business disruption. If the projects in which we are investing or the initiatives which
we are pursuing are not successfully executed, our consolidated results of operations, financial position or cash flows
could materially and adversely be affected.
Our growth depends upon our ability to compete successfully with respect to value, innovation and customer
support.
We have numerous global, national, regional and local competitors. Our ability to compete depends in part on
providing high quality and high value-added products, technology and service. We must also continue to identify,
develop and commercialize innovative, profitable and high value-added products for niche applications and
commercial digital applications. We have made significant investments in commercial digital product offerings, and our
culture and expertise must continue to evolve to develop, support and profitably deploy commercial digital offerings,
which are becoming an increasingly important part of our business. There can be no assurance that we will
19
Table of Contents
20be able to accomplish our technology development goals or that technological developments by our competitors will
not place certain of our products, technology or services at a competitive disadvantage in the future. In addition,
certain of the new products that we have under development will be offered in markets in which we do not currently
compete, and there can be no assurance that we will be able to compete successfully in those new markets. If we fail
to introduce new technologies or commercialize our digital offerings on a timely and profitable basis, we may lose
market share and our consolidated results of operations, financial position or cash flows could be materially and
adversely affected.
Consolidation of our customers and vendors could materially and adversely affect our results.
Customers and vendors in the foodservice, hospitality, travel, healthcare, energy, life sciences, food processing and
pulp and paper industries, as well as other industries we serve, have consolidated in recent years and that trend may
continue. This consolidation could have a material adverse impact on our ability to retain customers and on our pricing,
margins and consolidated results of operations.
We enter into multi-year contracts with customers that could impact our results.
Our multi-year contracts with some of our customers include terms affecting our pricing flexibility. There can be no
assurance that these restraints will not have a material adverse impact on our margins and consolidated results of
operations.
Legal, Regulatory & Compliance Risks
Our business depends on our ability to comply with laws and governmental regulations and meet our
contractual commitments and failure to do so could materially and adversely impact our business; and we
may be materially and adversely affected by changes in laws and regulations.
Our business is subject to numerous laws and regulations relating to the environment, including evolving climate
change standards, and to the manufacture, storage, distribution, sale and use of our products as well as to the
conduct of our business generally, including employment and labor laws and anti-corruption laws. Furthermore,
increasing public and governmental awareness and concern regarding the effects of climate change has led to
significant legislative and regulatory efforts to limit greenhouse gas emissions and will likely result in further
environmental and climate change laws and regulations. Compliance with these laws and regulations exposes us to
potential financial liability and increases our operating costs. A violation of these laws and regulations could expose us
to financial liability that may have a material adverse effect on our results of operations and cash flows. Regulation of
our products and operations continues to increase with more stringent standards, causing increased costs of
operations and potential for liability if a violation occurs. The potential cost to us relating to environmental and product
registration laws and regulations is uncertain due to factors such as the unknown magnitude and type of possible
contamination and clean-up costs, the complexity and evolving nature of laws and regulations, and the timing and
expense of compliance. Changes to current laws (including tax laws), regulations and policies could impose new
restrictions, costs or prohibitions on our current practices which would have a material adverse effect on our
consolidated results of operations, financial position or cash flows. Changes to labor and employment laws and
regulations, as well as related rulings by courts and administrative bodies, could materially and adversely affect our
operations and expose us to potential financial liability.
Defense of litigation, particularly certain types of actions such as antitrust, patent infringement, personal injury, product
liability, breach of contract, wage hour and class action lawsuits, can be costly and time consuming even if ultimately
successful, and if not successful could have a material adverse effect on our consolidated results of operations,
financial position or cash flows.
A chemical spill or release could materially and adversely impact our business.
As a manufacturer and supplier of chemical products, there is a potential for chemicals to be accidentally spilled,
released or discharged, either in liquid or gaseous form, during production, transportation, storage or use. Such a
release could result in environmental contamination as well as a human or animal health hazard. Accordingly, such a
release could have a material adverse effect on our consolidated results of operations, financial position or cash flows.
Potential indemnification liabilities pursuant to the separation and split-off of our Upstream Energy business
could materially and adversely affect our business and financial statements.
With respect to the separation and subsequent split-off of our Upstream Energy business, we entered into a separation
and distribution agreement with ChampionX Holding Inc. and ChampionX Corporation (f/k/a Apergy Corporation and
taken together with ChampionX Holding Inc., “ChampionX”) as well as certain other agreements to govern the
separation and related transactions and our relationship with ChampionX going forward. These agreements provide for
specific indemnity and certain other obligations of each party and could lead to disputes between ChampionX and us.
If we are required to indemnify ChampionX under the circumstances set forth in these agreements, we may be subject
to substantial related liabilities. In addition, with respect to the liabilities for which ChampionX has agreed to indemnify
us under these agreements, there can be no assurance that the indemnity rights we have against ChampionX will be
sufficient to protect us against the full amount of such liabilities, or that ChampionX will be able to fully satisfy its
indemnification obligations. Each of these risks could negatively affect our business and our consolidated results of
operations, financial position or cash flows could be materially and adversely affected.
Table of Contents
21Extraordinary events may significantly impact our business.
The occurrence of (a) litigation or claims, (b) the loss or insolvency of a major customer or distributor, (c) repeated or
prolonged federal government shutdowns or similar events, (d) war (including acts of terrorism or hostilities which
impact our markets), (e) natural or manmade disasters, (f) water shortages or (g) severe weather conditions affecting
our operations or the energy, foodservice, hospitality and travel industries may have a material adverse effect on our
business.
While we have a diverse customer base and no customer or distributor constitutes 10 percent or more of our
consolidated revenues, we do have customers and independent, third-party distributors, the loss of which could have a
material adverse effect on our consolidated results of operations or cash flows for the affected earnings periods.
Government shutdowns can have a material adverse effect on our consolidated results of operations or cash flows by
disrupting or delaying new product launches, renewals of registrations for existing products and receipt of import or
export licenses for raw materials or products.
War (including acts of terrorism or hostilities), natural or manmade disasters, water shortages or severe weather
conditions, including the effects of climate change, affecting the energy, foodservice, hospitality, travel, health care,
food processing, pulp and paper, mining, steel and other industries can cause a downturn in the business of our
customers, which in turn can have a material adverse effect on our consolidated results of operations, financial
position or cash flows. In particular, the U.S. Gulf Coast is a region with significant refining, petrochemicals and
chemicals operations which provide us raw materials, as well as being an important customer base for our
Downstream and Water operating segments. Hurricanes or other severe weather events impacting the Gulf Coast,
such as the winter freeze in Texas and the Gulf Coast in February 2021, can materially and adversely affect our ability
to obtain raw materials at reasonable cost, or at all, and could adversely affect our business with our customers in the
region.
Our commitments, goals, targets, objectives and initiatives related to sustainability, and our public statements
and disclosures regarding them, expose us to numerous risks.
We have developed, and will continue to establish, goals, targets, and other objectives related to sustainability
matters, including our sustainability goals in alignment with the United Nations Global Compact’s Business Ambition
for 1.5 ⁰ C and our commitments to science-based targets addressing Scope 1, 2 and 3 GHG emissions, discussed in
Item 1 of Part I of this Form 10-K, entitled “Business.” Achieving these goals and commitments will require evolving our
business, capital investment and the development of technology that might not currently exist. We might incur
additional expense or be required to recognize impairment charges in connection with our efforts. These commitments,
goals, targets and other objectives reflect our current plans and there is no guarantee that they will be achieved. Our
efforts to research, establish, accomplish, and accurately report on these commitments, goals, targets, and objectives
expose us to operational, reputational, financial, legal, and other risks. Our ability to achieve any stated commitment,
goal, target, or objective is subject to factors and conditions, many of which are outside of our control, including the
pace of changes in technology, the availability of requisite financing, and the availability of suppliers that can meet our
sustainability and other standards.
Our business may face increased scrutiny from the investment community, other stakeholders, regulators, and the
media related to our sustainability activities, including our commitments, goals, targets, and objectives, and our
methodologies and timelines for pursuing them. If our sustainability practices do not meet investor or other stakeholder
expectations and standards, which continue to evolve, our reputation, our ability to attract or retain employees, and our
attractiveness as an investment, business partner, or as an acquiror could be negatively impacted. Similarly, our failure
or perceived failure to pursue or fulfill our commitments, goals, targets, and objectives, to comply with ethical,
environmental, or other standards, regulations, or expectations, or to satisfy reporting standards with respect to these
matters, within the timelines we announce, or at all, could have operational, reputational, financial and legal impacts.
Financial Risks
If the separation and split-off of our Upstream Energy business or certain internal transactions undertaken in
anticipation of the divestiture are determined to be taxable in whole or in part, we and our stockholders may
incur significant tax liabilities.
In connection with the separation and split-off of our Upstream Energy business that was consummated on June 3,
2020, we obtained opinions of outside tax counsel that the related merger and exchange offer will qualify as tax-
free transactions to us and our stockholders, except to the extent that cash was paid to Ecolab stockholders in lieu of
fractional shares. We have not sought or obtained a ruling from the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) on the tax
consequences of these transactions. An opinion of counsel is not binding on the IRS or the courts, which may disagree
with the opinion. Even if the merger and exchange offer otherwise qualified as tax-free transactions, they may become
taxable to us if certain events occur that affect either Ecolab or ChampionX Corporation. While ChampionX
Corporation has agreed not to take certain actions that could cause the transactions not to qualify as tax-
free transactions and is generally obligated to indemnify us against any tax consequences if it breaches this
agreement, the potential tax liabilities could have a material adverse effect on us if we were not entitled to
indemnification or if the indemnification obligations were not fulfilled. If the merger or exchange offer were determined
to be taxable, we could be subject to a substantial tax liability, and each U.S. holder of our common stock who
participated in the exchange offer could be treated as exchanging the Ecolab shares surrendered for ChampionX
Corporation shares in a taxable transaction.
Table of Contents
22Changes in tax laws and unanticipated tax liabilities could materially and adversely affect the taxes we pay
and our profitability.
We are subject to income and other taxes in the United States and foreign jurisdictions, and our operations, plans and
results are affected by tax and other initiatives around the world. In particular, we are affected by the impact of
changes to tax laws or related authoritative interpretations in the United States, such as the Inflation Reduction Act
(IRA) signed into law on August 16, 2022, which includes a corporate alternative minimum tax on certain large
corporations, incentives to address climate change mitigation and other non-income tax provisions, including an excise
tax on the repurchase of corporate stock. We are also subject to changes in tax law outside the United States and
actions taken with respect to tax-related matters by associations such as the Organization for Economic Co-operation
and Development (“OECD”), which represents a coalition of member countries, and the European Commission which
influence tax policies in countries where we operate. For example, approximately 140 countries have agreed to the
OECD’s two-pillar base erosion and profit shifting project (“BEPS”). This framework, which could be implemented in
some countries as early as 2023, is focused on a number of issues, including shifting taxing rights on income from
residence countries to source countries and establishing a minimum 15% global tax rate. Some of the BEPS and
related proposals, if enacted into law in the United States and in the foreign countries where we do business, could
increase the burden and costs of our tax compliance, the amount of taxes we incur in those jurisdictions and our global
effective tax rate. In addition, we are impacted by settlements of pending or any future adjustments proposed by the
IRS or other taxing authorities in connection with our tax audits, all of which will depend on their timing, nature and
scope. Increases in income tax rates, changes in income tax laws or unfavorable resolution of tax matters could have
a material adverse impact on our financial results.
Future events may impact our deferred tax position, including the utilization of foreign tax credits and
undistributed earnings of international affiliates that are considered to be reinvested indefinitely.
We evaluate the recoverability of deferred tax assets and the need for deferred tax liabilities based on available
evidence. This process involves significant management judgment about assumptions that are subject to change from
period to period based on changes in tax laws or variances between future projected operating performance and
actual results. We are required to establish a valuation allowance for deferred tax assets if we determine, based on
available evidence at the time the determination is made, that it is more likely than not that some portion or all of the
deferred tax assets will not be realized. In making this determination, we evaluate all positive and negative evidence
as of the end of each reporting period. Future adjustments (either increases or decreases), to the deferred tax asset
valuation allowance are determined based upon changes in the expected realization of the net deferred tax assets.
The realization of the deferred tax assets ultimately depends on the existence of sufficient taxable income in either the
carry-back or carry-forward periods under the tax law. Due to significant estimates used to establish the valuation
allowance and the potential for changes in facts and circumstances, it is reasonably possible that we will be required
to record adjustments to the valuation allowance in future reporting periods. Changes to the valuation allowance or the
amount of deferred tax liabilities could have a material adverse effect on our consolidated results of operations or
financial position. Further, should we change our assertion regarding the permanent reinvestment of the undistributed
earnings of international affiliates, a deferred tax liability may need to be established.
Our indebtedness may limit our operations and our use of our cash flow, and any failure to comply with the
covenants that apply to our indebtedness could materially and adversely affect our liquidity and financial
statements.
As of December 31, 2022, we had approximately $8.6 billion in outstanding indebtedness, with approximately $1.5
billion in the form of floating rate debt. Our debt level and related debt service obligations may have negative
consequences, including:
● requiring us to dedicate significant cash flow from operations to the payment of principal and interest on our
debt, which reduces the funds we have available for other purposes such as acquisitions and capital
investment;
● reducing our flexibility in planning for or reacting to changes in our business and market conditions;
● exposing us to interest rate risk since a portion of our debt obligations are at variable rates. For example, a
one percentage point increase in the average interest rate on our floating rate debt at December 31, 2022
would increase future interest expense by approximately $15 million per year; and
● increasing our cost of funds and materially and adversely affecting our liquidity and access to the capital
markets should we fail to maintain the credit ratings assigned to us by independent rating agencies.
If we add new debt, the risks described above could increase.
We incur significant expenses related to the amortization of intangible assets and may be required to report
losses resulting from the impairment of goodwill or other assets recorded in connection with the Nalco and
Purolite transactions and other acquisitions.
We expect to continue to complete selected acquisitions and joint venture transactions in the future. In connection with
acquisition and joint venture transactions, applicable accounting rules generally require the tangible and intangible
assets of the acquired business to be recorded on the balance sheet of the acquiring company at their fair values.
Intangible assets other than goodwill are required to be amortized over their estimated useful lives and this expense
may be significant. Any excess in the purchase price paid by the acquiring company over the fair value of tangible and
intangible assets of the acquired business is recorded as goodwill. If it is later determined that the anticipated future
cash flows from the acquired business may be less than the carrying values of the assets and goodwill of the acquired
business, the assets or goodwill may be deemed to be impaired. In this case, the acquiring company may be required
under applicable accounting rules to write down the value of the assets or goodwill on its balance sheet to reflect the
extent of the impairment. This write-down of assets or goodwill is generally recognized as a non-cash expense in the
statement of operations of the acquiring company for the accounting period during which the write down occurs. As of
December 31, 2022, we had goodwill of $8.0 billion which
Table of Contents
is maintained in various reporting units, including goodwill from the Nalco and Purolite transactions. If we determine
that any of the assets or goodwill recorded in connection with the Nalco transaction or any other prior or future
acquisitions or joint venture transactions have become impaired, we will be required to record a loss resulting from the
impairment. Impairment losses could be significant and could have a material adverse effect on our consolidated
results of operations and financial position.
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments.
We have no unresolved comments from the staff of the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Item 2. Properties.
Our manufacturing philosophy is to manufacture products wherever an economic, process or quality assurance
advantage exists or where proprietary manufacturing techniques dictate in-house production. Currently, most products
that we sell are manufactured at our facilities. We position our manufacturing locations and warehouses in a manner to
permit ready access to our customers.
Our manufacturing facilities produce chemical products as well as medical devices and equipment for all of our
operating segments, although Pest Elimination purchases the majority of their products and equipment from outside
suppliers. Our chemical production process consists of blending purchased raw materials into finished products in
powder, liquid, and solid form. Additionally, intermediates from reaction chemistries are used in some of the blends and
are also packaged directly into finished goods. Our devices and equipment manufacturing operations consist of
producing chemical product dispensers and injectors and other mechanical equipment, medical devices, dishwasher
racks, related sundries, dish machine refurbishment and water monitoring and maintenance equipment system from
purchased components and subassemblies.
The following table profiles our more significant physical properties with approximately 70,000 square feet or more with
ongoing production activities, as well as certain other facilities important in terms of specialization and sources of
supply. In general, manufacturing facilities located in the United States serve our U.S. markets and facilities located
outside of the United States serve our international markets. However, most of the United States facilities do
manufacture products for export.
PLANT PROFILES
Joliet, IL USA
 610,000
 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life
Sciences Owned
Asheville, NC USA 478,000 Global Industrial, Global Healthcare &
Life SciencesLeased
Tai Cang, CHINA
 468,000
 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life
Sciences Owned
Hongzhou, CHINA 430,125 Global Healthcare & Life Sciences Owned
Sainghin, FRANCE
 360,000
 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life
Sciences Owned
Mandras, GREECE 355,435 Global Industrial, Global Healthcare &
Life SciencesOwned
Victoria, ROMANIA 343,605 Global Healthcare & Life Sciences Owned
South Beloit, IL USA
 313,000
 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life
Sciences, Other Owned
Jianghai, CHINA  296,000 Global Industrial  Owned
Chalons, FRANCE 280,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Owned
Clearing, IL USA 270,000 Global Industrial, Global Healthcare &
Life Sciences, Other (Colloidal) Owned
Nanjing, CHINA  240,000 Global Industrial  Owned
Garland, TX USA 239,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Owned
Philadelphia, PA USA 232,000 Global Healthcare & Life Sciences Owned
Martinsburg, WV USA 228,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Owned
Elwood City, PA USA  222,000 Global Industrial  Owned
Weavergate, UNITED
KINGDOM 222,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Owned
Celra, SPAIN  218,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life OwnedLocationApproxim
ate Size
(Sq. Ft.) Segment 
 
 
 Majority
Owned
or
Leased
23Sciences
Greensboro, NC USA 193,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Healthcare & Life Sciences Owned
Table of Contents
Fresno, TX USA  192,000 Global Industrial  Owned
Santiago, CHILE 188,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life
SciencesOwned
Las Americas, DOMINICAN
REPUBLIC 182,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Healthcare & Life Sciences Owned
Jacksonville, FL USA  181,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Healthcare & Life Sciences Leased
Garyville, LA USA  178,000 Global Industrial  Owned
Gul Lane, SINGAPORE 169,000 Global Industrial  Owned
Nieuwegein, NETHERLANDS  168,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Owned
La Romana, DOMINICAN
REPUBLIC 160,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Healthcare & Life Sciences Leased
Middleton, UNITED KINGDOM 157,575 Global Industrial, Global Healthcare &
Life SciencesOwned
Tessenderlo, BELGIUM  153,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Owned
Cheltenham, AUSTRALIA  145,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Owned
Suzano, BRAZIL  142,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life
Sciences Owned
McDonough, GA USA  141,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Owned
Darra, AUSTRALIA  138,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Owned
Burlington, ON CANADA  136,000 Global Industrial  Owned
Eagan, MN USA  133,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life
Sciences, Other Owned
Huntington, IN USA  127,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life
Sciences Owned
Rozzano, ITALY  126,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Owned
City of Industry, CA USA  125,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life
Sciences Owned
Mississauga, ON CANADA  120,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Leased
Elk Grove Village, IL USA  115,000 Global Institutional & Specialty  Leased
Biebesheim, GERMANY  109,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life
Sciences Owned
Fort Worth, TX USA  101,000 Global Institutional & Specialty  Leased
Johannesburg, SOUTH AFRICA  100,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life
Sciences Owned
Andover, UNITED KINGDOM 99,762 Global Industrial, Global Healthcare &
Life SciencesOwned
Pilar, ARGENTINA 96,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
IndustrialOwned
Hamilton, NEW ZEALAND  96,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Owned
Konnagar, INDIA 88,000 Global Industrial  Owned
Kwinana, AUSTRALIA  87,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Owned
Yangsan, KOREA  85,000 Global Industrial  Owned
Cuautitlan, MEXICO  76,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life
Sciences Owned
Barueri, BRAZIL  75,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life LeasedLocationApproxim
ate Size
(Sq. Ft.) Segment 
 
 
 Majority
Owned
or
Leased
24Sciences
Citereup, INDONESIA 74,000 Global Industrial Owned
King of Prussia, PA 74,000 Global Healthcare & Life Sciences Owned
Mullingar, IRELAND  74,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Leased
Mosta, MALTA  73,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Healthcare & Life Sciences Leased
Aubagne, FRANCE  65,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Healthcare & Life Sciences Leased
Siegsdorf, GERMANY  56,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life
Sciences Owned
Table of Contents
25Verona, ITALY  55,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Healthcare & Life Sciences Owned
Guangzhou, CHINA  55,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Owned
Navanakorn, THAILAND  53,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Leased
Lerma, MEXICO  49,000 Global Industrial  Owned
Maribor, SLOVENIA  46,400 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial Owned
Leeds, UNITED KINGDOM  25,000 Global Institutional & Specialty  Owned
Baglan, UNITED KINGDOM  24,400 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Healthcare & Life Sciences Leased
Noda, JAPAN  22,000 Global Institutional & Specialty, Global
Industrial, Global Healthcare & Life
Sciences Owned
Generally, our manufacturing facilities are adequate to meet our existing in-house production needs. We continue to
invest in our plant sites to maintain viable operations and to add capacity as necessary to meet business imperatives.
Most of our manufacturing plants also serve as distribution centers. In addition, we operate distribution centers around
the world, most of which are leased, and utilize third party logistics service providers to facilitate the distribution of our
products and services.
Our corporate headquarters is comprised of a 17-story building that we own in St. Paul, Minnesota. We also own a
115-acre campus in Eagan, Minnesota that houses a significant research and development center, a data center and
training facilities as well as several of our administrative functions. We also have a significant business presence in
Naperville, Illinois, where our Water and Paper operating segments maintain their principal administrative offices and
research center, as well as in Greensboro, North Carolina, where our Specialty operating segment maintains its
principal administrative offices and a research center. Our Downstream operating segment leases administrative and
research facilities in Sugar Land, Texas and maintains additional Company-owned research facilities in Fresno, Texas.
Significant regional administrative and/or research facilities are located in Campinas, Brazil; Leiden, Netherlands; and
Pune, India, which we own, and in Dubai, UAE; Monheim, Germany; Singapore; Shanghai, China; and Zurich,
Switzerland, which we lease. We also have a network of small leased sales offices in the United States and, to a
lesser extent, in other parts of the world.
Item 3. Legal Proceedings.
Discussion of legal proceedings is incorporated by reference from Part II, Item 8, Note 16, “Commitments and
Contingencies,” of this Form 10-K and should be considered an integral part of Part I, Item 3, “Legal Proceedings.”
Discussion of other environmental-related legal proceedings is incorporated by reference from Part I, Item 1 above,
under the heading “Environmental and Regulatory Considerations.”
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures.
Not applicable.LocationApproxim
ate Size
(Sq. Ft.) Segment 
 
 
 Majority
Owned
or
Leased
Table of Contents
26PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer
Purchases of Equity Securities.
Market Information
Our common stock is listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol “ECL.” Our common stock is also
traded on an unlisted basis on certain other United States exchanges.
Holders
On January 31, 2023, we had 5,031 holders of record of our Common Stock.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
Total number of sharesMaximum number of 
purchased as part ofshares that may yet be 
Total number of Average price paid publicly announced purchased under the 
Period shares purchased (1) per share (2) plans or programs (3)plans or programs (3) 
October 1-31,
2022   1,362  $157.0872  -  3,404,297
November 1-30,
2022   487,200  147.8301  487,200  12,917,097
December 1-31,
2022   3,723  149.8621  -  12,917,097
Total   492,285  $147.8711  487,200  12,917,097
(1)Includes 5,085 shares reacquired from employees and/or directors to satisfy the exercise price of stock options or
shares surrendered to satisfy statutory tax obligations under our stock incentive plans.
(2)The average price paid per share includes brokerage commissions associated with publicly announced plan
purchases plus the value of such other reacquired shares.
(3)As announced on February 24, 2015, our Board of Directors authorized the repurchase of up to 20,000,000
common shares. As announced on November 3, 2022, our Board of Directors authorized the repurchase of up to
an additional 10,000,000 shares. Subject to market conditions, we expect to repurchase all shares under these
authorizations, for which no expiration date has been established, in open market or privately negotiated
transactions, including pursuant to Rule 10b5-1 and accelerated share repurchase program.
Item 6. [Reserved].
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations.
The following management discussion and analysis (“MD&A”) provides information that we believe is useful in
understanding our operating results, cash flows and financial condition. We provide quantitative information about the
material sales drivers including the impact of changes in volume and pricing and the effect of acquisitions and changes
in foreign currency at the corporate and reportable segment level. We also provide quantitative information regarding
special (gains) and charges, discrete tax items and other significant factors we believe are useful for understanding
our results. Such quantitative drivers are supported by comments meant to be qualitative in nature. Qualitative factors
are generally ordered based on estimated significance.
The discussion should be read in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements and related notes included in
this Form 10-K. Our consolidated financial statements are prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP. This discussion
contains various Non-GAAP Financial Measures and also contains various forward-looking statements within the
meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. We refer readers to the statements and information
set forth in the sections entitled “Non-GAAP Financial Measures” at the end of this MD&A, and “Forward-Looking
Statements” and “Risk Factors” within Items 1 and 1A of this Form 10-K. We also refer readers to the tables within the
section entitled “Results of Operations” of this MD&A for reconciliation information of Non-GAAP measures to U.S.
GAAP.
Table of Contents
27Comparability of Results
Purolite acquisition
In December 2021, we acquired Purolite for total consideration of $3.7 billion in cash, net of cash acquired. Purolite is
a leading and fast-growing global provider of high-end ion exchange resins for the separation and purification of
solutions for pharmaceutical and industrial applications. Headquartered in King of Prussia, Pennsylvania, Purolite
operates in more than 30 countries. Purolite is reported within our Life Sciences operating segment. Acquisition and
integration charges are recorded within special (gains) and charges. The 2021 impacts of the Purolite acquisition
including operating results, acquisition-related amortization and interest expense related to the transaction were also
excluded from 2021 adjusted results.
ChampionX Transaction
In June 2020, we completed the previously announced separation of our Upstream Energy business (the “ChampionX
business”) in a Reverse Morris Trust transaction (the “Transaction”) through the split-off of ChampionX Holding Inc.
(“ChampionX”), formed by Ecolab as a wholly owned subsidiary to hold the ChampionX Business, followed
immediately by the merger of ChampionX (the “Merger”) with a wholly owned subsidiary of ChampionX Corporation
(f/k/a Apergy Corporation, “Apergy”).
The ChampionX business met the criteria to be reported as discontinued operations because the separation of
ChampionX was a strategic shift in business that had a major effect on our operations and financial results. Therefore,
we reported the historical results of ChampionX, including the results of operations, cash flows, and related assets and
liabilities, as discontinued operations for 2020. Unless otherwise noted, the accompanying MD&A has been revised to
reflect the ChampionX business as discontinued operations and 2020 balances have been revised accordingly to
reflect continuing operations only.
Comparability of Reportable Segments
We have also made immaterial changes to our segment reporting, including the movement of certain customers and
cost allocations between reportable segments.
Impact of Acquisitions and Divestitures
Acquisition adjusted growth rates exclude the results of our acquired businesses from the first twelve months post
acquisition, the results of our divested businesses from the twelve months prior to divestiture. Further, we have
excluded the results of our Purolite business for all of 2022 to remain comparable to 2021 when Purolite’s results were
excluded from adjusted results. As part of the separation of the ChampionX business, we also entered into a Master
Cross Supply and Product Transfer agreement with ChampionX to provide, receive or transfer certain products for a
period up to 36 months. Sales of product to ChampionX under this agreement are recorded in product and equipment
sales in the Corporate segment along with the related cost of sales. These transactions are removed from the
consolidated results as part of the calculation of the impact of acquisitions and divestitures.
Fixed Currency Foreign Exchange Rates
Management evaluates the sales and operating income performance of our non-U.S. dollar functional currency
international operations based on fixed currency exchange rates, which eliminate the impact of exchange rate
fluctuations on our international operations. Fixed currency amounts are updated annually at the beginning of each
year based on translation into U.S. dollars at foreign currency exchange rates established by management, with all
periods presented using such rates. Public currency rate data provided within the “Segment Performance” section of
this MD&A reflect amounts translated at actual public average rates of exchange prevailing during the corresponding
period and is provided for informational purposes only.
Table of Contents
28EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
In 2022, we delivered double-digit sales growth as we accelerated our pricing and drove volume growth. Our strong
pricing increases offset continued significant delivered product cost increases on a dollar basis. Our team generated
double-digit sales growth in the Institutional & Specialty, Industrial and Other segments while Healthcare & Life
Sciences segment sales were stable. Operating income was stable, as accelerating pricing was offset by higher
delivered product costs and investments in the business.
Sales
Reported sales increased 11% to $14.2 billion in 2022 from $12.7 billion in 2021. When measured in fixed rates of
foreign currency exchange, fixed currency sales increased 16% compared to the prior year. Acquisition adjusted fixed
currency sales increased 13% compared to the prior year.
Gross Margin
Our reported gross margin was 37.8% of sales for 2022, compared to our 2021 reported gross margin of 40.2%.
Excluding the impact of special (gains) and charges and the 2021 impacts from the Purolite transaction included in
cost of sales, our adjusted gross margin was 38.2% in 2022 and 40.9% in 2021. Our gross profit increased as our
strong pricing exceeded substantial delivered product cost inflation.
Operating Income
Reported operating income remained stable at $1.6 billion in 2022, compared to $1.6 billion in 2021. Adjusted
operating income, excluding the impact of special (gains) and charges and the 2021 impacts of the Purolite
transaction, decreased 1% in 2022, as strong pricing offset substantial delivered product inflation and investments in
the business. When measured in fixed rates of foreign currency exchange, adjusted fixed currency operating income
increased 4% in 2022.
Earnings from Continuing Operations Attributable to Ecolab Per Common Share (“EPS”)
Reported diluted EPS decreased 3% to $3.81 in 2022 compared to $3.91 in 2021. Special (gains) and charges had an
impact on both years. Special (gains) and charges in 2022 were driven primarily by restructuring and pension
settlement expense and 2021 was driven primarily by COVID-19 related charges, restructuring charges and pension
settlement expense. Adjusted diluted EPS, which exclude the impact of special (gains) and charges, the 2021 impacts
of the Purolite transaction and discrete tax items decreased 4% to $4.49 in 2022 compared to $4.69 in 2021, as
unfavorable foreign currency translation and increases in interest expense further offset our operating income
performance.
Balance Sheet
We remain committed to maintaining “A” range ratings metrics over the long-term, supported by our current credit
ratings of A-/A3/A- by Standard & Poor’s, Moody’s Investor Services and Fitch, respectively. Our strong balance sheet
has allowed us continued access to capital at attractive rates.
Cash Flow
Cash flow from continuing operations operating activities was $1.8 billion in 2022 compared to $2.1 billion in 2021. We
continued to generate strong cash flow from operations, allowing us to fund our ongoing operations, investments in our
business, acquisitions, debt repayments, pension obligations and return cash to our shareholders through share
repurchases and dividend payments.
Dividends
Dividends declared per common share in 2022 was $2.06 per share. In December 2022 we increased our quarterly
cash dividend by 4% to $0.53 per share, representing our 31st consecutive annual dividend rate increase. We have
paid cash dividends on our common shares for 86 consecutive years. Our outstanding dividend history reflects our
long term growth and development, strong cash flows, solid financial position and confidence in our business
prospects for the years ahead.
Table of Contents
29CRITICAL ACCOUNTING ESTIMATES
Our consolidated financial statements are prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP. We have adopted various
accounting policies to prepare the consolidated financial statements in accordance with U.S. GAAP. Our significant
accounting policies are disclosed in Note 2 of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements (“Notes”).
Preparation of our consolidated financial statements, in conformity with U.S. GAAP, requires us to make estimates and
assumptions that affect the amounts reported in the consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes.
Estimates are considered to be critical if they meet both of the following criteria: (1) the estimate requires assumptions
to be made about matters that are highly uncertain at the time the accounting estimate is made, and (2) different
estimates that we reasonably could have used for the accounting estimate in the current period, or changes in the
accounting estimate that are reasonably likely to occur from period to period, have a material impact on the
presentation of our financial condition or results of operations.
In March 2020, COVID-19 was declared a pandemic by the World Health Organization. As the impact of the pandemic
continues to evolve, estimates and assumptions about future events and their effects cannot be determined with
certainty and therefore require judgment. These estimates and assumptions may change in future periods and will be
recognized in the consolidated financial information as new events occur and additional information becomes known.
To the extent actual results differ materially from those estimates and assumptions, our future financial statements
could be affected.
Besides estimates that meet the “critical” estimate criteria, we make many other accounting estimates in preparing our
financial statements and related disclosures. All estimates, whether or not deemed critical, affect reported amounts of
assets, liabilities, revenues or expenses as well as disclosures of contingent assets and liabilities. Estimates are based
on experience and other information available prior to the issuance of the financial statements. Materially different
results can occur as circumstances change and additional information becomes known, even from estimates not
deemed critical. Our critical accounting estimates include the following:
Revenue Recognition
Revenue is measured as the amount of consideration expected to be received in exchange for transferring goods or
providing service. Revenue from product and sold equipment is recognized when obligations under the terms of a
contract with the customer are satisfied, which generally occurs with the transfer of the product or delivery of the
equipment. Revenue from service and leased equipment is recognized when the services are provided, or the
customer receives the benefit from the leased equipment, which is over time. Service revenue is recognized over time
utilizing an input method and aligns with when the services are provided. Typically, revenue is recognized over time
using costs incurred to date because the effort provided by the field selling and service organization represents
services provided, which corresponds with the transfer of control. Revenue for leased equipment is accounted for
under Topic 842 Leases and recognized on a straight-line basis over the length of the lease contract.
Our revenue policies do not provide for general rights of return. We record estimated reductions to revenue for
customer programs and incentive offerings including pricing arrangements, promotions and other volume-based
incentives based primarily on historical experience and anticipated performance over the contract period. Depending
on market conditions, we may increase customer incentive offerings, which could reduce gross profit margins over the
term of the incentive. We also record estimated reserves for product returns and credits based on specific
circumstances and credit conditions. We record an allowance for uncollectible accounts based on our estimates of
expected future credit losses.
The revenue standard can be applied to a portfolio of contracts with similar characteristics if it is reasonable that the
effects of applying the standard at the portfolio would not be significantly different than applying the standard at the
individual contract level. We apply the portfolio approach primarily within each operating segment by geographical
region. Application of the portfolio approach was focused on those characteristics that have the most significant
accounting consequences in terms of their effect on the timing of revenue recognition or the amount of revenue
recognized. We determined the key criteria to assess with respect to the portfolio approach, including the related
deliverables, the characteristics of the customers and the timing and transfer of goods and services, which most
closely aligned within the operating segments. In addition, the accountability for the business operations, as well as
the operational decisions on how to go to market and the product offerings, are performed at the operating segment
level. For additional information on revenue recognition, refer to Note 18.
Table of Contents
30Litigation and Environmental Liabilities
Our business and operations are subject to extensive environmental laws and regulations governing, among other
things, air emissions, wastewater discharges, the use and handling of hazardous substances, waste disposal and the
investigation and remediation of soil and groundwater contamination. Some risk of environmental liability is inherent in
our operations.
We record liabilities related to pending litigation, environmental claims and other contingencies when a loss is probable
and can be reasonably estimated. Estimates used to record such liabilities are based on our best estimate of probable
future costs. We record the amounts that represent the points in the range of estimates that we believe are most
probable or the minimum amount when no amount within the range is a better estimate than any other amount.
Potential insurance reimbursements generally are not anticipated in our accruals for environmental liabilities or other
insured losses. Expected insurance proceeds are recorded as receivables when recovery is deemed certain. While the
final resolution of litigation and environmental contingencies could result in amounts different than current accruals,
and therefore have an impact on our consolidated financial results in a future reporting period, we believe the ultimate
outcome will not have a significant impact on our consolidated financial position. For additional information on our
commitments and contingencies, refer to Note 16.
Actuarially Determined Liabilities
Pension and Postretirement Healthcare Benefit Plans
The measurement of our pension and postretirement benefit obligations are dependent on a variety of assumptions
determined by management and used by our actuaries. These assumptions affect the amount and timing of future
pension contributions, benefit payments and expense or income recognized.
The significant assumptions used in developing the required estimates are the discount rates, expected returns on
assets, projected salary and health care cost increases and mortality tables.
● The discount rate assumptions for our U.S. plans are assessed using a yield curve constructed from a subset of
bonds yielding greater than the median return from a population of non-callable, corporate bonds that have an
average rating of AA when averaging available Moody’s Investor Services, Standard & Poor’s and Fitch ratings.
The discount rates are calculated by matching each plans’ projected cash flows to the bond yield curve. For 2022
and 2021, we measured service and interest costs by applying the specific spot rates along that yield curve to the
plans’ liability cash flows. We believe this approach provides a more precise measurement of service and interest
costs by aligning the timing of the plans’ liability cash flows to the corresponding spot rates on the yield curve. In
determining our U.S. pension obligations for 2022, our weighted-average discount rate increased to 5.17% from
2.86% at year-end 2021. In determining our U.S. postretirement health care obligation for 2022, our weighted-
average discount rate increased to 5.14% from 2.75% at year-end 2021.
● The expected rate of return on plan assets reflects asset allocations, investment strategies and views of
investment advisors, and represents our expected long-term return on plan assets. Our weighted-average
expected returns on U.S. plan assets used in determining the U.S. pension and U.S. postretirement health care
expenses was 7.00% for 2022, 7.00% for 2021 and 7.25% for 2020.
● Projected salary is based on our long-term actual experience, the near-term outlook and assumed inflation. Our
weighted-average projected salary increase used in determining the U.S. pension expenses was 4.03% for 2022,
2021 and 2020.
● For postretirement benefit measurement purposes as of December 31, 2022, the annual rates of increase in the
per capita cost of covered health care were assumed to be 6.75% for pre-65 costs. Post-65 costs are no longer
used. The rates are assumed to decrease each year until they reach 4.5% in 2032 and remain at those levels
thereafter.
● The Company uses mortality tables appropriate in the circumstances, which generally are the recently available
mortality tables as of the respective U.S. and international measurement dates. Our year-end U.S. valuations
reflect mortality tables that estimate the impacts of COVID in an endemic state. This represents a change from
prior year when the impact of COVID on future mortality could not be reasonably estimated.
The effects of actual results differing from our assumptions, as well as changes in assumptions, are reflected in the
unrecognized gains or losses and amortized into earnings in the future. Significant differences in actual experience or
significant changes in assumptions may materially affect future pension and other postretirement obligations and
income or expense. The unrecognized net losses on our U.S. qualified and non-qualified pension plans increased to
$412 million as of December 31, 2022 from $397 million as of December 31, 2021 (both before tax), primarily due to
lower actual return on assets partially offset by current year net actuarial gains.
Table of Contents
31The effect of a decrease in the discount rate or decrease in the expected return on assets assumption as of December
31, 2022, on the December 31, 2022 defined benefit obligation and 2023 expense is shown below, assuming no
changes in benefit levels. Expense amounts reflect the accounting for gains or losses as a component of other
comprehensive income or expense and recognition of the impacts into earnings over time:
Effect on U.S. Pension Plans
Increase in Higher
AssumptionRecorded 2023
(millions) Change Obligation Expense
Discount rate     -.25 pts  $42.4  $1.1
Expected return on assets  -.25 pts N/A  (4.7)
Effect on U.S. Postretirement
Health Care Benefits Plans
Increase in Higher
Assumption Recorded 2023
(millions) Change Obligation Expense
Discount rate     -.25 pts     $2.7     $-
Expected return on assets  -.25 pts  N/A  -
Our international pension obligations and underlying plan assets represent approximately one third of our global
pension plans, with the majority of the amounts held in the U.K. and Eurozone countries. We use assumptions similar
to our U.S. plan assumptions to measure our international pension obligations, however, the assumptions used vary
by country based on specific local country requirements and information.
Refer to Note 17 for further discussion concerning our accounting policies, estimates, funded status, contributions and
overall financial positions of our pension and postretirement plan obligations.
Self-Insurance
Globally we have insurance policies with varying deductible levels for property and casualty losses. We are insured for
losses in excess of these deductibles, subject to policy terms and conditions and have recorded both a liability and an
offsetting receivable for amounts in excess of these deductibles. We are self-insured for health care claims for eligible
participating employees, subject to certain deductibles and limitations. We determine our liabilities for claims on an
actuarial basis.
Income Taxes
Judgment is required to determine the annual effective income tax rate, deferred tax assets and liabilities, valuation
allowances recorded against net deferred tax assets and uncertain tax positions.
Effective Income Tax Rate
Our effective income tax rate is based on annual income, statutory tax rates and tax planning available in the various
jurisdictions in which we operate. Our annual effective income tax rate includes the impact of reserve provisions. We
recognize the amount of tax benefit that is greater than 50% likely of being realized upon settlement with a taxing
authority. We adjust these reserves in light of changing facts and circumstances.
Tax regulations require items to be included in our tax returns at different times than the items are reflected in our
financial statements. As a result, the effective income tax rate reflected in our financial statements differs from that
reported in our tax returns. Some of these differences are permanent, such as expenses that are not deductible on our
tax return, and some are temporary differences, such as depreciation expense.
Deferred Tax Assets and Liabilities and Valuation Allowances
Deferred tax assets and liabilities are determined based on temporary differences between the financial reporting and
tax bases of assets and liabilities, applying enacted tax rates expected to be in effect for the year in which the
differences are expected to reverse. Based on the evaluation of available evidence, both positive and negative, we
recognize tax assets, such as net operating loss carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards, to the extent that realizing
these benefits is considered to be more likely than not. Relevant factors in determining the realizability of deferred tax
assets include historical results, sources of future taxable income, the expected timing of the reversal of temporary
differences, tax planning strategies and the expiration dates of the various tax attributes.
Table of Contents
32Uncertain Tax Positions
A number of years may elapse before a particular tax matter, for which we have established a liability for uncertain tax
position, is audited and finally resolved. The number of tax years with open tax audits varies depending on the tax
jurisdiction. The Internal Revenue Service (“IRS”) has completed examinations of our U.S. federal income tax returns
through 2016 and the years 2017 through 2020 are currently under audit. In addition to the U.S. federal examinations,
we have ongoing audit activity in several U.S. state and foreign jurisdictions.
The tax positions we take are based on our interpretations of tax laws and regulations in the applicable federal, state
and international jurisdictions. We believe our tax returns properly reflect the tax consequences of our operations, and
our liabilities for uncertain tax positions are appropriate and sufficient for the positions taken. Because of the
uncertainty of the final outcome of these examinations, we have estabilished a liability for potential reductions of tax
benefits (including related interest and penalties) for amounts that do not meet the more-likely-than-not thresholds for
recognition and measurement as required by authoritative guidance. The liability for uncertain tax positions is reviewed
throughout the year, taking into account new legislation, regulations, case law and audit results. Settlement of any
particular issue could result in offsets to other balance sheet accounts, cash payments or receipts and/or adjustments
to tax expense. Liabilities for uncertain tax positions are presented in the Consolidated Balance Sheets within other
non-current liabilities. Our gross liability for uncertain tax positions was $24.9 million and $25.1 million as of December
31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. For additional information on income taxes refer to Note 13.
Long-Lived Assets, Intangible Assets and Goodwill
Long-Lived and Amortizable Intangible Assets
Purchased long-lived and amortizable intangible assets not acquired as part of a business combination are recorded
as of their acquisition date at cost, whereas long-lived and amortizable assets acquired as part of a business
combination are recorded as of their acquisition date at their fair values based on the fair value requirements defined
in U.S. GAAP. This requires us to make significant estimates and assumptions relating to the present value of its future
cash flows, such as growth rates, royalty rates or discount rates.
We review our long-lived and amortizable intangible assets, the net value of which was $6.3 billion and $6.8 billion as
of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively, for impairment when significant events or changes in business
circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of the assets may not be recoverable. Such circumstances may
include a significant decrease in the market price of an asset or asset group, a significant adverse change in the
manner in which asset or asset groups are being used or history of operating or cash flow losses associated with the
use of the asset or asset group. Impairment losses could occur when the carrying amount of an asset or asset group
exceeds the anticipated future undiscounted cash flows expected to result from the use of the asset or asset group
and its eventual disposition. The amount of the impairment loss to be recorded, if any, is calculated as the excess of
the asset’s or assets group’s carrying amount over its estimated fair value.
We use the straight-line method to recognize amortization expense related to our amortizable intangible assets,
including our customer relationships. We consider various factors when determining the appropriate method of
amortization for our customer relationships, including projected sales data, customer attrition rates and length of key
customer relationships.
Globally, we have a broad customer base. Our retention rate of significant customers has aligned with our acquisition
assumptions, including the customer bases acquired from our Nalco, Anios, CID Lines and Purolite transactions, which
make up the majority of our unamortized customer relationships. Our historical retention rates, coupled with our
consistent track record of keeping long-term relationships with our customers, supports our expectation of consistent
sales generation for the foreseeable future from the acquired customer bases. If our customer retention rates or other
post-acquisition operational activities change materially, we would evaluate the financial impacts and significance of
the events given rise to the change which could result in impairment of our customer relationship intangible assets, or
absent an impairment, an acceleration of amortization expense.
In addition, we periodically reassess the estimated remaining useful lives of our long-lived and amortizable intangible
assets. Changes to estimated useful lives would impact the amount of depreciation and amortization expense
recorded in earnings. We have experienced no significant changes in the carrying amount or estimated remaining
useful lives of our long-lived or amortizable intangible assets.
Goodwill and Indefinite Life Intangible Assets
Goodwill arises from our acquisitions and represents the excess of the fair value of the purchase consideration
exchanged over the fair value of net assets acquired. We had total goodwill of $8.0 billion and $8.1 billion as of
December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. We test our goodwill for impairment at the reporting unit level. Our
reporting units are largely our operating segments. Following the acquisition of Purolite on December 1, 2021, our Life
Sciences Operating Segment consists of the Purolite and Global Life Sciences Reporting Units. We assess goodwill
for impairment on an annual basis during the second quarter. If circumstances change or events occur that
demonstrate it is more likely than not that the carrying amount of a reporting unit exceeds its fair value, we complete
an interim goodwill impairment assessment of that reporting unit prior to the next annual assessment. If the results of
an annual or interim goodwill impairment assessment demonstrate the carrying amount of a reporting unit is greater
than its fair value, we will recognize an impairment loss for the amount by which the reporting unit’s carrying amount
exceeds its fair value, but not to exceed the carrying amount of goodwill assigned to that reporting unit.
Table of Contents
33For our annual 2022 goodwill impairment assessment, we completed our impairment assessment for eleven of our
twelve reporting units using discounted cash flow analyses that incorporated assumptions regarding future growth
rates, terminal values and discount rates. Our goodwill impairment assessments for 2022 indicated the estimated fair
values of each of these eleven reporting units exceeded the carrying amounts of the respective reporting units by a
significant margin. Given the recent acquisition of Purolite, our annual goodwill impairment assessment of the Purolite
Reporting Unit was qualitative in nature and considered information regarding its operations, financial performance
and the macroeconomic environment. After weighting both positive and negative information, it is more likely than not
that the fair value of the Purolite Reporting Unit exceeds its carrying amount. We evaluate the need to complete
interim goodwill impairment assessments when significant events or changes in business circumstances indicate that it
is more likely than not that the carrying amount of a reporting unit may be higher than its fair value. No events were
noted during the second half of 2022 that required completion of an interim goodwill impairment assessment in the
second half of 2022 for any of our twelve reporting units. There has been no impairment of goodwill in any of the
periods presented.
The Nalco trade name is our only indefinite-lived intangible asset, which is tested for impairment on an annual basis
during the second quarter. For our annual 2022 indefinite-lived intangible asset impairment assessment, we completed
our impairment assessment of the Nalco trade name using the relief from royalty discounted cash flow method, which
incorporates assumptions regarding future sales projections, royalty rates and discount rates. Our Nalco tradename
impairment assessment for 2022 indicated the estimated fair value of the Nalco trade name exceeded its $1.2 billion
carrying amount by a significant margin. No events were noted during the second half of 2022 that required completion
of an interim impairment assessment of our Nalco trade name in the second half of 2022. There has been no
impairment of the Nalco trade name intangible since it was acquired.
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Net Sales
      Percent Change
(millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021
Product and equipment sales 
$11,446.2     
$10,153.3     $9,466.6    
Service and lease sales  2,741.6  2,579.8  2,323.6
Reported GAAP net sales  14,187.8  12,733.1  11,790.2  11%   8%
2021 impact of Purolite on net sales  -  12.0  -
Non-GAAP adjusted net sales  14,187.8  12,721.1  11,790.2  12%   8%
Effect of foreign currency translation   285.3   (249.5)   (15.4)
Non-GAAP adjusted fixed currency sales 
$14,473.1 
$12,471.6 
$11,774.8  16%   6%
 
The percentage components of the year-over-year sales change are shown below:
(percent) 2022 2021
Volume   2%    3%  
Price changes  10  2
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency sales change  13  5
Acquisitions & divestitures  3  1
Fixed currency sales change  16  6
Foreign currency translation  (4)  2
Reported GAAP net sales change  11%   8%  
Amounts do not necessarily sum due to rounding.
Cost of Sales (“COS”) and Gross Profit Margin (“Gross Margin”)
2022 2021 2020
    Gross     Gross     Gross
(millions/percent) COS Margin COS Margin COS Margin
Product and equipment cost of sales 
$7,212.8 
$6,100.9 
$5,481.3
Service and lease cost of sales  1,618.2  1,514.9  1,424.5
Reported GAAP COS and gross margin  8,831.0 37.8%   7,615.8 40.2%  6,905.8 41.4%
Special (gains) and charges  69.9  93.9  48.2 
2021 impact of Purolite on COS  -  7.6  -
Non-GAAP adjusted COS and gross margin 
$8,761.1 38.2%   
$7,514.3 40.9% 
$6,857.6 41.8%
Our COS values and corresponding gross margin are shown above. Our gross margin is defined as sales less cost of
sales divided by sales.
Table of Contents
34Our reported gross margin was 37.8%, 40.2%, and 41.4% for 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. Our 2022, 2021 and
2020 reported gross margins were negatively impacted by special (gains) and charges of $69.9 million, $93.9 million,
and $48.2 million, respectively. Special (gains) and charges items impacting COS are shown within the “Special
(Gains) and Charges” table below.
Excluding the impact of special (gains) and charges and the 2021 impacts of the Purolite transaction, our 2022
adjusted gross margin was 38.2% compared against a 2021 adjusted gross margin of 40.9%. The decrease primarily
reflected accelerating pricing that was more than offset by higher delivered product cost and unfavorable mix.
Excluding the impact of special (gains) and charges and the 2021 impacts of the Purolite transaction, our adjusted
gross margin was 40.9% and 41.8% for 2021 and 2020, respectively. The decrease primarily reflected increased
pricing and higher volumes which were more than offset by significantly higher delivered product costs and supply
constraints.
Selling, General and Administrative Expenses (“SG&A”)
(percent)     2022 2021 2020
SG&A Ratio   25.8%  26.8%  28.1%
The decreased SG&A ratio (SG&A expenses as a percentage of reported net sales) comparing 2022 against 2021
was driven primarily by strong productivity including cost savings initiatives, partially offset by higher cost of
compensation compared to last year. The decreased SG&A ratio (SG&A expenses as a percentage of reported net
sales) comparing 2021 against 2020 was driven primarily by higher net sales, cost savings initiatives and reduction in
bad debt, partially offset by higher variable compensation compared to last year.
Special (Gains) and Charges
Special (gains) and charges reported on the Consolidated Statements of Income included the following items:
(millions) 2022 2021 2020
Cost of sales
Restructuring activities   $21.4   $24.7  $7.4
Acquisition and integration activities  25.0  4.2  3.9
COVID-19 activities, net  16.3  64.7  12.5
Russia/Ukraine  7.2  -  -
Other  -  0.3  24.4
Cost of sales subtotal   69.9   93.9    48.2
Special (gains) and charges
Restructuring activities   85.8   11.9  71.4
Acquisition and integration activities  14.5  29.9  8.5
Disposal and impairment activities  -  -  41.4
COVID-19 activities, net  10.2  42.4  23.6
Russia/Ukraine  5.9  -  -
Other   24.1   18.4  34.7
Special (gains) and charges subtotal   140.5   102.6    179.6
Operating income subtotal  210.4  196.5  227.8
Other (income) expense  50.6  37.2  0.4
Interest expense, net  -  33.1  83.8
Total special (gains) and charges  $261.0  $266.8  $312.0
For segment reporting purposes, special (gains) and charges are not allocated to reportable segments, which is
consistent with our internal management reporting.
Restructuring Activities
Restructuring activities are primarily related to the Europe Program, Institutional Advancement Program, Accelerate
2020 and other immaterial restructuring programs which are described below. These activities have been included as
a component of cost of sales, special (gains) and charges, and other (income) expense on the Consolidated
Statements of Income. Restructuring liabilities have been classified as a component of other current and other
noncurrent liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Further details related to our restructuring charges are included in Note 3.
Table of Contents
35Europe Program
In November 2022 we approved a Europe Program (the “Europe Program”) targeting $80 million of annualized pre-tax
savings after completion of the program. In connection with these actions, we expect to incur pre-tax charges of $130
million ($110 million after tax) or $0.38 per diluted share. The Europe Program charges are expected to be primarily
cash expenditures related to severance and asset disposals. Actual costs may vary from these estimates depending
on actions taken.
In 2022 we recorded total restructuring charges of $67.2 million ($56.0 million after tax) or $0.20 per diluted share
primarily related to severance. The liability related to the Europe Program was $62.0 million as of December 31, 2022
and is expected to be paid over a period of a few months to several quarters and will continue to be funded from
operating activities.
The Europe Program has delivered $5 million of cumulative cost savings with estimated annual cost savings of $80
million in continuing operations by 2024.
On February 14, 2023, we expanded our previously announced Europe cost savings program to focus on our
Institutional and Healthcare businesses in other regions. In connection with the expanded program, we now expect to
incur pre-tax charges of $195 million ($150 million after tax) or $0.52 per diluted share. We expect that these
restructuring actions will be completed by 2024. Program actions include headcount reductions from terminations, not
filing certain positions and facility closures. The expanded program charges are expected to be primarily cash
expenditures related to severance and asset disposals. We now expect an estimated annual total cost savings of $175
million by 2024.
Institutional Advancement Program
We approved a restructuring plan in 2020 focused on the Institutional business (“the Institutional Plan”) which is
intended to enhance our Institutional sales and service structure and allow the sales team to capture share and
penetration while maximizing service effectiveness by leveraging our ongoing investments in digital technology. In
February 2021, we expanded the Institutional Plan, and expect that these restructuring charges will be completed in
2023, with total anticipated costs of $70 million ($55 million after tax) or $0.19 per diluted share. The remaining costs
are expected to be primarily cash expenditures for severance and non-cash costs related to equipment disposals.
Actual costs may vary from these estimates depending on actions taken.
In 2022 and 2021, we recorded total restructuring charges of $6.3 million ($4.8 million after tax) or $0.02 per diluted
share and $12.6 million ($10.2 million after tax) or $0.04 per diluted share, respectively, primarily related to severance,
disposals of equipment and office closures. We have recorded $54.1 million ($41.4 million after tax), or $0.14 per
diluted share of cumulative restructuring charges under the Institutional Plan. The liability related to the Institutional
Plan was $1.9 million as of December 31, 2022 and is expected to be paid over a period of a few months to several
quarters and will continue to be funded from operating activities.
The Institutional Plan has delivered $49 million of cumulative cost savings.
Accelerate 2020
During 2018, we formally commenced a restructuring plan Accelerate 2020 (“the A2020 Plan”), to leverage technology
and system investments and organizational changes. The goals of the Plan are to further simplify and automate
processes and tasks, reduce complexity and management layers, consolidated facilities and focus on key long-term
growth areas by further leveraging technology and structural improvements. During 2020, we expanded the Plan for
additional costs and savings to further leverage the technology and structural improvements. We completed the plan
with actual costs of $254 million ($198 million after tax), or $0.69 per diluted share.
We recorded restructuring charges of $9.9 million ($8.4 million after tax) or $0.03 per diluted share, $5.3 million ($6.2
million after tax) or $0.02 per diluted share and $41.8 million ($33.0 million after tax) or $0.11 per diluted share in
2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. Of these expenses, $0.3 million ($0.2 million after tax) or less than $0.01 per
diluted share during 2020 is recorded in other (income) expense and related to pension settlements and curtailments.
The liability related to the Plan was $18.1 million and $32.7 million as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively.
We have recorded $254.4 million ($198.4 million after tax), or $0.69 per diluted share, of cumulative restructuring
charges under the Plan. The majority of the pretax charges represent net cash expenditures which are expected to be
paid over a period of a few months to several quarters which continue to be funded from operating activities.
The Accelerate 2020 Plan has delivered $315 million of cumulative cost savings.
Other Restructuring Activities
During 2022, we incurred restructuring charges of $23.8 million ($17.9 million after tax), or $0.06 per diluted share,
related to other immaterial restructuring activity. The charges primarily related to severance and asset write-offs.
During 2021, we incurred restructuring charges of $18.7 million ($17.0 million after tax), or $0.06 per diluted share,
related to other immaterial restructuring activity. The charges primarily related to severance and asset write-offs.
During 2020, we incurred restructuring charges of $1.8 million ($1.2 million after tax), or less than $0.01 per diluted
share, related to other immaterial restructuring plan. The charges are comprised of severance, facility closure costs,
including asset disposals, and consulting fees.
Table of Contents
36The restructuring liability balance for all other restructuring plans excluding the Europe Program, A2020 Plan and the
Institutional Plan were $23.2 million and $4.6 million as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. The increase in
liability was driven primarily by severance expense. The remaining liability is expected to be paid over a period of a
few months to several quarters and will continue to be funded from operating activities. Cash payments during 2022
related to all other restructuring plans excluding the Europe Program, A2020 and Institutional Plan were $5.2 million.
Acquisition and integration related costs
Acquisition and integration related costs reported in special (gains) and charges on the Consolidated Statements of
Income in 2022 include $14.5 million ($11.4 million after tax) or $0.04 per diluted share. Charges are related primarily
to the Purolite Corporation (“Purolite”) acquisition and consist of integration related costs and advisory and legal fees.
Acquisition and integration related costs reported in product and equipment cost of sales on the Consolidated
Statements of Income in 2022 include $25.0 million ($19.6 million after tax) or $0.07 per diluted share. Charges are
related primarily to the recognition of fair value step-up in the Purolite inventory and other integration costs.
Acquisition and integration related costs reported in special (gains) and charges on the Consolidated Statements of
Income in 2021 include $29.9 million ($23.5 million after tax) or $0.08 per diluted share. Charges are primarily related
to the Purolite acquisition and consisted of deal costs, integration costs and advisory and legal fees. Acquisition and
integration related costs reported in product and equipment cost of sales on the Consolidated Statements of Income in
2021 include $4.2 million ($3.3 million after tax) or $0.01 per diluted share and are related to the recognition of fair
value step-up in the Purolite inventory. In conjunction with its acquisitions, we incurred $0.8 million ($0.6 million after
tax), or less than $0.01 per diluted share, of special (gains) and charges reported in interest expense in 2021.
Acquisition and integration related costs reported in special (gains) and charges on the Consolidated Statements of
Income in 2020 include $8.5 million ($6.9 million after tax) or $0.02 per diluted share. Charges are related to Copal
Invest NV, including its primary operating entity CID Lines (collectively, “CID Lines”), Bioquell PLC (“Bioquell”) and the
Laboratoires Anios (“Anios”) acquisitions and consist of integration costs and advisory and legal fees. Acquisition and
integration related costs reported in product and equipment cost of sales on the Consolidated Statements of Income in
2020 include $3.9 million ($3.2 million after tax) or $0.01 per diluted share and are related to the recognition of fair
value step-up in the CID Lines inventory, severance and the closure of a facility. In conjunction with our acquisitions,
we incurred $0.7 million ($0.6 million after tax), or less than $0.01 per diluted share, of special (gains) and charges
reported in interest expense in 2020.
Disposal and impairment charges
Disposal and impairment charges reported in special (gains) and charges on the Consolidated Statements of Income
include $41.4 million ($41.5 million after tax) or $0.14 per diluted share in the 2020. During 2020, we recorded a $28.6
million ($28.6 million after tax) or $0.10 per diluted share impairment for a minority equity method investment due to
the COVID-19 impact on the economic environment and the liquidity of the minority equity method investment. In
addition, we recorded charges of $12.8 million ($12.9 million after tax) or $0.04 per diluted share related to the
disposal of Holchem Group Limited (“Holchem”) for the loss on sale and related transaction fees during 2020. Further
information related to the disposal is included in Note 4.
COVID-19 activities
We have recorded inventory reserves of $15 million and $60 million during 2022 and 2021, respectively, for excess
sanitizer inventory and estimated disposal costs. During 2022, 2021 and 2020, we recorded charges of $2.4 million,
$36.8 million and $57.1 million, respectively, to protect the wages of certain employees directly impacted by the
COVID-19 pandemic. We also recorded charges of $9.8 million, $16.5 million and $2.4 million related to employee
COVID-19 testing and related expenses during 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. In addition, we received subsidies
and government assistance, which were recorded as a special (gain) of ($0.7) million, ($6.2) million and ($23.4) million
during 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. COVID-19 pandemic charges are recorded in product and equipment cost
of sales, service and lease cost of sales, and special (gains) and charges on the Consolidated Statements of Income.
Total after tax net charges related to COVID-19 pandemic were $20.2 million or $0.07 per diluted share, $81.3 million
or $0.28 per diluted share and $27.4 million or $0.09 per diluted share during 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Russia/Ukraine
In light of Russia’s invasion of Ukraine and the sanctions against Russia by the United States and other countries, we
have made the determination that we will limit our Russian business to operations that are essential to life, providing
minimal support for our healthcare, life sciences, food and beverage and certain water businesses. We incurred
charges of $13.1 million ($12.6 million after tax) or $0.04 per diluted share during 2022, primarily related to
recoverability risk of certain assets in both Russia and Ukraine.
Other operating activities
Other special charges of $24.1 million ($18.2 million after tax) or $0.06 per diluted share in 2022, $18.4 million ($14.1
million after tax) or $0.05 per diluted share in 2021 and $34.7 million ($33.9 million after tax) or $0.12 per diluted share
recorded in 2020 relate primarily to certain legal charges, which are recorded in special (gains) and charges on the
Consolidated Statements of Income. In 2020, we recorded special charges of $24.4 million ($16.0 million after tax) or
$0.06 per diluted share in product and equipment cost of sales on the Consolidated Statements of Income related to a
Healthcare product recall in Europe.
Table of Contents
37We also recorded during 2020 a $7.2 million or $0.02 per diluted share, special charge related to the separation of
ChampionX as a tax expense on the Consolidated Statements of Income.
Other (income) expense
During 2022 and 2021, we incurred settlement expense recorded in other (income) expense on the Consolidated
Statements of Income of $50.6 million ($38.2 million after tax) or $0.13 per diluted share and $37.2 million ($28.7
million after tax) or $0.10 per diluted share, respectively, related to U.S. pension plan lump-sum payments to retirees.
Interest expense, net
During 2021 and 2020, we recorded special charges of $32.3 million ($28.4 million after tax) or $0.10 per diluted share
and $83.1 million ($64.0 million after tax) or $0.22 per diluted share, respectively, in interest expense on the
Consolidated Statements of Income related to debt issuance and refinancing charges.
Operating Income and Operating Income Margin
            Percent Change
(millions)     2022     2021     2020 2022 2021
Reported GAAP operating income 
$1,562.5 
$1,598.6 
$1,395.7  (2)%   
15%  
Special (gains) and charges   210.4  196.5  227.8   
2021 impact of Purolite on operating
income  3.8  -
Non-GAAP adjusted operating income   1,772.9  1,798.9  1,623.5   (1)   
11
Effect of foreign currency translation   50.1  (47.5)  (9.8)   
Non-GAAP adjusted fixed currency
operating income 
$1,823.0 
$1,751.4 
$1,613.7  4%   9%  
(percent)     2022 2021 2020
Reported GAAP operating income margin 11.0%   12.6%   11.8%  
Non-GAAP adjusted operating income
margin 12.5%   14.1%   13.8%  
Non-GAAP adjusted fixed currency
operating income margin 12.6%   14.0%   13.7%  
Our operating income and corresponding operating income margin are shown in the previous tables. Operating
income margin is defined as operating income divided by sales.
Our reported operating income decreased 2% when comparing 2022 to 2021 primarily driven by accelerating pricing
covering substantially higher delivered product costs, which was offset by investments in the business. Our reported
operating income increased 15% when comparing 2021 to 2020 primarily driven by increased pricing and higher
volume which more than offset significantly higher delivered product costs and supply constraints and higher variable
compensation compared to last year. Our reported operating income for 2022, 2021 and 2020 was impacted by
special (gains) and charges. Excluding the impact of special (gains) and charges and the 2021 impacts of the Purolite
transaction, 2022 adjusted operating income decreased 1% when compared to 2021 adjusted operating income and
2021 adjusted operating income increased 11% when compared to 2020 adjusted operating income.
Other (Income) Expense
(millions)     2022     2021     2020
Reported GAAP other (income) expense  ($24.5)  ($33.9)  ($55.9)
Special (gains) and charges  50.6   37.2   0.4
Non-GAAP adjusted other (income) expense  ($75.1)  ($71.1)  ($56.3)
Our reported other income was $24.5 million, $33.9 million and $55.9 million in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Other (income) expense decreased when comparing 2022 against 2021 primarily due to increased pension settlement
charges in 2022 as a result of a higher volume of pension settlement activity and higher interest costs associated with
rising interest rates throughout 2022. Other (income) expense decreased when comparing 2021 against 2020
reflecting lower interest costs associated with future payments of employee pension obligations. Excluding the impact
of settlements and curtailments recorded in special (gains) and charges during 2022, 2021 and 2020, our adjusted
other income was $75.1 million, $71.1 million and $56.3 million, respectively.
Table of Contents
38Interest Expense, Net
(millions)     2022     2021     2020
Reported GAAP interest expense, net  $243.6  $218.3  $290.2
Special (gains) and charges  -   33.1   83.8
2021 impact of Purolite on interest expense  -  3.5  -
Non-GAAP adjusted interest expense, net  $243.6  $181.7  $206.4
Our reported net interest expense totaled $243.6 million, $218.3 million and $290.2 million during 2022, 2021 and
2020, respectively.
We incurred $33.1 million ($29.0 million after tax) or $0.10 per diluted share and $83.8 million ($64.6 million after tax)
or $0.22 per diluted share, of interest expense special charges in conjunction with our debt issuances and refinancing
activities during 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Adjusted for special (gains) and charges, the increase in interest expense when comparing 2022 against 2021 was
driven primarily by the interest on debt issued to fund the Purolite acquisition and the impact from higher average
interest rates on floating rate debt. Adjusted for special (gains) and charges and the 2021 Purolite transaction, the
decrease in interest expense when comparing 2021 against 2020 was driven primarily by a reduction in average debt
levels and average interest rates.
Provision for Income Taxes
The following table provides a summary of our tax rate:
(percent)     2022 2021     2020
Reported GAAP tax rate  17.5% 19.1%  15.2%  
Tax rate impact of:
Special (gains) and charges   0.5 0.1  0.7 
Discrete tax items  0.7 (0.3) 3.8
Non-GAAP adjusted tax rate   18.7%  18.9%    19.7%  
Our reported tax rate was 17.5%, 19.1%, and 15.2%, for 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. The change in our tax
rate includes the tax impact of special (gains) and charges and discrete tax items, which have impacted the
comparability of our historical reported tax rates, as amounts included in our special (gains) and charges are derived
from tax jurisdictions with rates that vary from our tax rate, and discrete tax items are not necessarily consistent across
periods. The tax impact of special (gains) and charges and discrete tax items will likely continue to impact
comparability of our reported tax rate in the future.
We recognized a net tax benefit related to discrete tax items of $11.8 million during 2022. This included a deferred tax
benefit of $14.6 million associated with utilization of tax attributes as a result of legal entity rationalization and share-
based compensation excess tax benefits of $6.0 million. The amount of the excess tax benefit is subject to variation in
stock price and award exercises. The remaining discrete tax expense of $8.8 million was primarily related to the filing
of federal, state and foreign tax returns and other income tax adjustments including the impact of changes in tax laws,
audit settlements and other changes in estimates.
We recognized net tax expense of $5.8 million related to discrete tax items during 2021. This included a non-cash
deferred tax expense of $25.1 million associated with transferring certain intangible property between affiliates. Share-
based compensation excess tax benefit was $29.1 million. The remaining discrete tax expense of $9.8 million was
primarily related to the filing of federal, state, and foreign tax returns and other income tax adjustments including the
impact of changes in tax law, audit settlements and other changes in estimates.
We recognized a total net benefit related to discrete tax items of $55.8 million during 2020. The tax benefit related to
share-based compensation excess tax benefit contributed $57.3 million. We recorded changes in reserves in non-U.S.
and U.S. jurisdictions due to audit settlements and expiration of statutes of limitations which resulted in a $9.8 million
tax benefit. Additionally, we recognized a net tax expense of $11.3 million primarily related to the filing of the prior year
federal, state and foreign tax returns and other income tax adjustments.
The change in our adjusted tax rates from 2020 to 2022 was primarily driven by global tax planning projects and
geographic income mix. Future comparability of our adjusted tax rate may be impacted by various factors, including
but not limited to other changes in global tax rules, further tax planning projects and geographic income mix.
Table of Contents
39Net Income from Discontinued Operations, net of tax
(millions)     2022     2021     2020
Reported GAAP net loss from discontinued operations, net of tax  $-  $- 
($2,172.5)
Adjustments:
Special (gains) and charges  -  -  2,210.7
Discrete tax net expense  -   -   22.7
Non-GAAP adjusted net income from discontinued operations, net
of tax  $-  $-  $60.9
Special charges reported in discontinued operations consist of ChampionX separation charges.
Net Income from Continuing Operations Attributable to Ecolab
Percent Change 
(millions)     2022    2021    2020    2022 2021
Reported GAAP net income from continuing operations
attributable to Ecolab 
$1,091.7 
$1,129.9  $967.4  (3)%  17%
Adjustments:
Special (gains) and charges, after tax   207.3  213.5  254.1
Discrete tax net (benefit) expense  (11.8)  5.8  (55.8)
2021 impact of Purolite on net income   -  5.6  -
Non-GAAP adjusted net income from continuing
operations attributable to Ecolab 
$1,287.2 
$1,354.8 
$1,165.7 (5)%  16%
Diluted EPS from Continuing Operations
Percent Change 
(dollars)     2022    2021    2020    2022 2021
Reported GAAP diluted EPS from continuing operations  $3.81  $3.91  $3.33  (3)%  17%
Adjustments:
Special (gains) and charges, after tax   0.72   0.74   0.88
Discrete tax net (benefit) expense   (0.04)   0.02   (0.19)
2021 impact of Purolite on diluted EPS  -  0.02  -
Non-GAAP adjusted diluted EPS from continuing
operations $4.49  $4.69  $4.02 (4)% 17%
Per share amounts do not necessarily sum due to rounding.
Currency translation had an unfavorable $(0.26) impact on reported and adjusted diluted EPS when comparing 2022
to 2021 and favorable $0.11 impact when comparing 2021 to 2020.
Table of Contents
40SEGMENT PERFORMANCE
The non-U.S. dollar functional currency international amounts included within our reportable segments are based on
translation into U.S. dollars at the fixed currency exchange rates established by management for 2022. The difference
between the fixed currency exchange rates and the actual currency exchange rates is reported as “effect of foreign
currency translation” in the following tables. All other accounting policies of the reportable segments are consistent
with U.S. GAAP and the accounting policies described in Note 2. Additional information about our reportable segments
is included in Note 19.
Fixed currency net sales and operating income for 2022, 2021 and 2020 for our reportable segments are shown in the
following tables.
Net Sales     Percent Change 
(millions)     2022     2021     2020     2022 2021
Global Industrial  $6,944.0     $6,086.8     $5,845.7  14%   4%
Global Institutional & Specialty   4,480.0   3,908.8   3,559.8  15  10
Global Healthcare & Life Sciences  1,570.0  1,149.6  1,190.1  37  (3)
Other   1,355.0   1,201.0   1,079.8  13  11
Corporate  124.1  137.4  99.4  (10)  38
Subtotal at fixed currency   14,473.1   12,483.6   11,774.8  16  6
Effect of foreign currency translation   (285.3)   249.5   15.4 
Total reported net sales   $14,187.8 
$12,733.1 
$11,790.2  11%   8%
Operating Income     Percent Change 
(millions)     2022     2021     2020     2022 2021
Global Industrial  $977.0     $985.7     $1,079.1  (1)%   (9)%
Global Institutional & Specialty   634.5   545.7   316.3  16  73
Global Healthcare & Life Sciences  205.0  152.3  207.6  35  (27)
Other   212.8   184.0   130.6  16  41
Corporate   (416.7)   (316.6)   (347.7)  32  (9)
Subtotal at fixed currency   1,612.6   1,551.1   1,385.9  4  12
Effect of foreign currency translation   (50.1)   47.5   9.8 
Total reported operating income   $1,562.5  $1,598.6  $1,395.7  (2)%  15%
The following tables reconcile the impact of acquisitions and divestitures within our reportable segments.
Year ended 
December 31
Net Sales 2022 2021
(millions)     Fixed
CurrencyImpact of
Acquisitions
and
DivestituresAcquisition
AdjustedFixed
CurrencyImpact of
Acquisitions
and
DivestituresAcquisition
Adjusted
Global Industrial  $6,944.0  (21.0) $6,923.0 $6,086.8  - $6,086.8
Global Institutional & Specialty   4,480.0  - 4,480.0 3,908.8  - 3,908.8
Global Healthcare & Life Sciences  1,570.0  (434.9) 1,135.1 1,149.6  (12.0) 1,137.6
Other   1,355.0  - 1,355.0 1,201.0  - 1,201.0
Corporate  124.1  (124.1)  -  137.4  (137.4)  -
Subtotal at fixed currency   14,473.1  (580.0) 13,893.1 12,483.6  (149.4) 12,334.2
Effect of foreign currency translation   (285.3)  249.5
Total reported net sales   
$14,187.8 
$12,733.1
Operating Income 2022 2021
(millions)     Fixed
CurrencyImpact of
Acquisitions
and
DivestituresAcquisition
AdjustedFixed
CurrencyImpact of
Acquisitions
and
DivestituresAcquisition
Adjusted
Global Industrial  $977.0  (3.4) $973.6  $985.7  - $985.7
Global Institutional & Specialty   634.5  -  634.5  545.7  -  545.7
Global Healthcare & Life Sciences   205.0  (106.3)  98.7  152.3  3.8  156.1
Other  212.8  -  212.8  184.0  -  184.0
Corporate   (206.3)  86.6  (119.7) (120.1)  -  (120.1)
Non-GAAP adjusted fixed currency
operating income   1,823.0  (23.1) 1,799.9 1,747.6  3.8 1,751.4
Special (gains) and charges   210.4  196.5
Subtotal at fixed currency   1,612.6  1,551.1
Effect of foreign currency translation   (50.1)  47.5
Total reported operating income   $1,562.5  $1,598.6
Table of Contents
41Global Industrial
    2022 2021 2020
Sales at fixed currency (millions) 
$6,944.0 
$6,086.8 
$5,845.7
Sales at public currency (millions)  6,805.0  6,237.8  5,867.1
Volume   1%   2%  
Price changes   13%   2%  
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency sales change  14%   4%  
Acquisitions and divestitures   -%   -%  
Fixed currency sales change   14%   4%  
Foreign currency translation  (5)%   2%  
Public currency sales change   9%   6%  
Operating income at fixed currency (millions)  $977.0  $985.7 
$1,079.1
Operating income at public currency (millions)  951.8  1,020.3  1,086.8
Fixed currency operating income change  (1)%   (9)%  
Fixed currency operating income margin   14.1%    16.2%    18.5%
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income
change   (1)%    (8)%  
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income margin   14.1%    16.2%  *
Public currency operating income change  (7)%   (6)%  
* Not meaningful
Percentages in the above table do not necessarily sum due to rounding.
Net Sales
Fixed currency sales for Global Industrial increased in 2022 as strong double-digit growth across all divisions was
driven by accelerating pricing and new business wins. The 2021 sales increase was impacted by strong growth in
Paper and Water, led by recovering market conditions, strong pricing and new business wins, along with a good
growth in Food & Beverage, were offset by a decrease in Downstream sales growth.
All operating segments reported double-digit growth, Water fixed currency sales increased 13% in 2022 driven by
strong pricing and new business wins. Water fixed currency sales increased 6% in 2021 as strong new business wins
and accelerating pricing leveraged recovering markets. Light industry water treatment reported strong sales and had
solid growth in 2021. Heavy industry sales also recorded strong sales in 2022 led by double-digit growth in power and
chemicals and a strong increase in 2021 driven by primary metals. Food & Beverage fixed currency sales increased
14% in 2022 reflecting accelerating pricing. Fixed currency sales increased 3% in 2021 primarily reflecting
accelerating pricing, recovering markets and new business wins. Downstream fixed currency sales increased 14% in
2022 driven by accelerating pricing and new business wins . Fixed currency sales decreased 3% in 2021 due to lower
demand from COVID and impacts from the Texas freeze and Hurricane Ida. Paper fixed currency sales increased 16%
in 2022 driven by accelerating pricing, new business wins and continued growth in ecommerce markets . Fixed
currency sales increased 11% in 2021 driven by increased pricing, strong new business wins and growth in
ecommerce markets.
 
Operating Income
 
Fixed currency operating income and fixed currency operating income margins for Global Industrial decreased in 2022
and 2021 when compared to prior periods.
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income margins decreased 2.1 percentage points during 2022 compared
to 2021, as the 9.0 percentage point positive impacts of accelerating pricing was more than offset by the 12.7
percentage point negative impacts of higher delivered product costs, unfavorable mix and investments in the business.
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income margins decreased in 2021 compared to 2020, as the positive
impact from accelerating pricing was more than offset by the negative impact of significantly higher delivered product
costs and supply constraints.
Table of Contents
42Global Institutional & Specialty
    2022 2021 2020
Sales at fixed currency (millions) 
$4,480.0 
$3,908.8 
$3,559.8
Sales at public currency (millions)  4,421.9  3,955.9  3,562.5
Volume   6%   7%  
Price changes   8%   2%  
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency sales change  15%   9%  
Acquisitions and divestitures   -%   -%  
Fixed currency sales change   15%   10%  
Foreign currency translation  (3)%   1%  
Public currency sales change   12%   11%  
Operating income at fixed currency (millions)  $634.5  $545.7  $316.3
Operating income at public currency (millions)  624.0  550.9  320.1
Fixed currency operating income change  16%   73%  
Fixed currency operating income margin   14.2%    14.0%    8.9%
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income
change   16%    73%  
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income margin   14.2%    14.0%  *
Public currency operating income change  13%   72%  
* Not meaningful
Percentages in the above table do not necessarily sum due to rounding.
Net Sales
Fixed currency sales for Global Institutional & Specialty increased in 2022 driven by accelerating pricing and new
business wins. The 2021 sales increased driven by strong growth in the Institutional operating segment reflecting
recovering markets, new business wins and accelerating pricing.
 
At an operating segment level, Institutional fixed currency sales increased 18% in 2022, driven by accelerating
pricing and new business wins. Fixed currency sales increased 15% in 2021, driven by strong growth in the
Institutional operating segment reflecting recovering markets in the U.S. and Europe, new business wins including
gains from the Ecolab Science Certified programs and accelerating pricing. Specialty fixed currency sales increased
7% in 2022 driven by strong quick service sales and modest growth in food retail sales. Fixed currency sales
decreased 3% in 2021, as modest quickservice sales growth were more than offset by lower food retail sales.
Operating Income
Fixed currency operating income for our Global Institutional & Specialty segment increased in both 2022 and 2021
when compared to prior periods. Fixed currency operating income margins increased in both 2022 and 2021.
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income margins increased 0.2 percentage points during 2022, as the 8.2
percentage point positive impacts from accelerating pricing and volume growth overcame the 7.9 percentage point
negative impacts of higher delivered product costs and investments in the business. Acquisition adjusted fixed
currency operating income margins increased during 2021, as the positive impact from higher volume, accelerating
pricing, and favorable mix more than offset negative impact of the comparison to lower variable compensation last
year and higher delivered product costs.
Table of Contents
43Global Healthcare & Life Sciences
    2022 2021 2020
Sales at fixed currency (millions) 
$1,570.0 
$1,149.6 
$1,190.1
Sales at public currency (millions)  1,510.5  1,181.6  1,185.5
Volume   (7)%   (9)%  
Price changes   7%   2%  
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency sales change  -%   (7)%  
Acquisitions and divestitures   37%   3%  
Fixed currency sales change   37%   (3)%  
Foreign currency translation  (8)%   4%  
Public currency sales change   (28)%   (0)%  
Operating income at fixed currency (millions)  $205.0  $152.3  $207.6
Operating income at public currency (millions)  193.4  158.4  205.7
Fixed currency operating income change  35%   (27)%  
Fixed currency operating income margin   13.1%    13.2%    17.4%
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income
change   (37)%    (22)%  
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income margin   8.7%    13.7%  *
Public currency operating income change  22%   (23)%  
* Not meaningful
Percentages in the above table do not necessarily sum due to rounding.
Net Sales
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency sales for Global Healthcare & Life Sciences were flat in 2022 compared 2021 as
growth in Life Sciences was offset by slightly lower Healthcare sales.
At an operating segment level, Healthcare fixed currency sales decreased 1% in 2022 due primarily to lower
procedural and hand hygiene volumes, partially offset by increased pricing. Fixed currency sales decreased 5% in
2021 reflecting the comparison against strong 2020 COVID-19 related hand and surface disinfection sales as well as
softer elective surgical procedures activity in 2021 due to the rise in COVID variants during the year. Life Sciences
fixed currency sales increased 163% (9% acquisition adjusted) in 2022 reflecting the acquisition of Purolite. Excluding
the acquisition of Purolite, the Life Sciences business growth was driven by accelerating pricing and growth in
consumable pharmaceutical and personal care products, partially offset by normalizing demand for Bioquell’s
biocontamination systems. Fixed currency sales decreased 5% in 2021 as accelerating pricing was more than offset
by volume declines versus the very strong 2020 driven by extraordinary COVID-19 demand last year.
Operating Income
Fixed currency operating income for our Global Healthcare & Life Sciences segment increased in 2022 and decreased
in 2021 when compared to prior periods. Fixed currency operating income margins decreased in both 2022 and 2021.
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income margins decreased 5.0 percentage points in 2022, as the 5.5
percentage point positive impact from accelerating pricing was more than offset by the 10.2 percentage point negative
impacts from higher delivered product costs, unfavorable mix, lower Healthcare volumes and targeted investments in
the business. Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income margins decreased in 2021, as positive impact
from accelerating pricing was more than offset by the negative impact of volume declines due to strong comparison
against 2020.
Table of Contents
44Other
    2022 2021 2020
Sales at fixed currency (millions) 
$1,355.0 
$1,201.0 
$1,079.8
Sales at public currency (millions)  1,326.6  1,218.6  1,075.1
Volume   6%   9%  
Price changes   7%   2%  
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency sales change  13%   11%  
Acquisitions and divestitures   -%   -%  
Fixed currency sales change   13%   11%  
Foreign currency translation  (4)%   2%  
Public currency sales change   9%   13%  
Operating income at fixed currency (millions)  $212.8  $184.0  $130.6
Operating income at public currency (millions)  208.1  186.8  130.2
Fixed currency operating income change  16%   41%  
Fixed currency operating income margin   15.7%    15.3%    12.1%
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income
change   16%    41%  
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income margin   15.7%    15.3%  *
Public currency operating income change  11%   43%  
* Not meaningful
Percentages in the above table do not necessarily sum due to rounding.
Net Sales
Fixed currency sales for Other increased in 2022 reflecting double-digit growth in Pest Elimination, Textile Care and
Colloidal Technologies. Fixed currency sales increased in 2021 led by strong growth in Pest Elimination as it benefited
from new business wins and a recovering market.
At an operating segment level, Pest Elimination fixed currency sales increased 11% in 2022 reflecting strong growth
across food retail, food & beverage, hospitality and restaurants from accelerating pricing and new business wins .
Fixed currency sales increased 11% in 2021 reflecting strong growth in food and beverage plants, restaurants and
hospitality markets. Textile Care fixed currency sales increased 19% and 10% in 2022 and 2021, respectively.
Colloidal Technologies Group fixed currency sales increased 14% and 16% in 2022 and 2021, respectively.
Operating Income
Fixed currency operating income in Other increased in both 2022 and 2021 as compared to the prior year. Fixed
currency operating income margins increased in both 2022 and 2021.
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income margins in Other increased 0.4 percentage points in 2022, as the
5.8 percentage point positive impacts from accelerating pricing overcame the 5.2 percentage point negative impacts of
higher delivered product costs and investments in business. Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income
margins increased in 2021, as the positive impacts from higher volume and increased pricing more than offset the
negative impact of the comparison to lower variable compensation last year.
Corporate
Consistent with our internal management reporting, Corporate amounts in the table on page 40 include sales to
ChampionX in accordance with the long-term supply agreement entered into with the Transaction post-separation, as
discussed in Note 5, intangible asset amortization specifically from the Nalco and Purolite transactions and special
(gains) and charges that are not allocated to our reportable segments. Items included within special (gains) and
charges are shown in the table on page 34.
Table of Contents
45FINANCIAL POSITION, CASH FLOW AND LIQUIDITY
Financial Position
Total assets were $21.5 billion as of December 31, 2022, compared to total assets of $21.2 billion as of December 31,
2021.
 
Total liabilities were $14.2 billion as of December 31, 2022, compared to total liabilities of $14.0 billion as of
December 31, 2021. Total debt was $8.6 billion as of December 31, 2022 and $8.8 billion as of December 31, 2021.
See further discussion of our debt activity within the “Liquidity and Capital Resources” section of this MD&A.
 
Our net debt to EBITDA is shown in the following table. EBITDA is a non-GAAP measure discussed further in the
“Non-GAAP Financial Measures” section of this MD&A.
2022 2021 2020
(ratio)
Net debt to EBITDA   3.2   3.4   2.4
(millions)  
Total debt  $8,580.4  $8,758.2  $6,686.6
Cash   598.6  359.9  1,260.2
Net debt  $7,981.8  $8,398.3  $5,426.4
Net income including noncontrolling interest  $1,108.9  $1,144.0  $984.8
Provision for income taxes   234.5  270.2  176.6
Interest expense, net   243.6  218.3  290.2
Depreciation   618.5  604.4  594.3
Amortization   320.2  238.7  218.4
EBITDA   $2,525.7  $2,475.6  $2,264.3
Cash Flows
Operating Activities
Dollar Change  
(millions)     2022 2021     2020     2022     2021
Cash provided by operating activities 
$1,788.4 
$2,061.9 
$1,741.8  ($273.5) 
$320.1
We continue to generate cash flow from operations allowing us to fund our ongoing operations, acquisitions,
investments in the business and pension obligations along with returning cash to our shareholders through dividend
payments and share repurchases.
Cash provided by operating activities decreased $274 million in 2022 compared to 2021, driven primarily by $277
million increase in working capital excluding the impact of non-cash special charges. The increase in working capital is
primarily driven by past due receivables higher than last year due to pricing and energy surcharge rollout. Additionally,
inventory impacted by inflationary environment and higher stock holding to mitigate supply disruption.
Cash provided by operating activities increased $320 million in 2021 compared to 2020, driven primarily by $159
million in increased net income, $94 million in higher tax expense accruals associated with higher income, and an
increase in accruals for variable compensation, partially offset by $83 million of increased investment in working
capital.
The impact on operating cash flows of pension and postretirement plan contributions, cash activity related to
restructuring, cash paid for income taxes and cash paid for interest, are shown in the following table:
Dollar Change  
(millions) 2022 2021    2020    2022     2021
Pensions and postretirement plan contributions      $64.3  $60.2     $70.7   $4.1     
($10.5)
Restructuring payments   41.0   78.3   71.1   (37.3)   7.2
Income tax payments   308.9   275.7   366.9   33.2   (91.2)
Interest payments   222.4   208.7   262.5   13.7   (53.8)
Table of Contents
46Investing Activities
Dollar Change  
(millions)     2022 2021     2020    2022     2021
Cash used for investing activities  ($716.8) 
($4,579.7) 
($857.7) 
$3,862.9 
($3,722.0)
Cash used for investing activities is primarily impacted by the timing of business acquisitions and dispositions as well
as from capital investments in the business.
We continue to make capital investments in the business, including merchandising and customer equipment and
manufacturing facilities. Total capital expenditures were $713 million, $643 million and $489 million in 2022, 2021 and
2020, respectively.
Total cash paid for acquisitions, net of cash acquired and net of cash received from dispositions, in 2022, 2021 and
2020 was $7 million, $3,924 million and $487 million, respectively. Our acquisitions and divestitures are discussed
further in Note 4. We continue to target strategic business acquisitions which complement our growth strategy and
expect to continue to make capital investments and acquisitions in the future to support our long-term growth.
 
Financing Activities
Dollar Change  
(millions)     2022 2021     2020    2022     2021
Cash provided by (used for) financing activities  ($837.3) 
$1,603.2 
($340.2) 
($2,440.5) 
$1,943.4
Our cash flows from financing activities primarily reflect the issuances and repayment of debt, common stock
repurchases, proceeds from common stock issuances related to our equity incentive programs and dividend
payments.
We issued $500 million par value and received $494 million in proceeds of long-term debt. We issued $2,800 million
par value and received $2,775 million in proceeds of long-term debt and repaid $900 million of long-term debt in 2021.
We issued $1,850 million par value and received $1,856 million in proceeds of long-term debt and repaid $1,570
million of long-term debt in 2020. The proceeds received from the debt issuances were used for the Purolite
acquisition, repayment of outstanding debt, repayment of commercial paper and general corporate purposes. In
addition, we had net repayments of $404 million and net issuances $394 million of commercial paper and notes
payable in 2022 and 2021, respectively, and net repayments of $66 million in 2020.
Shares are repurchased for the purpose of partially offsetting the dilutive effect of our equity compensation plans and
stock issued in acquisitions, to manage our capital structure and to efficiently return capital to shareholders. We
repurchased a total of $518 million, $107 million, and $146 million of shares in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
The impact on financing cash flows of commercial paper and notes payable repayments, long-term debt borrowings
and long-term debt repayments, are shown in the following table:
Dollar Change  
(millions) 2022 2021    2020    2022     2021
Net (repayments) issuances of commercial
paper and notes payable   ($404.3)  $393.6     ($65.5)   ($797.9)     
$459.1
Long-term debt borrowings   494.0   2,775.0   1,855.9   (2,281.0)   919.1
Long-term debt repayments   -   
(1,017.9)   
(1,570.0)   1,017.9   552.1
 
In December 2022, we increased our quarterly dividend rate by 4%. This represents the 31st consecutive year we
have increased our dividend. We have paid dividends on our common stock for 86th consecutive years. We paid
dividends of $603 million, $566 million and $561 million in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. Cash dividends declared
per share of common stock, by quarter, for each of the last three years were as follows:
First Second Third Fourth      
Quarter Quarter Quarter Quarter Year
2022  $0.51  $0.51  $0.51  $0.53  $2.06
2021   $0.48  $0.48  $0.48  $0.51  $1.95
2020   $0.47  $0.47  $0.47  $0.48  $1.89
Table of Contents
47Liquidity and Capital Resources
We currently expect to fund all of our cash requirements which are reasonably foreseeable for the next twelve months,
including scheduled debt repayments, new investments in the business, share repurchases, dividend payments,
possible business acquisitions and pension and postretirement contributions with cash from operating activities, and
as needed, additional short-term and/or long-term borrowings. We continue to expect our operating cash flow to
remain strong.
As of December 31, 2022, we had $599 million of cash and cash equivalents on hand, of which $122 million was held
outside of the U.S. As of December 31, 2021, we had $360 million of cash and cash equivalents on hand, of which
$181 million was held outside of the U.S. We will continue to evaluate our cash position in light of future developments.
As of December 31, 2022, we had a $2.0 billion multi-year credit facility, which expires in April 2026. The credit facility
has been established with a diverse syndicate of banks and supports our U.S. and Euro commercial paper programs.
The maximum aggregate amount of commercial paper that may be issued under our U.S. commercial paper program
and our Euro commercial paper program may not exceed $2.0 billion. At year end, we had no commercial paper
outstanding under our U.S. program or our Euro program. There were no borrowings under our credit facility as of
December 31, 2022 or 2021. As of December 31, 2022, both programs were rated A-2 by Standard & Poor’s, P-2 by
Moody’s and F-1 by Fitch.
Additionally, we have uncommitted credit lines with major international banks and financial institutions. These credit
lines support our daily global funding needs, primarily our global cash pooling structures. As of December 31, 2022 we
had $144 million of bank supported letters of credit, surety bonds and guarantees outstanding in support of our
commercial business transactions. We do not have any other significant unconditional purchase obligations or
commercial commitments.
As of December 31, 2022, Standard & Poor’s, Fitch and Moody’s rated our long-term credit at A- (negative outlook), A-
(stable outlook) and A3 (negative outlook), respectively. A reduction in our credit ratings could limit or preclude our
ability to issue commercial paper under our current programs or could also adversely affect our ability to renew
existing, or negotiate new, credit facilities in the future and could increase the cost of these facilities.
 
As of December 31, 2022, we were in compliance with our debt covenants and other requirements of our credit
agreements and indentures.
 
A schedule of our various obligations as of December 31, 2022 are summarized in the following table:
Payments Due by Period  
Less More 
Than 2-3 4-5 Than 
(millions) Total 1 Year Years Years 5 Years 
Notes payable  $4  $4     $-  $-  $-
One-time transition tax   67   -   35  32   -
Long-term debt   8,577   501   1,204   1,651   5,221
Operating leases   503   124   173  85   121
Interest*   3,970   280  529   467   2,694
Total 
$13,121 
$909 
$1,941 
$2,235 
$8,036
* Interest on variable rate debt was calculated using the interest rate at year end 2022.
As of December 31, 2022, our gross liability for uncertain tax positions was $25 million. We are not able to reasonably
estimate the amount by which the liability will increase or decrease over an extended period of time or whether a cash
settlement of the liability will be required. Therefore, these amounts have been excluded from the schedule of
contractual obligations.
 
We do not have required minimum cash contribution obligations for our qualified pension plans in 2022. We are
required to fund certain international pension benefit plans in accordance with local legal requirements. We estimate
contributions to be made to our international plans will approximate $41 million in 2023. These amounts have been
excluded from the schedule of contractual obligations.
 
We lease certain sales and administrative office facilities, distribution centers, research and manufacturing facilities
and other equipment under longer-term operating leases. Vehicle leases are generally shorter in duration. Vehicle
leases have residual value requirements that have historically been satisfied primarily by the proceeds on the sale of
the vehicles.
 
Market Risk
We enter into contractual arrangements (derivatives) in the ordinary course of business to manage foreign currency
exposure and interest rate risks. We do not enter into derivatives for speculative or trading purposes. Our use of
derivatives is subject to internal policies that provide guidelines for control, counterparty risk, and ongoing monitoring
and reporting, and is designed to reduce the volatility associated with movements in foreign exchange and interest
rates on our income statement and cash flows.
 
Table of Contents
48We enter into foreign currency forward contracts to hedge certain intercompany financial arrangements, and to hedge
against the effect of exchange rate fluctuations on transactions related to cash flows denominated in currencies other
than U.S. dollars. We use net investment hedges as hedging instruments to manage risks associated with our
investments in foreign operations. As of December 31, 2022, we had a total of €1,150 million senior notes designated
as net investment hedges.
We enter into cross-currency swap derivative contracts to hedge certain Euro denominated exposures from our
investments in certain of its Euro denominated functional currency subsidiaries. We use net investment hedges as
hedging instruments to manage risks associated with our investments in foreign operations. As of December 31, 2022,
we had €625 million of cross-currency swap derivative contracts outstanding designated as a net investment hedge.
We manage interest expense using a mix of fixed and floating rate debt. To help manage borrowing costs, we may
enter into interest rate swap agreements. Under these arrangements, we agree to exchange, at specified intervals, the
difference between fixed and floating interest amounts calculated by reference to an agreed-upon notional principal
amount. As of December 31, 2022, we had $1,500 million of interest rate swaps outstanding.
 
Refer to Note 9 for further information on our hedging activity.
 
Based on a sensitivity analysis (assuming a 10% change in market rates) of our foreign exchange and interest rate
derivatives and other financial instruments, changes in exchange rates or interest rates would increase/decrease our
financial position and liquidity by approximately $220 million. The effect on our results of operations would be
substantially offset by the impact of the hedged items.
GLOBAL ECONOMIC AND POLITICAL ENVIRONMENT
Coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19)
In March 2020, the coronavirus disease (COVID-19) was declared a pandemic by the World Health Organization. The
COVID-19 pandemic is continuing to affect major economic and financial markets and industries are facing the
challenges with the economic conditions resulting from efforts to address the pandemic, including supply shortages,
inflation and other challenges, such as those resulting from the introduction of vaccination mandates. While many
government restrictions in the U.S. have eased, restrictions on activities continue in many other regions, particularly
those where vaccination rates lag, continuing to impact consumer activity in those regions. Concerns remain that our
markets could see a resurgence of cases triggering additional government mandated lockdowns or similar restrictions
on activity, for example due to the emergence of a variant against which existing vaccines are not as effective or which
may be more easily transmitted, particularly to those unvaccinated. These conditions have had and may continue to
have a negative impact on market conditions and customer demand throughout the world.
Global Economies
Approximately half of our sales are outside of the U.S. Our international operations subject us to changes in economic
conditions and foreign currency exchange rates as well as political uncertainty in some countries which could impact
future operating results. We expect a more challenging macroeconomic environment, especially in Europe, as the war
and the energy crisis are having a significant impact on costs and demand. We also assume continued high delivered
product costs and unfavorable currency translation and interest rate impacts that persist well into 2023.
Argentina is classified as a highly inflationary economy in accordance with U.S. GAAP, and the U.S. dollar is the
functional currency for our subsidiaries in Argentina. During 2022, sales in Argentina represented less than 1% of our
consolidated net sales. Assets held in Argentina at the end of 2022 represented less than 1% of our consolidated
assets. Turkey was also classified as a highly inflationary economy in accordance with U.S. GAAP. During 2022, sales
in Turkey represented less than 1% of our consolidated net sales. Assets held in Turkey at the end of 2022
represented less than 1% of our consolidated assets.
In light of Russia’s invasion of Ukraine and the sanctions against Russia by the United States and other countries, we
have made the determination that we will limit our Russian business to operations that are essential to life, providing
minimal support for our healthcare, life sciences, food and beverage and certain water businesses. We may further
narrow our presence in Russia depending on future developments. Our Russian and Ukraine operations represented
approximately 1% of our 2022 consolidated net sales. We recorded charges of $13.1 million in 2022 primarily related
to recoverability risk of certain assets in both Russia and Ukraine.
NEW ACCOUNTING PRONOUNCEMENTS
Information regarding new accounting pronouncements is included in Note 2.
Table of Contents
49NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
This MD&A includes financial measures that have not been calculated in accordance with U.S. GAAP. These non-
GAAP measures include:
 
● Fixed currency sales
● Adjusted net sales
● Adjusted fixed currency sales
● Acquisition adjusted fixed currency sales or organic sales
● Adjusted cost of sales
● Adjusted gross margin
● Fixed currency operating income
● Fixed currency operating income margin
●   Adjusted operating income
● Adjusted operating income margin
● Adjusted fixed currency operating income
● Adjusted fixed currency operating income margin
● Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income or organic income
● Acquisition adjusted fixed currency operating income margin or organic margin
● Adjusted other (income) expense
● Adjusted interest expense, net
● EBITDA
● Adjusted tax rate
● Adjusted net income from discontinued operations, net of tax
● Adjusted net income from continuing operations attributable to Ecolab
● Adjusted diluted EPS from continuing operations
We provide these measures as additional information regarding our operating results. We use these non-GAAP
measures internally to evaluate our performance and in making financial and operational decisions, including with
respect to incentive compensation. We believe that our presentation of these measures provides investors with greater
transparency with respect to our results of operations and that these measures are useful for period-to-period
comparison of results.
 
Our non-GAAP adjusted financial measure for net sales excludes 2021 Purolite sales. Our non-GAAP adjusted
financial measures for cost of sales, gross margin, operating income, other (income) expense and interest expense
exclude the impact of special (gains) and charges and (with the exception of other (income) expense) the 2021 impact
of the Purolite transaction, and our non-GAAP measures for tax rate, net income from continuing operations
attributable to Ecolab and diluted EPS from continuing operations further exclude the impact of discrete tax items. We
include items within special (gains) and charges and discrete tax items that we believe can significantly affect the
period-over-period assessment of operating results and not necessarily reflect costs and/or income associated with
historical trends and future results. After tax special (gains) and charges are derived by applying the applicable local
jurisdictional tax rate to the corresponding pre-tax special (gains) and charges.
 
EBITDA is defined as the sum of net income including non-controlling interest, provision for income taxes, net interest
expense, depreciation and amortization. EBITDA is used in our net debt to EBITDA ratio, which we view as important
indicators of the operational and financial health of our organization.
We evaluate the performance of our international operations based on fixed currency rates of foreign exchange. Fixed
currency amounts included in this Form 10-K are based on translation into U.S. dollars at the fixed foreign currency
exchange rates established by management at the beginning of 2022. We also provide our segment results based on
public currency rates for informational purposes.
Our reportable segments do not include the impact of intangible asset amortization from the Nalco and Purolite
transactions or the impact of special (gains) and charges as these are not allocated to our reportable segments.
Acquisition adjusted fixed currency growth rates, also known as organic growth rates, are at fixed currency and
exclude the results of our acquired businesses from the first twelve months post acquisition and the results of our
divested businesses from the twelve months prior to divestiture. Further, we have excluded the results of our Purolite
business for all of 2022 to remain comparable to 2021 when Purolite’s results were excluded from our adjusted results.
In addition, as part of the Transaction, we also entered into a Master Cross Supply and Product Transfer agreement
with ChampionX to provide, receive or transfer certain products for a period up to 36 months. Sales of product to
ChampionX under this agreement are recorded in product and equipment sales in the Corporate segment along with
the related cost of sales. These transactions are removed from the consolidated results as part of the calculation of the
impact of acquisitions and divestitures.
These non-GAAP measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to U.S. GAAP and may be different from
non-GAAP measures used by other companies. Investors should not rely on any single financial measure when
evaluating our business. We recommend that investors view these measures in conjunction with the U.S. GAAP
measures included in this MD&A and we have provided reconciliations of reported U.S. GAAP amounts to the non-
GAAP amounts in this MD&A.
Table of Contents
50Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk.
The discussion under the heading entitled "Market Risk" and “Global Economic and Political Environment” is
incorporated by reference from Part II, Item 7 of this Form 10-K.
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
REPORTS OF MANAGEMENT
To our Shareholders:
Management’s Responsibility for Financial Statements
Management is responsible for the integrity and objectivity of the consolidated financial statements. The statements
have been prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America and,
accordingly, include certain amounts based on management’s best estimates and judgments.
The Board of Directors, acting through its Audit Committee composed solely of independent directors, is responsible
for determining that management fulfills its responsibilities in the preparation of financial statements and maintains
internal control over financial reporting. The Audit Committee recommends to the Board of Directors the appointment
of the Company’s independent registered public accounting firm, subject to ratification by the shareholders. It meets
regularly with management, the internal auditors and the independent registered public accounting firm.
The independent registered public accounting firm has audited the consolidated financial statements included in this
annual report and have expressed their opinion regarding whether these consolidated financial statements present
fairly in all material respects our financial position and results of operation and cash flows as stated in their report
presented separately herein.
Management’s Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting, as such
term is defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). Under the supervision and with the participation of management,
including the principal executive officer and principal financial officer, an evaluation of the design and operating
effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting was conducted based on the 2013 framework in Internal
Control — Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission.
Based on the evaluation under the framework in Internal Control — Integrated Framework, management concluded
that internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2022.
The Company’s independent registered public accounting firm, PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, has audited the
effectiveness of the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022 as stated in their
report which is included herein.
Christophe Beck Scott D. Kirkland
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Chief Financial Officer

Table of Contents
51REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Board of Directors and Shareholders of Ecolab Inc.
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Ecolab Inc. and its subsidiaries (the “Company”)
as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, and the related consolidated statements of income, of comprehensive income, of
equity and of cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022, including the related
notes (collectively referred to as the “consolidated financial statements”). We also have audited the Company's internal
control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated
Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO).
In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the
financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, and the results of its operations and its cash
flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022 in conformity with accounting principles
generally accepted in the United States of America. Also in our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material
respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022, based on criteria established in
Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the COSO.
Basis for Opinions
The Company's management is responsible for these consolidated financial statements, for maintaining effective
internal control over financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial
reporting, included in the accompanying Management’s Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our
responsibility is to express opinions on the Company’s consolidated financial statements and on the Company's
internal control over financial reporting based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public
Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to
the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the
Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of
material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was
maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material
misstatement of the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that
respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and
disclosures in the consolidated financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles
used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the
consolidated financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial reporting included obtaining an
understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, and
testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our
audits also included performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe
that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding
the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies
and procedures that (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the
transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are
recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with authorizations
of management and directors of the company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely
detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material effect on
the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become
inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may
deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current period audit of the consolidated
financial statements that was communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (i)
relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the consolidated financial statements and (ii) involved our
especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in
any way our opinion on the consolidated financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating
the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the critical audit matter or on the accounts or
disclosures to which it relates.
Table of Contents
52Goodwill Impairment Assessment – Downstream Reporting Unit
As described in Note 2 to the consolidated financial statements, the carrying value of goodwill was $8.0 billion as of
December 31, 2022, a portion of which is allocated to the Downstream reporting unit. During the second quarter of
2022, management completed its annual goodwill impairment assessment for eleven of its twelve reporting units using
discounted cash flow analyses that incorporated assumptions, including future growth rates, terminal values and
discount rates. The annual goodwill impairment assessment of the Purolite reporting unit was qualitative in nature and
considered information regarding its operations, financial performance and the macroeconomic environment. If the
results of an annual or interim goodwill assessment demonstrate the carrying amount of a reporting unit is greater than
its fair value, the Company will recognize an impairment loss for the amount by which the reporting unit’s carrying
amount exceeds its fair value, but not to exceed the carrying amount of goodwill assigned to that reporting unit.
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to the goodwill impairment
assessment of the Downstream reporting unit is a critical audit matter are (i) the significant judgment by management
when determining the fair value of the Downstream reporting unit; (ii) a high degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity,
and effort in performing procedures and evaluating management’s significant assumption related to the discount rate;
and (iii) the audit effort involved the use of professionals with specialized skill and knowledge.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our
overall opinion on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of
controls relating to management’s goodwill impairment assessment, including controls over management’s valuation of
the Downstream reporting unit. These procedures also included, among others (i) testing management’s process for
determining the fair value of the Downstream reporting unit; (ii) evaluating the appropriateness of the discounted cash
flow analysis; and (iii) evaluating the reasonableness of the significant assumption used by management related to the
discount rate. Evaluating management’s significant assumption related to the discount rate involved evaluating
whether the significant assumption used was reasonable considering the cost of capital of comparable businesses and
relevant industry factors. Professionals with specialized skill and knowledge were used to assist in evaluating (i) the
appropriateness of the discounted cash flow analysis and (ii) the reasonableness of the discount rate significant
assumption.
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Minneapolis, Minnesota
February 24, 2023
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1970.
Table of Contents
53CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
(millions, except per share amounts) 2022 2021 2020
Product and equipment sales $11,446.2 $10,153.3 $9,466.6
Service and lease sales 2,741.6 2,579.8 2,323.6
Net sales 14,187.8 12,733.1 11,790.2
Product and equipment cost of sales 7,212.8 6,100.9 5,481.3
Service and lease cost of sales 1,618.2 1,514.9 1,424.5
Cost of sales (including special (gains) and charges (a)) 8,831.0 7,615.8 6,905.8
Selling, general and administrative expenses 3,653.8  3,416.1 3,309.1
Special (gains) and charges 140.5  102.6 179.6
Operating income 1,562.5  1,598.6 1,395.7
Other (income) expense (b) (24.5) (33.9) (55.9)
Interest expense, net (c) 243.6 218.3 290.2
Income before income taxes 1,343.4  1,414.2 1,161.4
Provision for income taxes 234.5  270.2 176.6
Net income from continuing operations, including noncontrolling interest 1,108.9 1,144.0 984.8
Net income from continuing operations attributable to noncontrolling
interest 17.2 14.1 17.4
Net income from continuing operations attributable to Ecolab 1,091.7  1,129.9 967.4
Net loss from discontinued operations, net of tax (Note 5) (d) -  - (2,172.5)
Net income (loss) attributable to Ecolab $1,091.7 $1,129.9 ($1,205.1)
Earnings (loss) attributable to Ecolab per common share
Basic
Continuing operations $3.83 $3.95 $3.37
Discontinued operations $- $- ($7.57)
Earnings attributable to Ecolab $3.83 $3.95 ($4.20)
Diluted
Continuing operations $3.81 $3.91 $3.33
Discontinued operations $- $- ($7.48)
Earnings attributable to Ecolab $3.81 $3.91 ($4.15)
Weighted-average common shares outstanding
Basic 285.2  286.3 287.0
Diluted 286.6  289.1 290.3
(a)Cost of sales includes special (gains) and charges of $65.0 in 2022, $91.9 in 2021, and $39.3 in 2020, which is
recorded in product and equipment cost of sales. Cost of sales includes special (gains) and charges of $4.9 in
2022, $2.0 in 2021 and $8.9 in 2020, which is recorded in service and lease cost of sales.
(b)Other (income) expense includes special charges of $50.6 in 2022, $37.2 in 2021 and $0.4 in 2020.
(c)Interest expense, net includes special charges of $33.1 in 2021, and $83.8 in 2020.
(d)Net income (loss) from discontinued operations, net of tax includes noncontrolling interest of $2.2 in 2020.
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
54CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(millions)  2022 2021 2020
 
Net income (loss) attributable to Ecolab $1,091.7 $1,129.9 ($1,205.1)
Net income from continuing operations attributable to noncontrolling
interest 17.2 14.1 17.4
Net income from discontinued operations attributable to noncontrolling
interest - - 2.2
Net income (loss) attributable to Ecolab, including noncontrolling interest $1,108.9 $1,144.0 ($1,185.5)
 
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax  
 
Foreign currency translation adjustments  
Foreign currency translation    (333.4)  (10.9)  50.0
Separation of ChampionX - - 229.9
Gain (loss) on net investment hedges    108.3  51.6  (87.7)
Total foreign currency translation adjustments    (225.1)  40.7  192.2
 
Derivatives and hedging instruments    (1.2)  26.0  (17.0)
 
Pension and postretirement benefits    130.3  289.7  (78.1)
 
Subtotal    (96.0)  356.4  97.1
 
Total comprehensive income (loss), including noncontrolling interest    1,012.9  1,500.4  (1,088.4)
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interest    13.0  10.9  21.4
Comprehensive income (loss) attributable to Ecolab  $999.9 $1,489.5 ($1,109.8)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
55CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(millions, except per share amounts) 2022 2021
ASSETS
Current assets
Cash and cash equivalents $598.6 $359.9
Accounts receivable, net  2,698.1  2,478.4
Inventories  1,792.8  1,491.8
Other current assets 404.7 357.0
Total current assets  5,494.2  4,687.1
Property, plant and equipment, net  3,293.4  3,288.5
Goodwill  8,012.7  8,063.9
Other intangible assets, net  3,680.7  4,224.1
Operating lease assets 448.2 396.8
Other assets 535.1 546.0
Total assets $21,464.3 $21,206.4
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY
Current liabilities
Short-term debt $505.1 $411.0
Accounts payable 1,728.2 1,384.2
Compensation and benefits 493.6 509.5
Income taxes 197.6 104.3
Other current liabilities 1,285.9 1,144.2
Total current liabilities 4,210.4 3,553.2
Long-term debt 8,075.3 8,347.2
Pension and postretirement benefits 670.3 894.2
Deferred income taxes 505.6 622.0
Operating lease liabilities 337.8 282.6
Other liabilities 406.3 254.1
Total liabilities 14,205.7 13,953.3
Commitments and contingencies (Note 16)
Equity (a)
Common stock 364.7 364.1
Additional paid-in capital 6,580.2 6,464.6
Retained earnings 9,318.8 8,814.5
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (1,726.6) (1,634.8)
Treasury stock (7,301.0) (6,784.2)
Total Ecolab shareholders’ equity 7,236.1 7,224.2
Noncontrolling interest 22.5 28.9
Total equity 7,258.6 7,253.1
Total liabilities and equity $21,464.3 $21,206.4
(a)Common stock, 800.0 shares authorized, $1.00 par value, 284.5 shares outstanding at December 31, 2022 and
286.9 shares outstanding at December 31, 2021. Shares outstanding are net of treasury stock.
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
56CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(millions) 2022     2021     2020
OPERATING ACTIVITIES
Net income (loss) including noncontrolling interest $1,108.9 $1,144.0 ($1,185.5)
Less: Net loss from discontinued operations, including noncontrolling interest - - (2,170.3)
Net income from continuing operations, including noncontrolling interest $1,108.9 $1,144.0 $984.8
Adjustments to reconcile net income to cash provided by operating activities:
Depreciation   618.5 604.4 594.3
Amortization   320.2 238.7 218.4
Deferred income taxes   (142.6) (1.1) (45.8)
Share-based compensation expense   87.8 89.5 82.1
Pension and postretirement plan contributions   (64.3) (60.2) (70.7)
Pension and postretirement plan expense, net   45.5 42.4 42.0
Restructuring charges, net of cash paid   66.2 (41.7) 7.8
Debt refinancing - 29.4 77.1
Other, net   24.9 15.9 61.0
Changes in operating assets and liabilities, net of effect of acquisitions:
Accounts receivable   (319.6) (178.2) 155.6
Inventories   (402.9) (73.0) (179.5)
Other assets   (278.2) (92.9) 42.3
Accounts payable   394.7 200.4 55.9
Other liabilities   329.3 144.3 (283.5)
Cash provided by operating activities - continuing operations   1,788.4 2,061.9 1,741.8
Cash provided by operating activities - discontinued operations - - 118.4
Cash provided by operating activities 1,788.4 2,061.9 1,860.2
INVESTING ACTIVITIES
Capital expenditures   (712.8) (643.0) (489.0)
Property and other assets sold   2.2 12.2 5.3
Acquisitions and investments in affiliates, net of cash acquired   (7.2) (3,923.7) (487.0)
Divestiture of businesses - - 116.2
Other, net 1.0 (25.2) (3.2)
Cash used for investing activities - continuing operations   (716.8) (4,579.7) (857.7)
Cash provided by investing activities - discontinued operations - - 443.2
Cash used for investing activities (716.8) (4,579.7) (414.5)
FINANCING ACTIVITIES
Net (repayments) issuances of commercial paper and notes payable   (404.3) 393.6 (65.5)
Long-term debt borrowings   494.0 2,775.0 1,855.9
Long-term debt repayments   - (1,017.9) (1,570.0)
Reacquired shares   (518.2) (106.6) (146.2)
Dividends paid   (602.8) (566.4) (560.8)
Exercise of employee stock options   29.1 143.5 241.5
Debt refinancing - (29.4) (77.1)
Hedge settlements 172.0 25.9 (8.4)
Other, net (7.1) (14.5) (9.6)
Cash (used for) provided by financing activities - continuing operations   (837.3) 1,603.2 (340.2)
Cash used for financing activities - discontinued operations - - (1.6)
Cash (used for) provided by financing activities (837.3) 1,603.2 (341.8)
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents   4.4  14.3  (30.1)
Increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents   238.7 (900.3) 1,073.8
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of period - continuing operations 359.9 1,260.2 118.8
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of period - discontinued operations - - 67.6
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of period   359.9 1,260.2 186.4
Cash and cash equivalents, end of period - continuing operations 598.6 359.9 1,260.2
Cash and cash equivalents, end of period - discontinued operations - - -
Cash and cash equivalents, end of period $598.6 $359.9 $1,260.2
SUPPLEMENTAL CASH FLOW INFORMATION
Income taxes paid $308.9 $275.7 $366.9
Net interest paid   222.4  208.7  262.5
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
57CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF EQUITY
Year ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
(millions, except per share
amounts)     Common
Stock    Additional
Paid-in
Capital    Retained
Earnings    AOCI
(Loss)    Treasury
Stock    Ecolab
Shareholders'
Equity     Non-
Controlling
Interest    Total
Equity
Balance, December 31,
2019 $359.6 $5,907.1 $9,993.7 ($2,089.7) ($5,485.4) $8,685.3  $40.5 $8,725.8
New accounting
guidance adoption (a) (4.3)  (4.3)   (4.3)
Net (loss) income (1,205.1)  (1,205.1)  19.6 (1,185.5)
Other comprehensive
income (loss) 95.3  95.3  1.8 97.1
Cash dividends declared
(b) (541.3)  (541.3)  (21.0) (562.3)
Separation of
ChampionX (8.5) (1,051.4) (1,059.9) 3.4 (1,056.5)
Changes in
noncontrolling interests 17.6 17.6 (9.3) 8.3
Stock options and
awards  3.0 318.8 3.3  325.1  325.1
Reacquired shares (146.2) (146.2)  (146.2)
Balance, December 31,
2020  362.6 6,235.0 8,243.0 (1,994.4) (6,679.7) 6,166.5  35.0 6,201.5
Net income 1,129.9  1,129.9  14.1 1,144.0
Other comprehensive
income (loss) 359.6  359.6  (3.2) 356.4
Cash dividends declared
(b) (558.4)  (558.4)  (17.0) (575.4)
Stock options and
awards  1.5 229.6 2.1  233.2  233.2
Reacquired shares (106.6) (106.6)  (106.6)
Balance, December 31,
2021  364.1 6,464.6 8,814.5 (1,634.8) (6,784.2) 7,224.2  28.9 7,253.1
Net income 1,091.7 1,091.7 17.2 1,108.9
Other comprehensive
income (loss) (91.8)  (91.8)  (4.2) (96.0)
Cash dividends declared
(b) (587.4)  (587.4)  (20.0) (607.4)
Fair value adjustment of
prior acquisition - 0.6 0.6
Stock options and
awards   0.6 115.6 1.4  117.6  117.6
Reacquired shares (518.2) (518.2)  (518.2)
Balance, December 31,
2022 $364.7 $6,580.2 $9,318.8 ($1,726.6)($7,301.0) $7,236.1 $22.5 $7,258.6
(a)In 2020, upon adoption of ASU 2016-13, Financial Instruments – Credit Losses (Topic 326): Measurement
of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments, the Company reclassified the cumulative effect of applying the
standard to retained earnings at the beginning of the period adopted.
(b)Dividends declared per common share were $2.06, $1.95, and $1.89 in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
COMMON STOCK ACTIVITY
2022 2021 2020  
Common Treasury Common Treasury Common Treasury 
Year ended December 31     Stock     Stock Stock     Stock     Stock     Stock 
Shares, beginning of year  364,139,362 (77,255,713) 362,553,443(76,801,025) 359,569,234(71,159,472)
Stock options  276,059 14,525 1,270,757 29,684 2,577,231 35,122
Stock awards  296,420 17,794 315,162 17,760 406,978 40,122
Reacquired shares - (3,038,107) - (502,132) - (761,245)
Separation of ChampionX - - - - - (4,955,552)
Shares, end of year  364,711,841 (80,261,501) 364,139,362 (77,255,713) 362,553,443 (76,801,025)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
58NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
1. NATURE OF BUSINESS
Ecolab is a global leader in water, hygiene and infection prevention solutions and services that protect people and vital
resources. The Company delivers comprehensive solutions, data-driven insights and personalized service to advance
food safety, maintain clean and safe environments, optimize water and energy use and improve operational
efficiencies and sustainability for customers in the food, healthcare, hospitality and industrial markets in more than 170
countries.
The Company’s cleaning and sanitizing programs and products and pest elimination services support customers in the
foodservice, food and beverage processing, hospitality, healthcare, government and education, retail, textile care and
commercial facilities management sectors. The Company’s products and technologies are also used in water
treatment, pollution control, energy conservation, refining, primary metals manufacturing, papermaking, mining and
other industrial processes.
In June 2020, the Company completed the separation of its Upstream Energy business (the “ChampionX business”) in
a Reverse Morris Trust transaction (the “Transaction”) through the split-off of ChampionX Holding Inc. (“ChampionX”),
formed by Ecolab as a wholly owned subsidiary to hold the ChampionX business, followed immediately by the merger
(the “Merger”) of ChampionX with a wholly owned subsidiary of ChampionX Corporation (f/k/a Apergy Corporation,
“Apergy”).
As discussed in Note 5 Discontinued Operations, during 2020, the ChampionX business met the criteria to be reported
as discontinued operations because the separation of the ChampionX business was a strategic shift in business that
had a major effect on the Company's operations and financial results. Therefore, the Company reported the historical
results of ChampionX, including the results of operations, cash flows, and related assets and liabilities, as
discontinued operations in 2020. Unless otherwise noted, the accompanying Notes to the Consolidated Financial
Statements have all been revised to reflect the effect of the separation of ChampionX and all 2020 balances have
been revised accordingly to reflect continuing operations only.
In December 2021, the Company acquired Purolite for total consideration of $3.7 billion in cash, net of cash acquired.
Purolite is a leading and fast-growing global provider of high-end ion exchange resins for the separation and
purification of solutions, that is highly complementary to the Company’s current offering and critical to safe, high quality
drug production and biopharma product purification in the life sciences industries. It also provides purification and
separation solutions for critical industrial markets like microelectronics, nuclear power and food and beverage.
Headquartered in King of Prussia, Pennsylvania, Purolite operates in more than 30 countries. Purolite is reported
within the Company’s Life Sciences operating segment.
The Company is aligned into three reportable segments: Global Industrial, Global Institutional & Specialty, and Global
Healthcare & Life Sciences as discussed in Note 19 Operating Segments and Geographical Information. Operating
segments that were not aggregated and do not exceed the quantitative criteria to be separately reported have been
combined into Other.
Except for the changes due to adoption of the new accounting standards, the Company has consistently applied the
accounting policies to all periods presented in these consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
592. SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Principles of Consolidation
The consolidated financial statements include the accounts of the Company and all subsidiaries in which the Company
has a controlling financial interest. Investments in companies, joint ventures or partnerships in which the Company
does not have control but has the ability to exercise significant influence over operating and financial decisions, are
reported using the equity method of accounting. The alternative method of accounting is used in circumstance where
the Company’s investments in companies, joint ventures and partnerships neither provide it control or significant
influence over the investee and for investments that do not have readily identifiable fair values. Investments accounted
for under the alternative method are recorded at cost and adjusted for impairments, if any, or observable price
changes of the same or similar securities issued by the investee. International subsidiaries are included in the financial
statements on the basis of their U.S. GAAP November 30 fiscal year ends to facilitate the timely inclusion of such
entities in the Company’s consolidated financial reporting. All intercompany transactions and profits are eliminated in
consolidation.
Use of Estimates
The preparation of the Company’s financial statements requires management to make certain estimates and
assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities as of the date of the financial statements and the
reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting periods. Actual results could differ from these
estimates. The Company’s critical accounting estimates include revenue recognition, litigation and environmental
reserves, actuarially determined liabilities, income taxes, long-lived assets, intangible assets and goodwill.
Foreign Currency Translation
Financial position and reported results of operations of the Company’s non-U.S. dollar functional currency international
subsidiaries are measured using local currencies as the functional currency. Assets and liabilities of these operations
are translated at the exchange rates in effect at each fiscal year end. The translation adjustments related to assets
and liabilities that arise from changes in exchange rates from period to period are included in accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss) in shareholders’ equity. Income statement accounts are translated at average rates of
exchange prevailing during the year. As discussed in Note 19 Operating Segments and Geographic Information, the
Company evaluates its international operations based on fixed rates of exchange; however, changes in exchange
rates from period to period impact the amount of reported income from consolidated operations.
Concentration of Credit Risk
Credit risk represents the accounting loss that would be recognized at the reporting date if counterparties failed to
perform as contracted. The Company believes the likelihood of incurring material losses due to concentration of credit
risk is minimal. The principal financial instruments subject to credit risk are as follows:
Cash and Cash Equivalents - The Company maintains cash deposits with major banks, which from time to time may
exceed insured limits. The possibility of loss related to financial condition of major banks has been deemed minimal.
Additionally, the Company’s investment policy limits exposure to concentrations of credit risk and changes in market
conditions.
Accounts Receivable - A large number of customers in diverse industries and geographies, as well as the practice of
establishing reasonable credit lines, limits credit risk. Based on historical trends and experiences, the allowance for
expected credit losses is adequate to cover expected credit risk losses.
Foreign Currency and Interest Rate Contracts and Derivatives - Exposure to credit risk is limited by internal policies
and active monitoring of counterparty risks. In addition, the Company uses a diversified group of major international
banks and financial institutions as counterparties. The Company does not anticipate nonperformance by any of these
counterparties.
Cash and Cash Equivalents
Cash equivalents include highly-liquid investments with a maturity of three months or less when purchased.
Accounts Receivable and Allowance for Expected Credit Losses
Accounts receivable are carried at the invoiced amounts, less an allowance for expected credit losses, and generally
do not bear interest. The Company’s allowance for expected credit losses estimates the amount of expected future
credit losses by analyzing accounts receivable balances by age and applying historical write-off and collection
experience. The Company’s estimates separately consider macroeconomic trends, specific circumstances and credit
conditions of customer receivables. Account balances are written off against the allowance when it is determined the
receivable will not be recovered.
The Company’s allowance for the expected return of products shipped and credits related to pricing or quantities
shipped was $59 million, $19 million, and $16 million as of December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. Returns
and credit activity is recorded directly as a reduction to revenue.
Table of Contents
60The following table summarizes the activity in the allowance for expected credit losses:
(millions) 2022    2021    2020
Beginning balance $52.8 $68.4 $38.8
Adoption of new standard - - 4.3
Bad debt expense  38.1  15.0  57.7
Write-offs  (21.1)  (27.4)  (31.6)
Other (a)  2.1  (3.2)  (0.8)
Ending balance $71.9 $52.8 $68.4
(a)Other amounts are primarily the effects of changes in currency translations and acquired balances.
Inventory Valuations
Inventories are valued at the lower of cost or net realizable value. Certain U.S. inventory costs are determined on a
last-in, first-out (“LIFO”) basis. LIFO inventories represented 29% and 27% of consolidated inventories as of
December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. All other inventory costs are determined using either the average cost or
first-in, first-out (“FIFO”) methods. Inventory values at FIFO, as shown in Note 6, approximate replacement cost.
Property, Plant and Equipment
Property, plant and equipment assets are stated at cost. Merchandising and customer equipment consists principally
of various dispensing systems for the Company’s cleaning and sanitizing products, warewashing machines and
process control and monitoring equipment. Certain dispensing systems capitalized by the Company are accounted for
on a mass asset basis, whereby equipment is capitalized and depreciated as a group and written off when fully
depreciated. The Company capitalizes both internal and external costs to develop or purchase computer software.
Costs incurred for data conversion, training and maintenance associated with capitalized software are expensed as
incurred. Expenditures for major renewals and improvements, which significantly extend the useful lives of existing
plant and equipment, are capitalized and depreciated. Expenditures for repairs and maintenance are charged to
expense as incurred. Upon retirement or disposition of plant and equipment, the cost and related accumulated
depreciation are removed from the accounts and any resulting gain or loss is recognized in income.
Depreciation is charged to operations using the straight-line method over the assets’ estimated useful lives ranging
from 5 to 40 years for buildings and leasehold improvements, 3 to 20 years for machinery and equipment, 3 to 20
years for merchandising and customer equipment and 3 to 7 years for capitalized software. The straight-line method of
depreciation reflects an appropriate allocation of the cost of the assets to earnings in proportion to the amount of
economic benefits obtained by the Company in each reporting period. Depreciation expense was $619 million, $604
million and $594 million for 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets
Goodwill
Goodwill arises from the Company’s acquisitions and represents the excess of the fair value of the purchase
consideration exchanged over the fair value of net assets acquired. The Company’s reporting units are largely its
operating segments. Following the acquisition of Purolite in December 2021, the Company’s Life Sciences Operating
Segment consists of the Purolite and Global Life Sciences Reporting Units. The Company assesses goodwill for
impairment on an annual basis during the second quarter. If circumstances change or events occur that demonstrate it
is more likely than not that the carrying amount of a reporting unit exceeds its fair value, the Company completes an
interim goodwill impairment assessment of that reporting unit prior to the next annual assessment. If the results of an
annual or interim goodwill impairment assessment demonstrate the carrying amount of a reporting unit is greater than
its fair value, the Company will recognize an impairment loss for the amount by which the reporting unit’s carrying
amount exceeds its fair value, but not to exceed the carrying amount of goodwill assigned to that reporting unit.
During the second quarter of 2022, the Company completed its annual goodwill impairment assessment for eleven of
its twelve reporting units using discounted cash flow analyses that incorporated assumptions regarding future growth
rates, terminal values and discount rates. The Company’s goodwill impairment assessments for 2022 indicated the
estimated fair values of each of these eleven reporting units exceeded the carrying amounts of the respective
reporting unit by a significant margin. Given the recent acquisition of Purolite, the Company’s annual goodwill
impairment assessment of the Purolite Reporting Unit was qualitative in nature and considered information regarding
its operations, financial performance and the macroeconomic environment. After weighting both positive and negative
information, it is more likely than not that the fair value of the Purolite Reporting Unit exceeds its carrying amount. No
events were noted during the second half of 2022 that required completion of an interim goodwill impairment
assessment for any of our twelve reporting units. There has been no impairment of goodwill in any of the periods
presented.
Table of Contents
61The changes in the carrying amount of goodwill for each of the Company’s reportable segments were as follows:
Global Global
Global InstitutionalHealthcare &
(millions)     Industrial    & Specialty    Life Sciences Other    Total  
December 31, 2020 $4,287.9 $564.1 $909.8 $245.1 $6,006.9
Current year business combinations (a)  6.9 17.2 2,123.2 - 2,147.3
Prior year business combinations (b) (0.9) - - - (0.9)
Effect of foreign currency translation  (23.8) (4.8) (58.8) (2.0) (89.4)
December 31, 2021 $4,270.1 $576.5 $2,974.2 $243.1 $8,063.9
Prior year business combinations (b) 0.4 - 253.4 - 253.8
Effect of foreign currency translation (188.7) (8.9) (102.2) (5.2) (305.0)
December 31, 2022 $4,081.8 $567.6 $3,125.4 $237.9 $8,012.7
(a)Represents goodwill associated with current year acquistions. For 2021, approximately $2,209 million of goodwill
related to businesses acquired is expected to be tax deductible related to the acquisitions of Purolite and
National Wiper Alliance, Inc. (refer to Footnote 4 for additional information).
(b)Represents purchase price allocation adjustments for acquisitions deemed preliminary as of the end of the prior
year.
Other Intangible Assets
The Nalco trade name is the Company’s only indefinite life intangible asset, which is tested for impairment on an
annual basis during the second quarter. During the second quarter of 2022, the Company completed its annual
impairment assessment of the Nalco trade name using the relief from royalty discounted cash flow method, which
incorporates assumptions regarding future sales projections, royalty rate and discount rates. The Company’s Nalco
trade name impairment assessment for 2022 indicated the estimated fair value of the Nalco trade name exceeded its
$1.2 billion carrying amount by a significant margin. No events were noted during the second half of 2022 that required
completion of an interim impairment assessment of our Nalco trade name. There has been no impairment of the Nalco
trade name intangible asset since it was acquired.
The Company’s intangible assets subject to amortization include customer relationships, trademarks, patents and
other technology primarily acquired through business acquisitions. The fair value of intangible assets acquired in
business acquisitions are estimated primarily using discounted cash flow valuation methods at the time of acquisition.
Intangible assets are amortized on a straight-line basis over their estimated lives. The weighted-average useful life of
amortizable intangible assets was 15 years as of December 31, 2022 and 2021.
The weighted-average useful life by type of amortizable asset at December 31, 2022 were as follows:
(years)
Customer relationships     15
Patents  14
Trademarks  13
Other technology  12
The straight-line method of amortization reflects an appropriate allocation of the cost of the intangible assets to
earnings in proportion to the amount of economic benefits obtained by the Company in each reporting period. The
Company evaluates the remaining useful life of its intangible assets subject to amortization each reporting period to
determine whether events and circumstances warrant a change to the estimated remaining period of amortization. If
the estimate of an intangible asset’s remaining useful life is changed, the remaining carrying amount of the intangible
asset will be amortized prospectively over the updated remaining useful life. Amortization expense related to other
intangible assets during the last three years and future estimated amortization were as follows:
(millions)
2020 $219
2021  239
2022     320 
2023  299
2024  291
2025  285
2026  271
2027  146
Table of Contents
62Long-Lived Assets
The Company reviews its long-lived and amortizable intangible assets for impairment when significant events or
changes in business circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of the assets, or asset group to which it is
assigned, may not be recoverable. Such circumstances may include a significant decrease in the market price of an
asset or asset group, a significant adverse change in the manner in which the asset or asset group is being used or
history of cash flow losses associated with the use of an asset or asset group. Impairment losses could occur when
the carrying amount of an asset or asset group exceeds the anticipated future undiscounted cash flows expected to
result from the use of the asset or asset group and its eventual disposition. The amount of the impairment loss to be
recorded, if any, is calculated by the excess of the asset’s or asset group’s carrying value over its fair value.
In addition, the Company periodically reassesses the estimated remaining useful lives of its long-lived assets.
Changes to estimated useful lives would impact the amount of depreciation and amortization recorded in earnings.
The Company has not experienced significant changes in the carrying amount or estimated remaining useful lives of
its long-lived or amortizable intangible assets.
Rental and Leases
Lessee
The Company determines whether a lease exists at the inception of the arrangement. In assessing whether a contract
is or contains a lease, the Company evaluates whether the arrangement conveys the right to control the use of an
identified asset for a period of time in exchange for consideration. The Company accounts for lease components
separately from the nonlease components (e.g., common-area maintenance costs, property taxes, parking, etc.).
Operating leases are recorded in operating lease assets, other current liabilities and operating lease liabilities in the
Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Operating lease assets and operating lease liabilities are measured and recognized based on the present value of the
future minimum lease payments over the estimated lease term at the lease commencement date. The Company uses
the rate implicit in the lease when available or determinable. When the rate implicit in the lease is not determinable,
the Company uses its incremental borrowing rate based on the information available at the lease commencement date
to determine the present value of future payments. Lease expense for minimum lease payments is recognized on a
straight-line basis over the lease term. Variable lease payments are not included in the lease liability and are
recognized as incurred. The Company identified real estate, vehicles and other equipment as the primary classes of
its leases. Certain leases with a similar class of underlying assets are accounted for as a portfolio of leases.
The Company does not record operating lease assets or liabilities for leases with terms of twelve months or less.
Those lease payments are recognized in the Consolidated Statements of Income over the lease term as incurred.
Many of the Company’s leases include options to renew or cancel, which are at the Company’s sole discretion.
Renewal terms can extend the lease term from one month to multiple years, whereas, cancellation terms can shorten
the lease term by multiple years. The lease start date is the date when the leased asset is available for use and in
possession of the Company. The lease end date, which includes any options to renew or cancel that are reasonably
certain to be exercised, is based on the terms of the contract. The depreciable life of assets and leasehold
improvements are limited by the expected lease term, unless there is a transfer of title or purchase option reasonably
certain of exercise. The Company’s lease agreements do not contain any material restrictive covenants.
Lessor
The Company accounts for lease and nonlease components separately. The nonlease components, such as product
and service revenue, are accounted for under Topic 606 Revenue from Contracts with Customers, refer to Note 18 for
more information. Revenue from leasing equipment is recognized on a straight-line basis over the life of the lease.
Cost of sales includes the depreciation expense for assets under operating leases. The assets are depreciated over
their estimated useful lives. Initial lease terms range from one year to five years and most leases include renewal
options.
Lease contracts convey the right for the customer to control the equipment for a period of time as defined by the
contract. There are no options for the customer to purchase the equipment and therefore the equipment remains the
property of the Company at the end of the lease term. Refer to Note 14 for additional information regarding rental and
leases.
Income Taxes
Income taxes are recognized during the period in which transactions enter into the determination of financial statement
income, with deferred income taxes provided for the tax effect of temporary differences between the carrying amount
of assets and liabilities and their tax bases. The Company records a valuation allowance to reduce its deferred tax
assets when uncertainty regarding their realizability exists. Relevant factors in determining the realizability of deferred
tax assets include historical results, sources of future taxable income, the expected timing of the reversal of temporary
differences, tax planning strategies and the expiration dates of the various tax attributes. The Company records
liabilities for income tax uncertainties in accordance with the U.S. GAAP recognition and measurement criteria
guidance. The Company has elected the period cost method and considers the estimated global intangible low taxed
income (“GILTI”) impact in tax expense. The Company recognizes interest and penalties related to income tax
uncertainties in the income tax provision.
The CHIPS Act (CHIPS) was signed into U.S. law on August 9, 2022. CHIPS includes incentives for domestic
semiconductor manufacturing for expenditures incurred after December 31, 2022. The Company continues to assess
qualification for the new tax incentives but does not anticipate CHIPS to have a material impact on the Company’s
financial statements.
Table of Contents
63The Inflation Reduction Act (IRA) includes a corporate alternative minimum tax on certain large corporations,
incentives to address climate change mitigation and other non-income tax provisions, including an excise tax on the
repurchase of corporate stock. The IRA is effective January 1, 2023. The Company continues to assess the impact of
the IRA and qualification for new tax incentives but does not anticipate the IRA to have a material impact on the
Company’s financial statements. 
Refer to Note 13 for additional information regarding income taxes.
Share-Based Compensation
The Company measures compensation expense for share-based awards at fair value at the date of grant and
recognizes compensation expense over the service period for awards expected to vest. The majority of grants to
retirement eligible recipients (age 55 with required years of service) are recorded to expense using the non-
substantive vesting method and are fully expensed over a six-month period following the date of grant. In addition, the
Company includes a forfeiture estimate in the amount of compensation expense being recognized based on an
estimate of the number of outstanding awards expected to vest.
All excess tax benefits or deficiencies are recognized as discrete income tax items on the Consolidated Statements of
Income. The extent of excess tax benefits is subject to variation in stock price and stock option exercises. Refer to
Note 12 for additional information regarding equity compensation plans.
Restructuring Activities
The Company’s restructuring activities are associated with plans to enhance its efficiency, effectiveness and sharpen
its competitiveness. These restructuring plans include net costs associated with significant actions involving
employee-related severance charges, contract termination costs and asset write-downs and disposals. Employee
termination costs are largely based on policies and severance plans, and include personnel reductions and related
costs for severance, benefits and outplacement services. These charges are reflected in the quarter in which the
actions are probable and the amounts are estimable, which typically is when management approves the associated
actions. Contract termination costs include charges to terminate leases prior to the end of their respective terms and
other contract termination costs. Asset write-downs and disposals include leasehold improvement write-downs, other
asset write-downs associated with combining operations and disposal of assets. Refer to Note 3 for additional
information regarding restructuring activities.
Revenue Recognition
Revenue is measured as the amount of consideration expected to be received in exchange for transferring goods or
providing service.
Product and Sold Equipment
Revenue from product and sold equipment is recognized when obligations under the terms of a contract with the
customer are satisfied, which generally occurs with the transfer of the product or delivery of the equipment.
Service and Lease Equipment
Revenue from service and leased equipment is recognized when the services are provided, or the customer receives
the benefit from the leased equipment, which is over time. Service revenue is recognized over time utilizing an input
method and aligns with when the services are provided. Typically, revenue is recognized using costs incurred to date
because the effort provided by the field selling and service organization represents services provided, which
corresponds with the transfer of control. Revenue for leased equipment is accounted for under Topic 842 Leases and
recognized on a straight-line basis over the length of the lease contract.
Other Considerations
Contracts with customers may include multiple performance obligations. For contracts with multiple performance
obligations, the consideration is allocated between products and services based on their stand-alone selling prices.
Stand-alone selling prices are generally based on the prices charged to customers when the good or service is not
bundled with other product or services or using an expected cost plus margin. Judgment is used in determining the
amount of service that is embedded within the Company’s contracts, which is based on the amount of time spent on
the performance obligation activities. The level of effort, including the estimated margin that would be charged, is used
to determine the amount of service revenue. Depending on the terms of the contract, the Company may defer the
recognition of revenue when a future performance obligation has not yet occurred.
Taxes assessed by a governmental authority that are both imposed on, and concurrent with, a specific revenue-
producing transaction, which are collected by the Company from a customer, are excluded from revenue. Shipping
and handling costs associated with outbound freight are recognized in cost of sales when control over the product has
transferred to the customer.
Other estimates used in recognizing revenue include allocating variable consideration to customer programs and
incentive offerings, including pricing arrangements, promotions and other volume-based incentives at the time the sale
is recorded. These estimates are based primarily on historical experience and anticipated performance over the
contract period. Based on the certainty in estimating these amounts, they are included in the transaction price of the
contracts and the associated remaining performance obligations. The Company recognizes revenue when collection
of the consideration expected to be received in exchange for transferring goods or providing services is probable.
Table of Contents
64The Company’s revenue policies do not provide for general rights of return. Estimates used in recognizing revenue
include the delay between the time that products are shipped and when they are received by customers, when title
transfers and the amount of credit memos issued in subsequent periods. Depending on market conditions, the
Company may increase customer incentive offerings, which could reduce gross profit margins over the term of the
incentive.
Earnings Per Common Share
The difference in the weighted average common shares outstanding for calculating basic and diluted earnings
attributable to Ecolab per common share is a result of the dilution associated with the Company’s equity compensation
plans. As noted in the table below, certain stock options and units outstanding under these equity compensation plans
were not included in the computation of diluted earnings attributable to Ecolab per common share because they would
not have had a dilutive effect.
The computations of the basic and diluted earnings attributable to Ecolab per share amounts were as follows:
(millions, except per share) 2022 2021 2020
Net income from continuing operations attributable to
Ecolab $1,091.7 $1,129.9 $967.4
Net loss from discontinued operations, net of tax - - (2,172.5)
Net income (loss) attributable to Ecolab $1,091.7 $1,129.9 ($1,205.1)
Weighted-average common shares outstanding
Basic   285.2  286.3  287.0
Effect of dilutive stock options and units   1.4  2.8 3.3
Diluted   286.6  289.1  290.3
Earnings (loss) attributable to Ecolab per common
share
Basic EPS
Continuing operations $3.83 $3.95 $3.37
Discontinued operations $- $- ($7.57)
Earnings (loss) attributable to Ecolab $3.83 $3.95 ($4.20)
Diluted EPS
Continuing operations $3.81 $3.91 $3.33
Discontinued operations $- $- ($7.48)
Earnings (loss) attributable to Ecolab $3.81 $3.91 ($4.15)
Anti-dilutive securities excluded from the computation
of diluted EPS   3.9  1.9  1.9
Amounts do not necessarily sum due to rounding.
Discontinued Operations
Discontinued operations comprise those activities that were disposed of during the period or which were classified as
held for sale at the end of the period and represent a strategic shift that has or will have a major effect on the
Company’s operations and financial results. The ChampionX business met the criteria to be reported as discontinued
operations because it was a strategic shift in business that had a major effect on the Company’s operations and
financial results. The ChampionX business is presented on the Consolidated Statements of Income as discontinued
operations. Refer to Note 5, Discontinued Operations, for additional information.
Table of Contents
65Other Significant Accounting Policies
The following table includes a reference to additional significant accounting policies that are described in other notes
to the financial statements, including the note number:
Policy Note
Fair value measurements     8
Derivatives and hedging transactions  9
Share-based compensation  12
Research and development expenditures 15
Legal contingencies  16
Pension and post-retirement benefit plans 17
Reportable segments 19
New Accounting Pronouncements
Standards That Are Not Yet Adopted:
            Required     
Date of Date of Effect on the
Standard  Issuance Description  Adoption Financial Statements
ASU 2021-08 - Business Combinations
(Topic 805): Accounting for Contract Assets
and Contract Liabilities from Contracts with
CustomersOctober 2021Update to improve the
accounting for acquired
revenue contracts with
customers in a business
combination by addressing
diversity in practice and
inconsistency related to the
recognition of an acquired
contract liability and payment
terms and their effect on
subsequent revenue
recognized by the acquirer.January
1, 2023.The Company is
currently evaluating any
potential future impacts
on the Company's
financial statements,
any such changes
would be prospective.
Standards That Were Adopted:
    Date of         Date of    Effect on the
Standard  Issuance Description  Adoption Financial Statements
ASU 2020-04 - Reference Rate Reform
(Topic 848): Facilitation of the Effects of
Reference Rate Reform on Financial
Reporting
ASU 2021-01 - Reference Rate Reform
(Topic 848): Scope
ASU 2022-06 - Reference Rate Reform
(Topic 848): Deferral of the Sunset Date of
Topic 848March 2020 Certain LIBOR rates, widely
used reference rates for
pricing financial products,
were discontinued on
December 31, 2021. This
standard provides optional
expedients and exceptions if
certain criteria are met when
accounting for contracts,
hedging relationships, and
other transactions that
reference LIBOR or another
reference rate expected to be
discontinued because of
reference rate reform.Application
of
guidance
is optional
until the
options
and
expedients
expire on
December
31, 2024.The Company
evaluated contracts
whose terms previously
included references to
LIBOR or one of its
equivalents and
identified two contracts
requiring modifications
of the interest rate
provisions included
therein. The Company
applied certain of the
expedients included in
ASC 848 allowing the
Company to account for
the contract
modifications
prospectively. There
were no financial
statement impacts at
the time of modification.
ASU 2021 -10 - Government Assistance
(Topic 832): Disclosures by Business
Entities about Government AssistanceNovember 2021Update to increase the
transparency of government
assistance including annual
disclosure of the types of
assistance accounted for
under a grant or contribution
method of accounting, an
entity’s accounting for the
assistance, and the effect of
the assistance on an entity’s
financial statements.Annual
period
beginning
January 1,
2022.The adoption of this
standard did not have a
significant impact on the
Company's financial
statements.
No other new accounting pronouncement issued or effective has had or is expected to have a material impact on the
Company’s consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
663. SPECIAL (GAINS) AND CHARGES
Special (gains) and charges reported on the Consolidated Statements of Income included the following:
(millions) 2022 2021 2020
Cost of sales
Restructuring activities  $21.4  $24.7 $7.4
Acquisition and integration activities 25.0 4.2 3.9
COVID-19 activities, net 16.3 64.7 12.5
Russia/Ukraine 7.2 - -
Other - 0.3 24.4
Cost of sales subtotal  69.9  93.9   48.2
Special (gains) and charges
Restructuring activities  85.8  11.9 71.4
Acquisition and integration activities 14.5 29.9 8.5
Disposal and impairment activities - - 41.4
COVID-19 activities, net 10.2 42.4 23.6
Russia/Ukraine 5.9 - -
Other  24.1  18.4 34.7
Special (gains) and charges subtotal  140.5  102.6   179.6
Operating income subtotal 210.4 196.5 227.8
Other (income) expense 50.6 37.2 0.4
Interest expense, net - 33.1 83.8
Total special (gains) and charges $261.0 $266.8 $312.0
For segment reporting purposes, special (gains) and charges are not allocated to reportable segments, which is
consistent with the Company’s internal management reporting.
Restructuring Activities
Restructuring activities are primarily related to the Europe Program, Institutional Advancement Program, Accelerate
2020 and other immaterial restructuring programs which are described below. These activities have been included as
a component of cost of sales, special (gains) and charges, other (income) expense and interest expense, net on the
Consolidated Statements of Income. Restructuring liabilities have been classified as a component of other current and
other noncurrent liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Europe Program
In November 2022 the Company approved a Europe cost savings program (the “Europe Program”). In connection with
these actions, the Company expects to incur pre-tax charges of $130 million ($110 million after tax). The Europe
Program charges are expected to be primarily cash expenditures related to severance and asset disposals. Actual
costs may vary from these estimates depending on actions taken.
In 2022 the Company recorded total restructuring charges of $67.2 million ($56.0 million after tax) primarily related to
severance. The liability related to the Europe Program was $62.0 million as of December 31, 2022 and is expected to
be paid over a period of a few months to several quarters and will continue to be funded from operating activities.
Restructuring activity related to the Europe Program since inception of the underlying actions includes the following:
    Employee                
Termination Asset
(millions)     Costs     Disposals    Other     Total
2022 Activity
Recorded expense and accrual 67.2 - - 67.2
Net cash payments  (5.2) - - (5.2)
Restructuring liability, December 31,
2022 $62.0 $- $- $62.0
On February 14, 2023, the Company expanded its previously announced Europe cost savings program to focus on its
Institutional and Healthcare businesses in other regions. In connection with the expanded program, the Company now
expects to incur pre-tax charges of $195 million ($150 million after tax). The Company expects that these restructuring
actions will be completed by 2024. Program actions include headcount reductions from terminations, not filing certain
open positions and facility closures.The expanded program charges are expected to be primarily cash expenditures
related to severance and asset disposals.
Table of Contents
67Institutional Advancement Program
The Company approved a restructuring plan in 2020 focused on the Institutional business (“the Institutional Plan”)
which is intended to enhance the Company’s Institutional sales and service structure and allow the sales team to
capture share and penetration while maximizing service effectiveness by leveraging the Company’s ongoing
investments in digital technology. In February 2021, the Company expanded the Institutional Plan, and expect that
these restructuring charges will be completed in 2023, with total anticipated costs of $70 million ($55 million after tax).
The remaining costs are expected to be primarily cash expenditures for severance and non-cash related costs to
equipment disposals. Actual costs may vary from these estimates depending on actions taken.
Certain activities contemplated in this Institutional Plan were previously approved in 2020 and included as part of
Accelerate 2020. These activities were reclassified to the Institutional Plan. During 2022, 2021 and 2020, the
Company recorded restructuring charges of $6.3 million ($4.8 million after tax), $12.6 million ($10.2 million after tax)
and $35.2 million ($26.4 million after tax), respectively, primarily related to severance, disposals of equipment and
office closures. The Company has recorded $54.1 million ($41.4 million after tax) of cumulative restructuring charges
under the Institutional Plan. The liability related to the Institutional Plan was $1.9 million and $5.1 million as of
December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively, and is expected to be paid over a period of a few months to several
quarters and will continue to be funded from operating activities.
Restructuring activity related to the Institutional Plan since inception of the underlying actions includes the following:
Employee                
Termination Asset
(millions)     Costs     Disposals    Other     Total
2020 Activity
Recorded expense and accrual $25.6 $- $9.6 $35.2
Net cash payments (0.9) - (9.6) (10.5)
Restructuring liability, December 31, 2020 24.7 - - 24.7
2021 Activity
Recorded expense (income) and accrual ($1.8) $8.5 $5.9 $12.6
Net cash payments  (19.0) (4.7) (23.7)
Non-cash net charges  - (8.5) - (8.5)
Restructuring liability, December 31, 2021  3.9 - 1.2 5.1
2022 Activity
Recorded expense (income) and accrual   1.2 4.9 0.2  6.3
Net cash payments   (3.8) - (0.8)  (4.6)
Non-cash net charges   - (4.9) -  (4.9)
Restructuring liability, December 31, 2022 $1.3 $- $0.6 $1.9
Accelerate 2020
During 2018, the Company formally commenced a restructuring plan Accelerate 2020 (“the A2020 Plan”), to leverage
technology and systems investments and organizational changes. The goals of the Plan are to further simplify and
automate processes and tasks, reduce complexity and management layers, consolidate facilities and focus on key
long-term growth areas by further leveraging technology and structural improvements. During 2020, the Company
expanded the Plan for additional costs and savings to further leverage the technology and structural improvements.
The Company completed the plan with actual costs of $254 million ($198 million after tax) when revised for continuing
operations.
The Company recorded restructuring charges of $9.9 million ($8.4 million after tax), $5.3 million ($6.2 million after tax)
and $41.8 million ($33.0 million after tax) in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively, primarily related to severance. Of
these expenses, $0.3 million ($0.2 million after tax) during 2020 is recorded in other (income) expense and related to
pension settlements and curtailments. The liability related to this Restructuring Plan was $18.1 million and $32.7
million as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. The Company has recorded $254.4 million ($198.4 million
after tax) of cumulative restructuring charges under the Plan. The remaining liability is expected to be paid over a
period of a few months to several quarters and will continue to be funded from operating activities.
Table of Contents
68Restructuring activity related to the A2020 Plan since inception of the underlying actions includes the following:
    Employee                
Termination Asset
(millions)     Costs     Disposals    Other    Total
Restructuring liability, December 31, 2019 $94.0 $- $1.5 $95.5
2020 Activity
Recorded expense and accrual 29.5 7.8 4.5 41.8
Net cash payments  (56.8) - (1.0) (57.8)
Non-cash charges  - (7.8) - (7.8)
Effect of foreign currency translation  0.1 - - 0.1
Restructuring liability, December 31, 2020 66.8 - 5.0 71.8
2021 Activity
Recorded expense and accrual 4.3 0.3 0.7 5.3
Net cash payments  (39.1) - (5.0)  (44.1)
Non-cash charges  - (0.3) -  (0.3)
Restructuring liability, December 31, 2021 32.0 - 0.7 32.7
2022 Activity
Recorded expense (income) and accrual 5.4 1.9 2.6 9.9
Net cash payments  (21.8) - (0.8) (22.6)
Non-cash charges  - (1.9) - (1.9)
Restructuring liability, December 31, 2022 $15.6 $- $2.5 $18.1
Other Restructuring Activities
During 2022, 2021, and 2020, the Company recorded other restructuring charges of $23.8 million ($17.9 million after
tax), $18.7 million ($17.0 million after tax), and $1.8 million ($1.2 million after tax), respectively, related to other
immaterial restructuring activity. The charges are comprised primarily of severance and asset write-offs.
The restructuring liability balance for all other restructuring plans excluding Europe Program, the A2020 Plan and the
Institutional Plan was $23.2 million and $4.6 million as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. The increase in
liability was driven primarily by severance expense. The remaining liability is expected to be paid over a period of a
few months to several quarters and will continue to be funded from operating activities. Cash payments during 2022
related to all other restructuring plans excluding the Europe Program, the A2020 Plan and Institutional Plan were $5.2
million.
Acquisition and integration related costs
Acquisition and integration related costs reported in special (gains) and charges on the Consolidated Statements of
Income in 2022 include $14.5 million ($11.4 million after tax) related primarily to the Purolite Corporation (“Purolite”)
acquisition and consist of integration related costs and advisory and legal fees. Acquisition and integration related
costs reported in product and equipment cost of sales on the Consolidated Statements of Income in 2022 included
$25.0 million ($19.6 million after tax) related primarily to the recognition of fair value step-up in Purolite inventory and
other integration related costs.
Acquisition and integration related costs reported in special (gains) and charges on the Consolidated Statements of
Income include $29.9 million ($23.5 million after tax) in 2021. Charges are related primarily to the Purolite acquisition
and consisted of deal costs, integration costs and advisory and legal fees. Acquisition and integration costs reported in
product and equipment cost of sales on the Consolidated Statements of Income in 2021 include $4.2 million ($3.3
million after tax) and are related to the recognition of fair value step-up in the Purolite inventory. In conjunction with its
acquisitions, the Company incurred $0.8 million ($0.6 million after tax) of special (gains) and charges reported in
interest expense in 2021.
During 2020, acquisition and integration related costs reported in special (gains) and charges on the Consolidated
Statements of Income include $8.5 million ($6.9 million after tax). Charges are related to the Copal Invest NV,
including its primary operating entity CID Lines (collectively, “CID Lines”), Bioquell PLC (“Bioquell”) and the
Laboratoires Anios (“Anios”) acquisitions and consist of integration costs and advisory and legal fees. Acquisition and
integration costs reported in product and equipment cost of sales on the Consolidated Statements of Income in 2020
include $3.9 million ($3.2 million after tax) and are related to recognition of fair value step-up in CID Lines inventory,
severance and the closure of a facility. In conjunction with its acquisitions, the Company incurred $0.7 million ($0.6
million after tax) of special (gains) and charges reported in interest expense in 2020.
Table of Contents
69Disposal and impairment charges
Disposal and impairment charges reported in special (gains) and charges on the Consolidated Statements of Income
include $41.4 million ($41.5 million after tax) in 2020. During 2020, the Company recorded a $28.6 million ($28.6
million after tax) impairment for a minority equity method investment due to the COVID-19 impact on the economic
environment and the liquidity of the minority equity method investment. In addition, the Company recorded charges of
$12.8 million ($12.9 million after tax) related to the disposal of Holchem Group Limited (“Holchem”) for the loss on sale
and related transaction fees during 2020.
COVID-19 activities
The Company recorded inventory reserves of $15.0 million and $60.0 million during 2022 and 2021, respectively, for
excess sanitizer inventory and estimated disposal costs. The Company recorded charges of $2.4 million, $36.8 million
and $57.1 million during 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively, to protect the wages of certain employees directly
impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic. The Company recorded charges of $9.8 million, $16.5 million and $2.4 million
related to employee COVID-19 testing and related expenses during 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. In addition,
the Company received subsidies and government assistance, which were recorded as a special (gain) and charges of
($0.7) million, ($6.2) million and ($23.4) million during 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. COVID-19 pandemic
charges are recorded in product and equipment cost of sales, service and lease cost of sales, and special (gains) and
charges on the Consolidated Statements of Income. Total after tax net charges related to COVID-19 pandemic were
$20.2 million, $81.3 million and $27.4 million during 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Russia/Ukraine
In light of Russia’s invasion of Ukraine and the sanctions against Russia by the United States and other countries, the
Company has made the determination that it will limit the Company’s Russian business to operations that are
essential to life, providing minimal support for the Company’s healthcare, life sciences, food and beverage and certain
water businesses. The Company incurred charges of $13.1 million ($12.6 million after tax) during 2022, primarily
related to recoverability risk of certain assets in both Russia and Ukraine.
Other operating activities
Other operating activities recorded in special charges of $24.1 million ($18.2 million after tax) in 2022, $18.4 million
($14.1 million after tax) in 2021 and $34.7 million ($33.9 million after tax) in 2020 relate primarily to legal reserves and
certain legal charges, which are recorded in special (gains) and charges on the Consolidated Statements of Income.
In 2020, other operating activities recorded in special charges of $24.4 million ($16.0 million after tax) were recorded
in product and equipment cost of sales on the Consolidated Statements of Income related to a Healthcare product
recall in Europe.
The Company also recorded a $7.2 million special charge in 2020 related to the separation of ChampionX as a tax
expense on the Consolidated Statements of Income.
Other (income) expense
During 2022 and 2021, the Company incurred pension settlement expense recorded in other (income) expense on the
Consolidated Statements of Income of $50.6 million ($38.2 million after tax) and $37.2 million ($28.7 million after tax),
respectively, related to U.S. pension plan lump-sum payments to retirees.
Interest expense, net
During 2021 and 2020, the Company recorded special charges of $32.3 million ($28.4 million after tax) and $83.1
million ($64.0 million after tax), respectively, in interest expense on the Consolidated Statements of Income related to
debt issuance and refinancing charges.
Table of Contents
704. ACQUISITIONS AND DISPOSITIONS
Acquisitions
The Company makes business acquisitions that align with its strategic business objectives. The assets and liabilities
of acquired businesses are recorded in the Consolidated Balance Sheets based on estimates of the fair value of
assets acquired, liabilities assumed and noncontrolling interests acquired as of the acquisition date. Goodwill is
recognized in the amount that the purchase consideration paid exceeds the fair value of the net assets acquired.
Purchase consideration includes both cash paid and the fair value of noncash consideration exchanged, including
stock and/or contingent consideration exchanged, and is reduced by the amount of cash or cash equivalents acquired.
Acquisitions during 2021 and 2020 were not significant to the Company’s consolidated financial statements; therefore,
pro forma financial information is not presented.
2022 Activity
No acquisitions occurred during 2022.
2021 Activity
Purolite Acquisition
On December 1, 2021, the Company acquired Purolite for total consideration of $3,706 million in cash, net of cash
acquired. Purolite is a US-based business that is a leading and fast-growing global provider of resins for the
separation and purification of solutions that is highly complementary to the Company’s current offering and critical to
safe, high quality drug production and biopharma product purification in the life sciences industries. It also provides
purification and separation solutions for critical industrial markets like microelectronics, nuclear power and food and
beverage. Prior to acquisition, Purolite prepared its consolidated financial statements pursuant to the requirements of
UK GAAP.
The Purolite acquisition has been accounted for as a business combination with the assets acquired and liabilities
assumed recognized at fair value as of the acquisition date. The fair values of intangible assets acquired were
estimated using discounted cash flow analyses appropriate in the circumstances for the nature of the assets being
valued. The valuation models incorporated projections of future cash flows and other valuation assumptions.
Significant inputs and assumptions used in the Company’s customer relationship intangible asset valuations include
projected revenues, contributory asset charges, tax savings due to amortization, income tax rates, customer attrition
rates and discount rates. Significant inputs and assumptions used in the Company’s tradename and acquired
technology intangible asset valuations include projected revenues, future asset utilities, royalty rates, tax saving due to
amortization, income tax rates and discount rates.
The Company incurred certain transaction and integration costs associated with the acquisition that were expensed
and were recorded in the Consolidated Statements of Income. Further information related to the Company’s special
(gains) and charges is included in Note 3.
Purolite purchase accounting was finalized in the fourth quarter of 2022. The following table summarizes the final
value of Purolite assets acquired and liabilities assumed, net of cash acquired, as of the acquisition date:
(millions) December 1, 2021
Tangible assets $361.9
Identifiable intangible assets
Customer relationships 870.0
Other technologies  285.0
Trademarks 73.0
Total assets acquired  1,589.9
 
Goodwill 2,260.6
Total liabilities 144.8
Total consideration transferred to sellers, net of cash acquired  $3,705.7
During 2022, the Company recorded purchase accounting adjustments associated with the finalization of the purchase
accounting for its acquisition of Purolite. As a result of these purchase accounting adjustments, the Company made
$7.2 million of acquisition-related payments, acquisition related net tangible assets decreased by $54.0 million,
definite-lived intangible assets decreased by $185.4 million and goodwill increased by $246.6 million.
Tangible assets acquired primarily consist of accounts receivable of $61.6 million, property, plant and equipment of
$156.5 million and inventory of $122.4 million. Liabilities assumed primarily consist of deferred tax liabilities of $38.2
million and current liabilities of $77.6 million. Identified intangible assets primarily consist of customer relationships,
acquired technologies, and trade names and are being amortized over weighted average lives of 17, 14, and 5 years,
respectively, with a weighted average life of 15 years.
Table of Contents
71Goodwill of $2,260.6 million arising from the acquisition consists largely of the synergies and economies of scale
expected through adding complementary geographies and innovative products to the Company’s Life Sciences
businesses. Purolite became part of the Global Healthcare & Life Sciences reportable segment. Goodwill of $2,146.3
million is deductible for income tax purposes.
Other Acquisitions
In December 2020, the Company acquired VanBaerle Hygiene AG (“VanBaerle”), a Switzerland-based business which
sells cleaning products and related services to restaurants, long-term care facilities, hotels and laundries primarily for
institutional applications. VanBaerle became part of the Global Institutional & Specialty reporting segment. The
purchase price included immaterial amounts of holdback and contingent consideration, the remaining amounts of
which were settled prior to December 31, 2022. Purchase accounting was finalized in the fourth quarter of 2021.
In February 2021, the Company acquired TechTex Holdings Limited (“TechTex”), a U.K.-based business which sells
wet and dry wipes and other nonwovens products primarily for life sciences and healthcare applications. TechTex
became part of the Global Healthcare & Life Sciences reporting segment. The purchase price included an immaterial
holdback amount that was settled prior to December 31, 2021. Purchase accounting was finalized in the first quarter of
2022.
In July 2021, the Company acquired National Wiper Alliance, Inc. (“NWA”), a U.S.-based business which sells wipes
for healthcare and institutional applications. NWA became part of the Global Healthcare & Life Sciences reporting
segment. Purchase accounting was finalized in the third quarter of 2022.
In September 2021, the Company acquired EPN Water Col, Ltd. (“EPN”), a South Korean-based business which sells
chemical products and manages installations at water treatment chemical injection facilities. EPN became part of the
Global Industrial reporting segment. Purchase accounting was finalized in the fourth quarter of 2022.
The goodwill related to the acquisitions of VanBaerle, TechTex, or EPN is not tax deductible, whereas the goodwill
arising from the acquisition of NWA is tax deductible.
2020 Activity
CID Lines Acquisition
On May 11, 2020, the Company acquired CID Lines for total consideration of $506.9 million in cash, net of cash
acquired. CID Lines, a Belgian-based business is a leading global provider of livestock biosecurity and hygiene
solutions.
The CID Lines acquisition has been accounted for as a business combination with the assets acquired and liabilities
assumed recognized at fair value as of the acquisition date. The Company incurred certain transaction and integration
costs associated with the acquisition that were expensed and recorded in the Consolidated Statements of Income.
Further information related to the Company’s special (gains) and charges is included in Note 3.
CID Lines purchase accounting was finalized in the second quarter of 2021. The following table summarizes the final
value of CID Lines assets acquired and liabilities assumed, net of cash acquired, as of the acquisition date:
(millions) May 11, 2020
Tangible assets $54.1
Identifiable intangible assets
Customer relationships 147.5
Trademarks  58.6
Acquired technologies and product registrations  47.7
Total assets acquired  307.9
 
Goodwill 274.8
Total liabilities 97.2
Total consideration transferred to sellers, net of cash acquired  $485.5
Tangible assets acquired primarily consist of accounts receivable of $30.1 million, property, plant and equipment of
$7.7 million and inventory of $16.3 million. Liabilities assumed primarily consist of deferred tax liabilities of $64.8
million and current liabilities of $32.4 million. Identified intangible assets primarily consist of customer relationships,
trademarks, and acquired technology and product registrations and are being amortized over weighted average lives
of 14, 14, and 16 years, respectively, with a weighted average life of 14 years.
 
Goodwill of $274.8 million arising from the acquisition consists largely of the synergies and economies of scale
expected through adding complementary geographies and innovative products to the Company’s Food and Beverage
businesses. CID Lines became part of the Global Industrial reportable segment. None of the goodwill recognized from
the acquisition is expected to be deductible for income tax purposes.
Table of Contents
72During 2021, the Company recorded purchase accounting adjustments associated with the finalization of the purchase
accounting for its acquisition of CID Lines. As a result of these adjustments, the Company decreased goodwill
recognized from the acquisition of CID Lines by $0.9 million.
Acquisitions
The components of the cash paid for other acquisitions, excluding the Purolite and CID Lines acquisitions (as further
disclosed above), for 2022, 2021 and 2020, are shown in the following table:
(millions) 2022     2021     2020
Net tangible assets acquired $- $3.6 $-
Identifiable intangible assets
Customer relationships   - 75.0 -
Trademarks   - 4.7 -
Non-compete agreements   - 3.0 -
Other technologies - 1.5 -
Total intangible assets   - 84.2 -
Goodwill   -  140.6 -
Total aggregate purchase price   -  228.4  -
Acquisition-related liabilities and contingent consideration (a)   -  (4.4) -
Total cash paid for acquisitions, including acquisition-related
liabilities and contingent consideration, net of cash acquired $- $224.0 $-
(a)Subsequent to the acquisitions, $1.4 in contingent consideration was remitted to the seller during 2021 and is
included in investing activities on the Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows.
During 2022, the Company recorded purchase accounting adjustments associated with the finalization of the purchase
accounting for its acquisitions of TechTex, NWA and EPN. As a result of these purchase accounting adjustments,
acquisition related net tangible assets decreased by $1.6 million, definite-lived intangible assets decreased by $5.6
million, and goodwill increased by $7.2 million.
The weighted average useful lives of definite-lived intangible assets acquired from other acquisitions were 13 years for
acquisitions completed in 2021.
Dispositions
In the second quarter of 2020, the Company completed the sale of Holchem, a U.K.-based supplier of hygiene and
cleaning products and services for the food and beverage, foodservice and hospitality industries for total consideration
of $106.6 million. Consideration consisted of $55.4 million of cash and the receipt of notes valued at $51.2 million from
the acquirer. In the fourth quarter of 2020, all outstanding principal and interest on the notes was paid by the acquirer.
After the recognition of transaction costs, the Company recognized an after-tax loss of $12.8 million, which was
classified within special charges in the Consolidated Statements of Income. Holchem was included in the Global
Industrial reportable segment prior to disposition.
As discussed in Note 5, the ChampionX separation met the criteria to be reported as discontinued operations. No
other dispositions were significant to the Company’s consolidated financial statements for 2022, 2021 or 2020.
Table of Contents
735. DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS
On June 3, 2020, the Company effected the split-off of ChampionX through an offer to exchange (the “Exchange
Offer”) all shares of ChampionX common stock owned by Ecolab for outstanding shares of Ecolab common stock. In
the Exchange Offer, which was oversubscribed, the Company accepted approximately 5.0 million shares of Ecolab
common stock in exchange for approximately 122.2 million shares of ChampionX common stock. In the Merger, each
outstanding share of ChampionX common stock was converted into the right to receive one share of Apergy common
stock, and ChampionX survived the Merger as a wholly owned subsidiary of ChampionX Corporation. In connection
with and in accordance with the terms of the Transaction, prior to the consummation of the Exchange Offer and the
Merger, ChampionX distributed $527.4 million in cash to Ecolab.
The following is a summary of the assets and liabilities transferred to ChampionX as part of the separation:
(millions)
Assets:  
Cash and cash equivalent  $60.6
Current assets  810.5
Non-current assets  3,222.3
4,093.4
Liabilities:
Current liabilities 313.0
Non-current liabilities 293.7
606.7
Net assets distributed to ChampionX ($3,486.7)
Fair value of shares exchanged 1,051.4
Cash received from ChampionX 527.4
Consideration received less net assets (1,907.9)
ChampionX cumulative translation adjustment ("CTA") write-off (229.9)
Loss on separation ($2,137.8)
The Company accounted for this transaction as a sale and recognized a loss based on ChampionX net assets
exceeding the effective proceeds.
The ChampionX business, as discussed in Note 1, met the criteria to be reported as discontinued operations because
the separation of the ChampionX business was a strategic shift in business that had a major effect on the Company’s
operations and financial results. The historical financial results of the ChampionX business are reflected in the
Company’s consolidated financial statements as discontinued operations, for all periods presented, and assets and
liabilities were retrospectively reclassified as assets and liabilities of discontinued operations.
Summarized results of the Company’s discontinued operations are as follows:
(millions) 2022 2021 2020
Product and equipment sales $- $- $858.9
Service and lease sales - - 99.6
Net sales - - 958.5
Product and equipment cost of sales - - 621.7
Service and lease cost of sales - - 80.4
Cost of sales (including special charges) - - 702.1
Selling, general and administrative expenses - - 180.5
Special (gains) and charges - - 2,221.7
Operating income -  - (2,145.8)
Other (income) expense - - 0.3
Interest expense (income), net - - 0.2
Income before income taxes -  - (2,146.3)
Provision for income taxes - - 24.0
Net loss including noncontrolling interest -  - (2,170.3)
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interest - - 2.2
Net loss from discontinued operations, net of tax $- $- ($2,172.5)
Special (gains) and charges of $2,221.7 million in 2020 primarily relate to the loss on sale, professional fees incurred
to support the Transaction and restructuring charges specifically related to the ChampionX business. These charges
have been included as a component of both cost of sales and special (gains) and charges in discontinued operations.
The Company also recognized discrete tax expense primarily related to friction costs associated with ChampionX 
separation activity of  $22.7 million during 2020 that is allocated within discontinued operations tax expense.
Table of Contents
74In connection with the Transaction, the Company entered into agreements with ChampionX and Apergy to effect the
separation and to provide a framework for the relationship following the separation, which included a Separation and
Distribution Agreement, an Intellectual Property Matters Agreement, an Employee Matters Agreement, a Transition
Services Agreement, and a Tax Matters Agreement. Transition services primarily involve the Company providing
certain services to ChampionX related to general and administrative services for terms of up to 18 months following
the separation. The amounts billed for transition services provided under the above agreements were $12.5 million
and $14.3 million during 2021 and 2020, respectively.
The Company also entered into a Master Cross Supply and Product Transfer agreement with ChampionX to provide,
receive or transfer certain products for a period up to 36 months. Sales of product to ChampionX under this agreement
are recorded in product and equipment sales in the Corporate segment along with the related cost of sales, while
purchases from ChampionX are recorded in inventory. Sales of product to ChampionX post-separation for 2022, 2021
and 2020 were $124.0 million, $139.4 million and $99.7 million, respectively. As of December 31, 2022, the Company
had an outstanding accounts receivable balance for sales of product to ChampionX of $12.9 million.
Table of Contents
756. BALANCE SHEET INFORMATION
December 31 December 31
(millions)     2022 2021
Accounts receivable, net
Accounts receivable $2,829.0 $2,549.9
Allowance for expected credit losses and other accruals (130.9) (71.5)
Total $2,698.1 $2,478.4
Inventories
Finished goods $1,122.7 $1,010.6
Raw materials and parts 849.2 596.1
Inventories at FIFO cost 1,971.9 1,606.7
FIFO cost to LIFO cost difference (179.1) (114.9)
Total $1,792.8 $1,491.8
Other current assets
Prepaid assets $123.9 $121.2
Taxes receivable 184.1 151.3
Derivative assets 57.5 61.4
Other 39.2 23.1
Total $404.7 $357.0
Property, plant and equipment, net
Land $161.3 $159.2
Buildings and leasehold improvements 1,126.9 1,134.1
Machinery and equipment 1,966.3 1,968.7
Merchandising and customer equipment 2,635.5 2,708.2
Capitalized software 962.1 884.6
Construction in progress 403.8 325.0
7,255.9 7,179.8
Accumulated depreciation (3,962.5) (3,891.3)
Total $3,293.4 $3,288.5
Other intangible assets, net
Intangible assets not subject to amortization
Trade names $1,230.0 $1,230.0
Intangible assets subject to amortization
Customer relationships 3,292.8 3,444.6
Patents 497.0 496.3
Trademarks 404.0 561.1
Other technologies 518.8 527.2
4,712.6 5,029.2
Accumulated amortization
Customer relationships (1,581.7) (1,440.9)
Patents (292.3) (269.3)
Trademarks (202.5) (170.3)
Other technologies (185.4) (154.6)
(2,261.9) (2,035.1)
Net intangible assets subject to amortization 2,450.7 2,994.1
Total $3,680.7 $4,224.1
Other assets
Deferred income taxes $108.1 $120.6
Pension 118.4 114.6
Derivative asset 44.5 29.4
Other 264.1 281.4
Total $535.1 $546.0
Table of Contents
76December 31 December 31
(millions)     2022 2021
Other current liabilities
Discounts and rebates $357.8 $341.1
Dividends payable 150.8 146.3
Interest payable 58.7 47.7
Taxes payable, other than income 162.9 154.2
Derivative liabilities 21.9 -
Restructuring 100.6 39.1
Contract liability 116.5 91.7
Operating lease liabilities 108.3 115.1
Other 208.4 209.0
Total $1,285.9 $1,144.2
Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss)
Unrealized gain (loss) on derivative financial instruments, net of tax $3.7 $4.9
Unrecognized pension and postretirement benefit expense, net of tax (467.4) (632.8)
Cumulative translation, net of tax (1,262.9) (1,006.9)
Total ($1,726.6) ($1,634.8)
7. DEBT AND INTEREST
Short-term Debt
The following table provides the components of the Company’s short-term debt obligations, along with applicable
interest rates as of December 31, 2022 and 2021:
2022 2021
        Average            Average
Carrying Interest Carrying Interest
(millions)     Value Rate Value Rate
Short-term debt
Commercial paper $- -% $400.0 0.28%  
Notes payable  3.7 7.28%  8.5 7.95%  
Long-term debt, current maturities  501.4  2.5
Total $505.1 $411.0
Line of Credit
As of December 31, 2022, the Company had in place a $2.0 billion multi-currency revolving credit facility which expires
in April 2026. The credit facility has been established with a diverse syndicate of banks and supports the Company’s
U.S. and Euro commercial paper programs. There were no borrowings under the Company’s credit facility as of
December 31, 2022 and 2021.
The Company has $337 million of available bank supported letters of credit, surety bonds and guarantees available in
support of its commercial business transactions of which $144 million is outstanding as of December 31, 2022.
Commercial Paper
The Company’s commercial paper program is used as a potential source of liquidity and consists of a $2.0 billion U.S.
commercial paper program and a $2.0 billion Euro commercial paper program. The maximum aggregate amount of
commercial paper that may be issued by the Company under its commercial paper programs may not exceed $2.0
billion.
The Company had $400 million outstanding commercial paper under its U.S. program as of December 31, 2021.
As of December 31, 2022, the Company’s short-term borrowing program was rated A-2 by Standard & Poor’s, P-2 by
Moody’s and F-1 by Fitch.
Notes Payable
The Company’s notes payable consists of uncommitted credit lines with major international banks and financial
institutions, primarily to support global cash pooling structures. As of December 31, 2022 and 2021, the Company had
$3.7 million and $8.5 million, respectively, outstanding under these credit lines. Approximately $1,925 million and
$1,628 million of these credit lines were available for use as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively.
Table of Contents
Long-term Debt
The following table provides the components of the Company’s long-term debt obligations, along with applicable
interest rates as of December 31, 2022 and 2021:
        2022         2021          
StatedEffective Stated Effective
Maturity CarryingInterestInterestCarrying InterestInterest
(millions) by Year Value Rate Rate Value Rate Rate
Long-term debt
Public notes (2022 principal amount)
Two year 2021 senior notes ($500
million) 2023 $498.70.90%  1.19% $497.2 0.90%  1.19%
Seven year 2016 senior notes (€575
million) 2024 596.91.00%  1.03% 649.3 1.00%  1.19%
Ten year 2015 senior notes (€575
million) 2025  596.7 2.63%  2.81% 649.7 2.63%  2.87%
Ten year 2016 senior notes ($750
million) 2026 721.12.70%  3.21% 744.9 2.70%  2.89%
Ten year 2017 senior notes ($500
million) 2027 433.93.25%  4.77% 488.4 3.25%  2.89%
Six Year 2021 senior notes ($500
million) 2027 496.51.65%  1.83% 495.7 1.65%  1.84%
Five Year 2022 senior notes ($500
million) 2028 492.75.25%  5.36% - -%  -%
Ten year 2020 senior notes ($698
million) 2030 653.54.80%  3.72% 709.1 4.80%  4.06%
Ten year 2020 senior notes ($600
million) 2031 555.21.30%  1.70% 593.4 1.30%  1.39%
Eleven year 2021 senior notes ($650
million) 2032 644.62.13%  2.24% 644.0 2.13%  2.24%
Thirty year 2011 senior notes ($389
million) 2041 384.5 5.50%  5.62% 384.3 5.50%  5.63%
Thirty year 2016 senior notes ($200
million) 2046 197.3 3.70%  3.81% 197.2 3.70%  3.81%
Thirty year 2017 senior notes ($484
million) 2047 425.53.95%  4.79% 424.3 3.95%  4.80%
Thirty year 2020 senior notes ($500
million) 2050 490.72.13%  2.23% 490.4 2.13%  2.24%
Thirty year 2021 senior notes ($850
million) 2051 838.92.70%  2.78% 838.5 2.70%  2.78%
Thirty-four year 2021 senior notes ($685
million) 2055 537.22.75%  3.86% 535.3 2.75%  3.87%
Finance lease obligations and other  12.8  8.0
Total debt  8,576.7  8,349.7
Long-term debt, current maturities  (501.4)  (2.5)
Total long-term debt $8,075.3 $8,347.2
Public Notes
In November 2022, the Company issued $500 million in aggregate principal five year fixed rate notes with a coupon
rate of 5.25% (“New 5-Year Note”). The proceeds are intended to be used for general corporate purposes, which may
include, without limitation, repayment of commercial paper borrowings or other indebtedness. The notes mature
January 2028.
In December 2021, the Company issued $2.5 billion in notes to repay the $3.0 billion delayed draw term loan used to
fund the Purolite acquisition. These notes were comprised of $500 million 0.9% notes due 2023, $500 million 1.65%
notes due 2027, $650 million 2.125% notes due 2032, and $850 million 2.7% notes due 2051.
In August 2021, the Company completed a private offering of a $300 million aggregate principal 34-year fixed rate
notes with a coupon rate of 2.75% (“New 34-year Notes”). Immediately following the offering, the Company completed
a private offering to exchange a portion of the outstanding senior notes due 2030, 2041, 2046, 2047 (“Old Notes”), for
$385 million of New 34-year Notes. In connection with the exchange offering, $387 million of Old Notes were validly
tendered and subsequently cancelled.
During the fourth quarter of 2021, pursuant to a registration rights agreement pertaining to the New 34-year Notes, the
Company filed a registration statement regarding an offer to exchange each series of the New 34-year Notes for new
issues of notes registered under the U.S. Securities Act of 1933, as amended. The registration statement was
declared effective, and substantially all of the New 34-year Notes were exchanged. The terms of each series of the
new notes are substantially identical to the terms of the applicable series of New 34-year Notes, except that the new
notes are registered as mentioned above and the transfer restrictions and registration rights and related special
interest provisions applicable to the New 34-year Notes do not apply to the new notes.
The New 34-year Notes bear a lower fixed coupon rate on an extended maturity date, compared with the Old Notes
that were exchanged. There were no other significant changes to the terms between the Old Notes and the New 34-
year Notes. The exchange was accounted for as a debt modification, and there were cash payments to the note
holders of $118 million as a result of the exchange. Existing deferred financing costs associated with the Old Notes, as
well as discounts associated with the New 34-year Notes aggregating $143 million, are being amortized over the term
of the New 34-year Notes and recorded as interest expense.
77In September 2021, the Company completed the retirement of the $500 million 2.375% Notes due 2022 and the $400
million 3.25% Notes due 2023 which was accounted for as a debt extinguishment. A make-whole premium of $25.0
million was expensed immediately and is reflected as a financing cash flow activity.
Table of Contents
78The Company’s public notes may be redeemed by the Company at its option at redemption prices that include
accrued and unpaid interest and a make-whole premium. Upon the occurrence of a change of control accompanied by
a downgrade of the public notes below investment grade rating, within a specified time period, the Company would be
required to offer to repurchase the public notes at a price equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount thereof,
plus any accrued and unpaid interest to the date of repurchase. The public notes are senior unsecured and
unsubordinated obligations of the Company and rank equally with all other senior and unsubordinated indebtedness of
the Company.
Covenants and Future Maturities
The Company is in compliance with all covenants under the Company’s outstanding indebtedness at December 31,
2022.
As of December 31, 2022, the aggregate annual maturities of long-term debt for the next five years were:
(millions)         
2023 $501
2024  607
2025  597
2026  721
2027  930
Net Interest Expense
Interest expense and interest income incurred during 2022, 2021 and 2020 were as follows:
(millions) 2022     2021     2020
Interest expense $252.1 $230.6 $304.8
Interest income   (8.5)  (12.3)  (14.6)
Interest expense, net $243.6 $218.3 $290.2
Interest expense generally includes the expense associated with the interest on the Company’s outstanding
borrowings. Interest expense also includes the amortization of debt issuance costs and debt discounts, which are both
recognized over the term of the related debt.
During 2021, the Company issued, exchanged and retired certain long-term debt, incurring debt refinancing charges of
$32.3 million ($28.4 million after tax), which are included as a component of interest expense, net on the Consolidated
Statements of Income.
During 2020, the Company retired certain long-term debt, and incurred debt refinancing charges of $83.1 million
($64.0 million after tax), which are included as a component of interest expense, net on the Consolidated Statements
of Income.
Table of Contents
798. FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
The Company’s financial instruments include cash and cash equivalents, accounts receivable, accounts payable,
contingent consideration obligations, commercial paper, notes payable, foreign currency forward contracts, interest
rate swap agreements, cross-currency swap derivative contracts and long-term debt.
Fair value is defined as the amount that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability in an orderly
transaction between market participants as of the measurement date. A hierarchy has been established for inputs
used in measuring fair value that maximizes the use of observable inputs and minimizes the use of unobservable
inputs by requiring the most observable inputs be used when available. The hierarchy is broken down into three levels:
Level 1 - Inputs are quoted prices in active markets that are accessible at the measurement date for identical assets or
liabilities.
Level 2 - Inputs include observable inputs other than quoted prices in active markets.
Level 3 - Inputs are unobservable inputs for which there is little or no market data available.
The carrying amount and the estimated fair value for assets and liabilities measured on a recurring basis were:
December 31, 2022
(millions) Carrying Fair Value Measurements
    Amount    Level 1 Level 2    Level 3
Assets
Foreign currency forward contracts   $118.9 $-  $118.9  $-
Cross-currency swap derivative contracts 58.7 - 58.7 -
  
Liabilities
Foreign currency forward contracts 83.3 - 83.3 -
Interest rate swap agreements 181.4 - 181.4 -
Cross-currency swap derivative contracts 14.5 - 14.5 -
December 31, 2021
(millions) Carrying Fair Value Measurements
    Amount     Level 1 Level 2    Level 3
Assets
Foreign currency forward contracts  $94.5 $-  $94.5  $-
Interest rate swap agreements 1.8 - 1.8 -
Cross-currency swap derivative contracts 9.4 - 9.4 -
Liabilities
Foreign currency forward contracts  12.6 - 12.6 -
Interest rate swap agreements 10.1 - 10.1 -
Cross-currency swap derivative contracts 1.6 - 1.6 -
The carrying value of foreign currency forward contracts are at fair value, which are determined based on foreign
currency exchange rates as of the balance sheet date and classified within Level 2. The carrying value of interest rate
swap agreements are at fair value, which are determined based on current forward interest rates as of the balance
sheet date and are classified within Level 2. The cross-currency swap derivative contracts are used to partially hedge
the Company’s net investments in foreign operations against adverse movements in exchange rates between the U.S.
dollar and the Euro. The carrying value of the cross-currency swap derivative contracts are at fair value, which are
determined based on the income approach with the relevant interest rates and foreign currency current exchange
rates and forward curves as inputs as of the balance sheet date and are classified within Level 2. For purposes of fair
value disclosure above, derivative values are presented gross. Further discussion of gross versus net presentation of
the Company's derivatives within Note 9.
Contingent consideration obligations are recognized and measured at fair value at the acquisition date and thereafter
until settlement or expiration. Contingent consideration is classified within Level 3 as the underlying fair value is
determined using income-based valuation approaches appropriate for the terms and conditions of each respective
contingent consideration. The consideration expected to be transferred is based on the Company’s expectations of
various financial measures. The ultimate payment of contingent consideration could deviate from current estimates
based on the actual results of these financial measures. Contingent consideration during 2022, 2021 and 2020 were
not significant to the Company’s consolidated financial statements.
The carrying values of accounts receivable, accounts payable, cash and cash equivalents, commercial paper and
notes payable approximate fair value because of their short maturities, and as such are classified within Level 1.
The fair value of long-term debt is based on quoted market prices for the same or similar debt instruments (classified
as Level 2). The carrying amount, which includes adjustments related to the impact of interest rate swap agreements,
premiums and discounts, and deferred debt issuance costs, and the estimated fair value of long-term debt, including
current maturities, held by the Company were:
December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Carrying Fair Carrying Fair
    Amount    Value     Amount    Value
Long-term debt, including current maturities $8,576.6 $7,643.6 $8,349.7 $9,085.3
Table of Contents
809. DERIVATIVES AND HEDGING TRANSACTIONS
The Company uses foreign currency forward contracts, interest rate swap agreements, cross-currency swap derivative
contracts and foreign currency debt to manage risks associated with foreign currency exchange rates, interest rates
and net investments in foreign operations. The Company does not hold derivative financial instruments of a
speculative nature or for trading purposes. The Company records derivatives as assets and liabilities on the balance
sheet at fair value. Changes in fair value are recognized immediately in earnings unless the derivative qualifies and is
designated as a hedge. Cash flows from derivatives are classified in the statement of cash flows in the same category
as the cash flows from the items subject to designated hedge or undesignated (economic) hedge relationships. The
Company evaluates hedge effectiveness at inception and on an ongoing basis. If a derivative is no longer expected to
be effective, hedge accounting is discontinued.
The Company is exposed to credit risk in the event of nonperformance of counterparties for foreign currency forward
exchange contracts and interest rate swap agreements. The Company monitors its exposure to credit risk by using
credit approvals and credit limits and by selecting major global banks and financial institutions as counterparties. The
Company does not anticipate nonperformance by any of these counterparties, and therefore, recording a valuation
allowance against the Company’s derivative balance is not considered necessary.
Derivative Positions Summary
Certain of the Company’s derivative transactions are subject to master netting arrangements that allow the Company
to net settle contracts with the same counterparties. These arrangements generally do not call for collateral and as of
the applicable dates presented in the following table, no cash collateral had been received or pledged related to the
underlying derivatives.
The respective net amounts are included in other current assets, other assets, other current liabilities and other
liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
The following table summarizes the gross fair value and the net value of the Company’s outstanding derivatives:
Derivative Assets Derivative Liabilities
December 31December 31 December 31December 31
(millions)     2022 2021     2022 2021  
Derivatives designated as hedging
instruments
Foreign currency forward contracts $78.6 $44.7 $9.2 $2.6
Interest rate swap agreements - 1.8 181.4 10.1
Cross-currency swap derivative contracts 58.7 9.4 14.5 1.6
Derivatives not designated as hedging
instruments
Foreign currency forward contracts 40.3 49.8 74.1 10.0
Gross value of derivatives 177.6 105.7 279.2 24.3
Gross amounts offset in the Consolidated
Balance Sheets (75.6) (14.9) (75.6) (14.9)
Net value of derivatives $102.0 $90.8 $203.6 $9.4
The following table summarizes the notional values of the Company’s outstanding derivatives:
Notional Values
December 31December 31
(millions)     2022     2021
Foreign currency forward contracts $5,745 $4,059
Interest rate swap agreements 1,500 1,250
Cross-currency swap derivative contracts 650 482
Cash Flow Hedges
The Company utilizes foreign currency forward contracts to hedge the effect of foreign currency exchange rate
fluctuations on forecasted foreign currency transactions, including inventory purchases and intercompany royalty,
intercompany loans, management fee and other payments. These forward contracts are designated as cash flow
hedges. The changes in fair value of these contracts are recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss)
(“AOCI”) until the hedged items affect earnings, at which time the gain or loss is reclassified into the same line item in
the Consolidated Statements of Income as the underlying exposure being hedged. Cash flow hedged transactions
impacting AOCI are forecasted to occur within the next year. For forward contracts designated as hedges of foreign
currency exchange rate risk associated with forecasted foreign currency transactions, the Company excludes the
changes in fair value attributable to time value from the assessment of hedge effectiveness. The initial value of the
excluded component (i.e., the forward points) is amortized on a straight-line basis over the life of the hedging
instrument and recognized in the same line item in the Consolidated Statements of Income as the underlying exposure
being hedged for intercompany loans. For all other cash flow hedge types, the forward points are mark-to-market
monthly and recognized in the same line item in the Consolidated Statements of Income as the underlying exposure
being hedged. The difference between fair value changes of the excluded component and the amount amortized in the
Consolidated Statements of Income is recorded in AOCI.
Table of Contents
81Fair Value Hedges
The Company manages interest expense using a mix of fixed and floating rate debt. To help manage exposure to
interest rate movements and to reduce borrowing costs, the Company may enter into interest rate swaps under which
the Company agrees to exchange, at specified intervals, the difference between fixed and floating interest amounts
calculated by reference to an agreed upon notional principal amount. The mark-to-market of these fair value hedges is
recorded as gains or losses in interest (income) expense and is offset by the gain or loss of the underlying debt
instrument, which also is recorded in interest (income) expense. These fair value hedges are highly effective and thus,
there is no impact on earnings due to hedge ineffectiveness.
In April 2022, the Company entered into an interest rate swap agreement that converted $250 million of its 4.8% debt
from a fixed interest rate to a floating interest rate. In aggregate, the Company has entered into a series of interest rate
swap agreements to convert $1.5 billion of its debt from a fixed interest rate to a floating interest rate. The fixed
interest rates range from 1.3% to 4.8% and mature between 2026 and 2031. All of these interest rate swaps are
designated as fair value hedges.
The following amounts were recorded in the Consolidated Balance Sheets related to cumulative basis adjustments for
fair value hedges:
Line item in which the hedged
item is includedCarrying amount of the hedged
liabilitiesCumulative amount of the fair value
hedging adjustment included in the
carrying amount of the hedged
liabilities
(millions) 2022     2021 2020 2022     2021 2020
Long-term debt $1,317.5 $1,235.6 $- ($184.8) ($12.1) $-
Net Investment Hedges
The Company designates its outstanding €1,150 million ($1,194 million as of year-end 2022) senior notes
(“Euronotes”) and related accrued interest as a hedge of its Euro denominated exposures from the Company’s
investments in certain of its Euro denominated functional currency subsidiaries.
In October of 2022, the Company entered into a cross-currency swap derivative contract with a notional amount of
€200 million maturing in 2026. In aggregate, the Company has entered into a series of cross-currency swap derivative
contracts with a notional amount of €625 million maturing between 2026 and 2030. These cross-currency swap
derivative contracts are designated as net investment hedge of the Company’s Euro denominated exposures from the
Company’s investments in certain of its Euro denominated functional currency subsidiaries. The cross-currency swap
derivative contracts exchange fixed-rate payments in one currency for fixed-rate payments in another currency. As of
December 31, 2022, the Company had a €625 million ($650 million) cross-currency swap derivative contracts
outstanding as a hedge of the Company’s net investment in foreign operations. The changes in the spot rate of these
instruments are recorded in AOCI in stockholders’ equity, partially offsetting the foreign currency translation adjustment
of the Company’s related net investment that is also recorded in AOCI. Any ineffective portions of net investment
hedges are reclassified from AOCI into earnings during the period of change. The interest income or expense from
these swaps are recorded in interest expense on the accompanying Consolidated Statements of Income consistent
with the classification of interest expense attributable to the underlying debt.
The revaluation gains and losses on the Euronotes and cross-currency swap derivative, which are designated and
effective as hedges of the Company’s net investments, have been included as a component of the cumulative
translation adjustment account, and were as follows:
(millions) 2022     2021     2020
Revaluation gain (loss), net of tax:
Euronotes $81.9 $45.3 ($87.7)
Cross-currency swap derivative contracts 26.4 6.3 -
Total revaluation gain (loss), net of tax $108.3 $51.6 ($87.7)
Table of Contents
82Derivatives Not Designated as Hedging Instruments
The Company also uses foreign currency forward contracts to offset its exposure to the change in value of certain
foreign currency denominated assets and liabilities held at foreign subsidiaries, primarily receivables and payables,
which are remeasured at the end of each period. Although the contracts are effective economic hedges, they are not
designated as accounting hedges. Therefore, changes in the value of these derivatives are recognized immediately in
earnings, thereby offsetting the current earnings effect of the related foreign currency denominated assets and
liabilities.
Effect of all Derivative Instruments on Income
The gain (loss) of all derivative instruments recognized in product and equipment cost of sales (“COS”), selling,
general and administrative expenses (“SG&A”) and interest expense, net (“interest”) is summarized below:
2022 2021 2020
(millions) COSSG&AInterest    COSSG&AInterest COS SG&AInterest
Gain (loss) on derivatives in cash
flow hedging relationship:
Foreign currency forward
contracts
Amount of gain (loss)
reclassified from AOCI to
income $6.4$95.0 $- ($11.0)$47.6 $- $10.1($108.3) $-
Amount excluded from the
assessment of effectiveness
recognized in earnings based
on changes in fair value - - 13.9 - - 21.0 - - 27.5
Interest rate swap agreements
Amount of gain (loss)
reclassified from AOCI to
income - - (2.3) - - (2.3) - - (2.4)
Gain (loss) on derivatives not
designated as hedging
instruments:
Foreign currency forward
contracts
Amount of gain (loss)
recognized in income (a) - 62.0 - - 73.7 - - (12.3) -
Total gain (loss) of all derivative
instruments $6.4$157.0 $11.6 ($11.0)$121.3$18.7 $10.1($120.6)$25.1
(a)Gain (loss) on derivatives not designated as hedging instruments recognized in income recorded in SG&A
includes discontinued operations of $(2.5) for the year ended December 31, 2020.
Table of Contents
8310. OTHER COMPREHENSIVE INCOME (LOSS) INFORMATION
Other comprehensive income (loss) includes net income, foreign currency translation adjustments, defined benefit
pension and postretirement plan adjustments, gains and losses on derivative instruments designated and effective as
cash flow hedges and non-derivative instruments designated and effective as foreign currency net investment hedges
that are charged or credited to the AOCI account in shareholders’ equity.
The following table provides other comprehensive income (loss) information related to the Company’s derivatives and
hedging instruments and pension and postretirement benefits. Refer to Note 9 for additional information related to the
Company’s derivatives and hedging transactions. Refer to Note 17 for additional information related to the Company’s
pension and postretirement benefits activity.
(millions) 2022    2021    2020
Derivative and Hedging Instruments
Unrealized gain (loss) on derivative & hedging instruments
Amount recognized in AOCI $112.9 $87.5 ($93.3)
(Gain) loss reclassified from AOCI into income
COS (6.4) 11.0 (10.1)
SG&A  (95.0) (47.6) 108.3
Interest (income) expense, net (11.6) (18.7) (25.1)
 (113.0) (55.3) 73.1
Other activity  1.1 (1.7) (0.3)
Tax impact  (2.2) (4.5) 3.5
Net of tax ($1.2) $26.0 ($17.0)
Pension and Postretirement Benefits
Amount recognized in AOCI
Current period net gain (loss) $83.3 $270.7 ($189.9)
Amount reclassified from AOCI into income
Settlement charge 51.6 38.8 -
Amortization of losses and prior period service credits, net 47.7 78.6 68.1
 182.6 388.1 (121.8)
Tax impact  (52.3) (98.4) 43.7
Net of tax $130.3 $289.7 ($78.1)
11. SHAREHOLDERS’ EQUITY
Authorized common stock, par value $1.00 per share, was 800 million shares at December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020.
Treasury stock is stated at cost. Dividends declared per share of common stock were $2.06 for 2022, $1.95 for 2021
and $1.89 for 2020.
The Company has 15 million shares, without par value, of authorized but unissued and undesignated preferred stock.
Share Repurchase Authorization
In February 2015 and November 2022, the Company’s Board of Directors authorized the repurchase of up to 20
million and 10 million, respectively, additional shares of its common stock, including shares to be repurchased under
Rule 10b5-1. As of December 31, 2022, 12,917,097 shares remained to be repurchased under the Company’s
repurchase authorization. The Company intends to repurchase all shares under its authorization, for which no
expiration date has been established, in open market or privately negotiated transactions, subject to market
conditions.
Share Repurchases
During 2022, 2021 and 2020, the Company reacquired 3,038,107, 502,132 and 761,245 shares, respectively, of its
common stock, of which 2,933,090, 389,759 and 565,064, respectively, related to share repurchases through open
market or private purchases, and 105,017, 112,373 and 196,181, respectively, related to shares withheld for taxes on
exercise of stock options and vesting of stock awards and units.
The IRA was signed into U.S. law on August 16, 2022 and is effective January 1, 2023. The IRA includes an excise tax
on the repurchase of corporate stock. The Company does not anticipate the excise tax to have a material impact on
the Company’s financial statements.
Separation of ChampionX
In June 2020, the Company effected the split-off of ChampionX through the Exchange Offer and all shares of
ChampionX common stock owned by Ecolab were exchanged for outstanding shares of Ecolab common stock. In the
Exchange Offer, which was oversubscribed, the Company accepted 4,955,552 shares of Ecolab common stock in
exchange for approximately 122,200,000 shares of ChampionX common stock.
Table of Contents
8412. EQUITY COMPENSATION PLANS
The Company’s equity compensation plans provide for grants of stock options, performance-based restricted stock
units (“PBRSUs”) and non-performance-based restricted stock units (“RSUs”) and restricted stock awards (“RSAs”).
Common shares available for grant as of December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 were 5,475,903, 7,544,458 and
8,644,262, respectively. The Company generally issues authorized but previously unissued shares to satisfy stock
option exercises and stock award vesting.
The Company’s annual long-term incentive share-based compensation program is made up of 50% stock options and
50% PBRSUs. The Company also periodically grants RSUs. Total compensation expense related to all share-based
compensation plans was $87.8 million ($74.8 million net of tax benefit), $89.5 million ($75.4 million net of tax benefit)
and $81.0 million ($67.7 million net of tax benefit) for 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. As of December 31, 2022,
there was $150.7 million of total measured but unrecognized compensation expense related to non-vested share-
based compensation arrangements granted under all of the Company’s plans. That cost is expected to be recognized
over a weighted-average period of 2.2 years.
Stock Options
Stock options are granted to purchase shares of the Company’s stock at the average daily share price on the date of
grant. These options generally expire within ten years from the grant date. The Company generally recognizes
compensation expense for these awards on a straight-line basis over the three year vesting period. Stock option
grants to retirement eligible recipients are attributed to expense using the non-substantive vesting method.
A summary of stock option activity and average exercise prices is as follows:
    2022 2021     2020  
    Number of    Exercise Number ofExercise Number ofExercise 
Options Price (a)    Options Price (a) Options Price (a) 
Outstanding, beginning of year  6,217,161 $160.91 6,802,415 $144.20 9,042,320 $121.72
Granted  1,228,673 148.79 812,853 223.85 931,750 220.95
Exercised  (294,228) 101.08 (1,306,998) 110.91 (2,733,130) 97.52
Canceled  (120,503) 210.26 (91,109) 192.49 (91,660) 166.67
Separation of ChampionX  - - - - (346,865) 126.37
Outstanding, end of year  7,031,103 $160.45 6,217,161 $160.91 6,802,415 $144.20
Exercisable, end of year  5,168,161 $155.45 4,604,922 $141.21 5,051,927 $125.08
Vested and expected to vest, end
of year  6,886,450 $160.31
(a)Represents weighted average price per share.
The total aggregate intrinsic value of options (the amount by which the stock price exceeded the exercise price of the
option on the date of exercise) that were exercised during 2022, 2021 and 2020 was $21.0 million, $148.1 million and
$298.7 million, respectively.
The total aggregate intrinsic value of options outstanding as of December 31, 2022 was $62.3 million, with a
corresponding weighted-average remaining contractual life of 6.4 years. The total aggregate intrinsic value of options
exercisable as of December 31, 2022 was $62.3 million, with a corresponding weighted-average remaining contractual
life of 5.3 years. The total aggregate intrinsic value of options vested and expected to vest as of December 31, 2022
was $62.3 million, with a corresponding weighted-average remaining contractual life of 6.4 years.
The lattice (binomial) option-pricing model is used to estimate the fair value of options at grant date. The Company’s
primary employee option grant occurs during the fourth quarter. The weighted-average grant-date fair value of options
granted and the significant assumptions used in determining the underlying fair value of each option grant, on the date
of grant were as follows:
    2022     2021 2020
Weighted-average grant-date fair value of options
granted at market prices $37.04 $47.65 $44.16
Assumptions
Risk-free rate of return 3.5% 1.2%  0.5%  
Expected life   6years  6years  6years
Expected volatility 23.5% 23.0%  23.0%  
Expected dividend yield 1.4% 0.9%  0.9%  
The risk-free rate of return is determined based on a yield curve of U.S. treasury rates from one month to ten years
and a period commensurate with the expected life of the options granted. Expected volatility is established based on
historical volatility of the Company’s stock price. The expected dividend yield is determined based on the Company’s
annual dividend amount as a percentage of the average stock price at the time of the grant.
Table of Contents
85PBRSUs, RSUs and RSAs
The expense associated with PBRSUs is based on the average of the high and low share price of the Company’s
common stock on the date of grant, adjusted for the absence of future dividends. The awards vest based on the
Company achieving a defined performance target and with continued service for a three year period. Upon vesting,
the Company issues shares of its common stock such that one award unit equals one share of common stock. The
Company assesses the probability of achieving the performance target and recognizes expense over the three year
vesting period when it is probable the performance target will be met. PBRSU awards granted to retirement eligible
recipients are attributed to expense using the non-substantive vesting method. The awards are generally subject to
forfeiture in the event of termination of employment.
The expense associated with shares of non-performance based RSUs and RSAs is based on the average of the high
and low share price of the Company’s common stock on the date of grant, adjusted for the absence of future dividends
and is amortized on a straight-line basis over the periods during which the restrictions lapse. The Company currently
has RSUs that vest over periods between 12 and 60 months. The awards are generally subject to forfeiture in the
event of termination of employment.
A summary of non-vested PBRSUs and restricted stock activity is as follows:
PBRSU Grant Date RSAs and Grant Date
Awards Fair Value (a) RSUs Fair Value (a)
December 31, 2019  1,116,898 $139.83  265,513 $149.46
Granted  202,187 215.23 62,693 203.09
Vested / Earned  (333,676) 112.78 (81,150) 130.72
Canceled (26,285) 157.32 (15,996) 162.51
Separation of ChampionX  (44,494) 142.10 (67,377) 161.82
December 31, 2020  914,630 $165.76  163,683 $172.92
Granted  176,297 223.77 130,807 211.12
Vested / Earned  (271,731) 131.74 (48,977) 160.84
Canceled (30,667) 178.46 (13,239) 192.12
December 31, 2021  788,529 $189.96  232,274 $195.95
Granted 291,496 142.24 240,370 146.90
Vested / Earned (232,210) 152.63 (68,864) 163.81
Canceled (24,645) 207.05 (18,683) 201.39
December 31, 2022 823,170 $181.68  385,097 $170.50
(a)Represents weighted average price per share.
Table of Contents
8613. INCOME TAXES
Income before income taxes consisted of:
(millions)     2022     2021     2020
United States (U.S.)     $295.6        $277.7        $100.5    
International  1,047.8 1,136.5 1,060.9
Total $1,343.4 $1,414.2 $1,161.4
The provision (benefit) for income taxes consisted of:
(millions)     2022     2021     2020
U.S. federal and state     $145.7 $30.9 ($43.9)    
International  231.4 240.2 259.8
Total current  377.1 271.1 215.9
U.S. federal and state  (78.9) 3.6 12.0
International  (63.7) (4.5) (51.3)
Total deferred  (142.6) (0.9) (39.3)
Provision for income taxes $234.5 $270.2 $176.6
The Company’s overall net deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities were comprised of the following:
December 31 (millions)     2022     2021
Deferred tax assets                 
Pension and post-retirement benefits $87.0 $136.8
Other accrued liabilities 129.6 135.6
Lease liability   109.2  101.3
Credit carryforwards 97.8 81.8
Capitalization of R&D costs 84.5 -
Loss carryforwards   67.2  59.6
Share-based compensation   51.2  44.7
Deferred income 59.6 44.8
Other, net   98.8  71.0
Valuation allowance   (65.2)  (50.3)
Total deferred tax assets   719.7  625.3
Deferred tax liabilities
Intangible assets   (611.1)  (631.0)
Property, plant and equipment   (319.7)  (333.5)
Lease asset (109.1) (100.3)
Financing (33.5) (34.2)
Other, net   (43.8)  (27.7)
Total deferred tax liabilities   (1,117.2)  (1,126.7)
Net deferred tax liabilities balance ($397.5) ($501.4)
As of December 31, 2022 the Company has tax effected federal, state and international net operating loss
carryforwards of $2.5 million, $16.1 million and $48.6 million, respectively, and a tax effected federal tax capital loss
carryforward of $9.4 million which will be available to offset future taxable income. The federal and state loss
carryforwards of $18.6 million expire from 2023 to 2043. The international loss carryforwards of $9.9 million expire
from 2023 to 2043 and $38.7 million have no expiration. The federal capital loss carryforwards of $9.4 million expire
from 2023 to 2026. The tax loss carryforwards expiring in 2023 are not material.
Additionally, the Company has $97.8 million of credit carryforwards that are primarily related to U.S. foreign tax credits
and various state credits. The U.S. foreign tax credit carryforwards of $71.1 million expire from 2029 to 2032 and the
state credit carryforwards of $21.3 million expire from 2023 to 2037. Other international tax credit carryforwards of
$5.4 million do not expire. The tax credit carryforwards expiring in 2023 are not material.
The Company has valuation allowances on certain deferred tax assets of $65.2 million and $50.3 million at December
31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. The increase in valuation allowance from year end 2021 to year end 2022 was
primarily due to U.S. state tax attributes, foreign net operating losses and other deferred tax assets.
The Company obtained tax benefits from a tax holiday in the Dominican Republic. The Company received a permit of
operation, which expires in April 2036, from the National Council of Free Zones of Exportation for the Dominican
Republic. Companies operating under the Free Zones are not subject to income tax in the Dominican Republic on
export income. The Company had a tax incentive awarded by the Signapore Economic Development Board. This
incentive provided for a preferential 10% tax rate on certain headquarter income which expired in January 2021. The
tax reduction as the result of the tax holidays for 2022 was $5.8 million ($0.02 per diluted share), 2021 was $2.9
million ($0.01 per diluted share) and 2020 was $26.9 million ($0.09 per diluted share).
Table of Contents
87A reconciliation of the statutory U.S. federal income tax rate to the Company’s effective income tax rate is as follows:
    2022 2021 2020
Statutory U.S. rate 21.0%  21.0% 21.0%
State income taxes, net of federal benefit 1.3 0.6 0.4
Foreign operations (0.8) (0.6) (1.3)
Excess stock benefits (0.4) (2.0) (4.9)
R&D credit (1.4) (1.3) (1.1)
Foreign derived intangible income (1.8) (1.6) (0.2)
Change in valuation allowance 0.7 0.5 0.6
Legal entity rationalization (1.5) - -
One-time transfer of intangibles - 1.8 -
Other, net 0.4 0.7 0.7
Effective income tax rate 17.5% 19.1% 15.2%
The change in the Company’s effective income tax rate includes the tax impact of special (gains) and charges and
discrete tax items, which have impacted the comparability of the Company’s historical effective income tax rates, as
amounts included in special (gains) and charges are derived from tax jurisdictions with rates that vary from the
statutory U.S. rate, and discrete tax items are not necessarily consistent across periods. The tax impact of special
(gains) and charges and discrete tax items will likely continue to impact comparability of the Company’s effective
income tax rate in the future.
The Company’s 2022 effective tax rate of 17.5% includes $53.7 million of net tax benefits on special (gains) and
charges, and net tax benefit of $11.8 million associated with discrete items. Discrete items included a deferred tax
benefits of $14.6 million associated with utilization of tax attributes as a result of legal entity rationalization and share-
based compensation excess tax benefits of $6.0 million. The amount of the excess tax benefit is subject to variation in
stock price and award exercises. The remaining discrete tax expense of $8.8 million was primarily related to the filing
of federal, state and foreign tax returns and other income tax adjustments including the impact of changes in tax laws,
audit settlements and other changes in estimates.
The Company’s 2021 effective tax rate of 19.1% includes $53.3 million of net tax benefits on special (gains) and
charges, and net tax expense of $5.8 million associated with discrete items. During 2021, the Company recorded a
discrete tax benefit of $29.1 million related to share-based compensation excess tax benefits. Additionally, the
Company recorded $34.9 million discrete tax charges including a non-cash deferred tax charge of $25.1 million
associated with transferring certain intangible property between affiliates. The remaining $9.8 million tax expense
primarily related to the filing of federal, state and foreign tax returns and other income tax adjustments including the
impact of changes in tax laws, audit settlements and other changes in estimates.
The Company’s 2020 effective tax rate of 15.2% includes $57.9 million of net tax benefits on special (gains) and
charges, and net tax benefits of $55.8 million associated with discrete items. During 2020, the Company recorded a
discrete tax benefit of $57.3 million related to share-based compensation excess tax benefits. The Company recorded
changes in reserves in non-U.S. and U.S. jurisdictions due to audit settlements and the expiration of statutes of
limitations which resulted in a $9.8 million tax benefit. Additionally, the Company recognized a net tax expense of
$11.3 million primarily related to the filing of prior year federal, state and foreign tax returns and other income tax
adjustments.
During 2022, the Company recorded a deferred tax liability of $12.1 million as part of purchase accounting associated
with the pre-acquisition undistributed earnings of Purolite that are not considered permanently reinvested. A deferred
tax liability of $6.8 million remains as of December 31, 2022. The Company otherwise continues to assert permanent
reinvestment of the undistributed earnings of international affiliates unless the earnings can be remitted in a net
income tax benefit or tax-neutral manner. If there are policy changes, the Company would record the applicable taxes
in the period of change. Due to the complexity of the legal entity structure, the number of legal entities and jurisdictions
involved, and the complexity of the laws and regulations, the Company believes it is not practicable to estimate the
amount of additional taxes which may be payable upon distribution of these undistributed earnings. Accordingly, no
deferred taxes have been provided for withholding taxes or other taxes on permanently reinvested earnings.
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending amount of gross liability for unrecognized tax benefits is as follows:
(millions)     2022     2021 2020
Balance at beginning of year $25.1 $20.7 $27.0
Additions based on tax positions related to the current year     2.7  3.8  3.3
Additions for tax positions of prior years   3.6  3.0  -
Current year acquisitions - 4.4 -
Reductions for tax positions of prior years   (1.5)  -  (1.1)
Reductions for tax positions due to statute of limitations   (0.7)  (3.0)  (9.1)
Settlements   (3.4)  (3.7)  -
Foreign currency translation   (0.9)  (0.1)  0.6
Balance at end of year $24.9 $25.1 $20.7
The total amount of unrecognized tax benefits, if recognized would affect the effective tax rate by $23.1 million as of
December 31, 2022, $22.8 million as of December 31, 2021 and $18.3 million as of December 31, 2020.
Table of Contents
88The Company files U.S. federal income tax returns and income tax returns in various U.S. state and non- U.S.
jurisdictions. With few exceptions, the Company is no longer subject to state and foreign income tax examinations by
tax authorities for years before 2017. The IRS has completed examinations of the Company’s U.S. federal income tax
returns through 2016, and the years 2017 through 2020 are currently under audit. In addition to the U.S. federal
examination, there is ongoing audit activity in several U.S. state and foreign jurisdictions. The Company anticipates
changes to uncertain tax positions due to closing of various audits and statutes closing on years mentioned above.
The Company does not believe these changes will result in a material impact during the next twelve months.
Decreases in the Company’s gross liability could result in offsets to other balance sheet accounts, cash payments, and
adjustments to tax expense. The occurrence of these events and/or other events not included above within the next
twelve months could change depending on a variety of factors.
The Company recognizes interest and penalties related to unrecognized tax benefits in its provision for income taxes.
The Company had $4.0 million, $3.2 million and $4.1 million of accrued interest, including minor amounts for penalties,
at December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
14. RENTALS AND LEASES
Lessee
The Company leases sales and administrative office facilities, distribution centers, research and manufacturing
facilities, as well as vehicles and other equipment under operating leases. Certain of the Company’s lease
arrangements are finance leases, which are immaterial individually and in the aggregate.
The Company’s operating lease cost was as follows:
(millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating lease cost* $196.9 $179.4 $183.8
*Includes immaterial short-term and variable lease costs
Future maturity of operating lease liabilities as of December 31, 2022 were as follows:
(millions)
2023  $124
2024  98
2025  75
2026  53
2027 32
Thereafter  121
Total lease payments 503
Less: imputed interest 57
Present value of lease liabilities $446
The Company’s operating leases term and discount rate were as follows:
December 31 December 31 December 31
2022 2021 2020
Weighted-average remaining lease terms (years) 6.71 5.99 5.52
Weighted-average discount rate 2.98% 3.07% 3.72%
The Company’s other lease information was as follows:
December 31December 31December 31
(millions) 2022 2021 2020
Cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities:
Operating cash flows from operating leases $157.3 $157.0 $164.2
Leased assets obtained in exchange for new operating lease liabilities 202.7 116.8 60.4
Table of Contents
89Lessor
The Company leases warewashing and water treatment equipment to customers under operating leases.
Gross assets under operating leases recorded in Property, plant and equipment, net is $1,288.3 million and $1,223.3
million, and related accumulated depreciation is $811.2 million and $767.3 million, as of December 31, 2022 and
2021, respectively.
The Company’s operating lease revenue was as follows:
(millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating lease revenue* $466.7 $412.5 $356.3
*Includes immaterial variable lease revenue
Future revenue from operating leases for existing contracts as of December 31, 2022 were as follows:
(millions)
2023  $370
2024  269
2025  207
2026  140
2027 71
Thereafter  41
Total lease revenue $1,098
The Company mitigates the risk of residual value subsequent to the lease term by redeploying assets. As such, the
Company expects to receive revenue from the operating lease assets through the remaining useful life and therefore
subsequent to the initial contract termination date.
15. RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT EXPENDITURES
Research expenditures that relate to the development of new products and processes, including significant
improvements and refinements to existing products, are expensed as incurred. Such costs were $190 million in 2022,
$186 million in 2021 and $185 million in 2020. The Company did not participate in any material customer sponsored
research during any of the years.
16. COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
The Company is subject to various claims and contingencies related to, among other things, workers’ compensation,
general liability (including product liability), automobile claims, health care claims, environmental matters and lawsuits.
The Company is also subject to various claims and contingencies related to income taxes, which are discussed in
Note 13. The Company also has contractual obligations including lease commitments, which are discussed in Note 14.
The Company records liabilities when a contingent loss is probable and can be reasonably estimated. If the
reasonable estimate of a probable loss is a range, the Company records the most probable estimate of the loss or the
minimum amount when no amount within the range is a better estimate than any other amount. The Company
discloses a contingent liability even if the liability is not probable or the amount is not estimable, or both, if there is a
reasonable possibility that a material loss may have been incurred.
Insurance
Globally, the Company has insurance policies with varying deductible levels for property and casualty losses. The
Company is insured for losses in excess of these deductibles, subject to policy terms and conditions and has recorded
both a liability and an offsetting receivable for amounts in excess of these deductibles. The Company is self-insured
for health care claims for eligible participating employees, subject to certain deductibles and limitations. The Company
determines its liabilities for claims on an actuarial basis.
Litigation and Environmental Matters
The Company and certain subsidiaries are party to various lawsuits, claims and environmental actions that have
arisen in the ordinary course of business. These include from time to time antitrust, employment, commercial, patent
infringement, tort, product liability and wage hour lawsuits, as well as possible obligations to investigate and mitigate
the effects on the environment of the disposal or release of certain chemical substances at various sites, such as
Superfund sites and other operating or closed facilities. The Company has established accruals for certain lawsuits,
claims and environmental matters. The Company currently believes that there is not a reasonably possible risk of
material loss in excess of the amounts accrued related to these legal matters. Because litigation is inherently
uncertain, and unfavorable rulings or developments could occur, there can be no certainty that the Company may not
ultimately incur charges in excess of recorded liabilities. A future adverse ruling, settlement or unfavorable
development could result in future charges that could have a material adverse effect on the Company’s results of
operations or cash flows in the period in which they are recorded.
Table of Contents
90The Company currently believes that such future charges related to suits and legal claims, if any, would not have a
material adverse effect on the Company’s consolidated financial position.
TPC Group Litigation
On November 27, 2019, a Butadiene production plant owned and operated by TPC Group, Inc. in Port Neches, Texas,
experienced an explosion and fire that resulted in personal injuries, the release of chemical fumes and extensive
property damage to the plant and surrounding areas in and near Port Neches, Texas.
Nalco Company LLC, a subsidiary of Ecolab, supplied process chemicals to TPC used in TPC’s production processes.
Nalco did not operate, manage, maintain or control any aspect of TPC’s plant operations.
In connection with its provision of process chemicals to TPC, Nalco has been named in numerous lawsuits stemming
from the plant explosion. Nalco has been named a defendant, along with TPC and other defendants, in multi-district
litigation (“MDL”) proceedings pending in Orange County, Texas, alleging among other things claims for personal
injury, property damage and business losses (In re TPC Group Litigation – A2020-0236-MDL, Orange County, Texas).
In addition, numerous other lawsuits have been filed against Nalco, including TPC Group v. Nalco, E0208239,
Jefferson County, Texas, a subrogation claim by TPC’s insurers seeking reimbursement for property damage losses.
Over 5,000 plaintiffs (including the subrogation matter) currently have asserted claims against Nalco.
All of these cases make similar allegations and seek damages for personal injury, property damage, business losses
and other damages, including exemplary damages. The Company expects all these cases will be consolidated for
pretrial purposes into the Orange County MDL referenced above. Due to the large number of plaintiffs, the early stage
of the litigation and the fact that many of the claims do not specify an amount of damages, any estimate of any loss or
range of losses cannot be made at this time.
On June 1, 2022, TPC and seven of its affiliated companies filed for bankruptcy under Chapter 11 (Case No. 22-
10493-CTG, United States Bankruptcy Court for the District of Delaware). In connection with the bankruptcy cases,
TPC disclosed an estimated range of its liability related to the Port Neches incident to individuals and homeowners
(including subrogation claims) of approximately $152 million to $520 million. As part of their bankruptcy plan, TPC and
its affiliates announced a settlement which allows the MDL plaintiffs a $500 million claim solely for purposes of claim
allowance in the chapter 11 case and distribution of value pursuant to TPC’s bankruptcy plan. Other key terms of the
settlement between TPC and the MDL plaintiffs include the establishment of a settlement trust for the benefit of certain
general unsecured creditors, which is funded with $30 million and the assignment of TPC’s claims and causes of
action, if any, against certain third parties, including Nalco, related to the TPC plant explosion. As part of the
bankruptcy process, TPC and its debtor affiliates received a discharge of all MDL related claims, as did certain non-
debtor affiliates to the extent third parties did not opt out of the non-debtor releases. Nalco opted out of these releases,
preserving any direct causes of action it may have against non-debtors. Furthermore, the allowance of the $500
million claim should have no effect on any claims or defenses asserted against or by Nalco in the MDL litigation. On
December 1, 2022, the bankruptcy court confirmed the TPC bankruptcy plan, including the approval of the settlement
and establishment of the aforementioned settlement trust. On December 16, 2022, the TPC bankruptcy plan went
effective.
The Company believes the claims asserted against Nalco in the lawsuits stemming from the TPC plant explosion are
without merit and intends to defend the claims vigorously. The Company also believes any potential loss should be
covered by insurance subject to deductibles. However, the Company cannot predict the outcome of these lawsuits, the
involvement the Company might have in these matters in the future or the potential for future litigation.
Environmental Matters
The Company is currently participating in environmental assessments and remediation at approximately 25 locations,
the majority of which are in the U.S., and environmental liabilities have been accrued reflecting management’s best
estimate of future costs. Potential insurance reimbursements are not anticipated in the Company’s accruals for
environmental liabilities.
17. RETIREMENT PLANS
Pension and Postretirement Health Care Benefits Plans
The Company has a non-contributory, qualified, defined benefit pension plan covering the majority of its U.S.
employees. The Company also has U.S. non-contributory, non-qualified, defined benefit pension plans, which provide
for benefits to employees in excess of limits permitted under its pension plans. The U.S. non-qualified plans are not
funded and the recorded benefit obligations for the non-qualified plans were $86 million and $114 million at December
31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. The measurement date used for determining the U.S. pension plan assets and
obligations is December 31.
Various international subsidiaries have defined benefit pension plans. International plans are funded based on local
country requirements. The measurement date used for determining the international pension plan assets and
obligations is November 30, the fiscal year end of the Company’s international subsidiaries.
The Company provides postretirement health care and life insurance benefits to certain U.S. employees and retirees.
The U.S. postretirement health care plans are contributory based on years of service and choice of coverage (family
or single), with retiree contributions adjusted annually. The Company also maintains several U.S. postretirement life
insurance plans. The measurement date used to determine the U.S. postretirement health care and life insurance plan
assets and obligations is December 31. Certain employees
Table of Contents
91outside the U.S. are covered under government-sponsored programs, which are not required to be fully funded. The
expense and obligation for providing international postretirement health care benefits are not significant.
The following table sets forth financial information related to the Company’s pension and postretirement benefit plans:
U.S. InternationalU.S. Postretirement 
Pensions Pensions Benefits  
(millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021 
Accumulated benefit obligation, end of year $1,799.0$2,462.7$1,171.1$1,696.2$115.5$155.4
Projected benefit obligation
Projected benefit obligation, beginning of year  $2,462.7$2,728.4$1,779.7$1,834.2$155.4$172.4
Service cost  40.8 43.9 28.4 31.4 0.8 1.0
Interest cost  65.3 51.4 22.0 17.3 3.3 2.9
Participant contributions  - - 3.0 2.9 3.7 3.3
Plan amendments  - - - 0.7 - -
Actuarial (gain) loss  (479.8)(79.6)(436.8)(25.3)(33.7) (12.1)
Assumed through acquisitions - - 15.1 34.0 - -
Other events - - - 4.3 - -
Benefits paid  (290.0)(281.4)(54.3)(68.5)(14.0) (12.1)
Foreign currency translation  - -(135.2)(51.3) - -
Projected benefit obligation, end of year  $1,799.0$2,462.7$1,221.9$1,779.7$115.5$155.4
Plan assets
Fair value of plan assets, beginning of year $2,376.8$2,372.9$1,219.9$1,148.0 $5.2 $5.7
Actual returns on plan assets (430.3)276.8 (218.3)107.5 (0.8) 0.6
Company contributions 12.0 8.5 38.3 40.7 12.8 11.0
Participant contributions - - 3.0 2.9 - -
Acquired through acquisitions - - 15.1 12.9 - -
Benefits paid (290.0)(281.4)(54.3)(68.5)(14.0) (12.1)
Foreign currency translation - - (98.6)(23.6) - -
Fair value of plan assets, end of year $1,668.5$2,376.8$905.1$1,219.9 $3.2 $5.2
Funded Status, end of year ($130.5)($85.9)($316.8)($559.8)($112.3)($150.2)
Amounts recognized in the Consolidated Balance Sheets:
Other assets $- $28.2$118.6 $86.5 $- $-
Other current liabilities ($9.2)(14.8)(28.6)(27.0) (7.6) (5.5)
Postretirement healthcare and pension benefits ($121.3)(99.3)(406.8)(619.3)(104.7)(144.7)
Net liability ($130.5)($85.9)($316.8)($559.8)($112.3)($150.2)
Amounts recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss
(income):
Unrecognized net actuarial loss (gain) $411.9$396.8$279.7$485.7($43.6)($11.7)
Unrecognized net prior service (benefits) costs (21.2)(25.8) 0.3 (0.2) - -
Tax (benefit) expense (100.8)(95.3)(66.5)(117.8) 7.7 1.2
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (income), net of tax$289.9$275.7$213.5$367.7($35.9)($10.5)
Change in accumulated other comprehensive loss (income):
Amortization of net actuarial gain (loss) ($30.2)($56.2)($22.7)($28.7) $0.6 ($0.7)
Amortization of prior service credits 4.5 6.9 0.1 0.1 - -
Current period net actuarial loss (gain) 97.0 (203.0)(147.8)(56.1)(32.5) (12.3)
Current period prior service costs - - - 0.7 - -
Curtailments and settlements (51.6)(35.3) - (3.5) - -
Tax (benefit) expense (5.5) 69.8 51.3 25.4 6.5 3.2
Foreign currency translation - - (35.1)(12.7) - -
Other comprehensive loss (income) $14.2($217.8)($154.2)($74.8)($25.4) ($9.8)
Estimate amounts in accumulated other comprehensive loss expected to be reclassified to net period cost during 2023
were as follows:
U.S. Post-  
U.S. International Retirement
(millions) Pensions Pensions Benefits  
Net actuarial loss (gain) $0.2 $11.6 ($3.1)
Net prior service benefits (4.6) (0.3) -
Total ($4.4) $11.3 ($3.1)
Service cost is included with employee compensation cost in either cost of sales and selling, general and
administrative expenses in the Consolidated Statements of Income based on employee roles in the Company while all
non-service components are included in other (income) expense in the Consolidated Statements of Income.
Table of Contents
92The aggregate projected benefit obligation, accumulated benefit obligation and fair value of pension plan assets for
plans with accumulated benefit obligations in excess of plan assets were as follows:
December 31, (millions)     2022     2021
Aggregate projected benefit obligation $2,392.1 $1,022.3
Accumulated benefit obligation  2,355.8  964.5
Fair value of plan assets  1,828.1  280.9
These plans include the U.S. non-qualified pension plans which are not funded as well as various international
pension plans which are funded consistent with local practices and requirements.
For the year ended December 31, 2022, the year-over-year decrease in the Company’s consolidated net benefit
obligations was due to decreases in both pension liabilities and pension plan assets. Pension liabilities decreased on a
global basis primarily due to increases in pension discount rates used to discount projected pension benefit
payments. The Company’s pension discount rates are largely determined based on observable yields of investment
grade corporate bonds or government issued debt-securities. Yields on these securities increased sharply in 2022
due, in part, to actions taken by many central banks to curb global inflation. The Company’s pension plan assets are
reported at fair value. The fair value of the Company’s pension assets decreased on a global basis primarily due to
unfavorable returns on the Company’s equity and fixed income investments.
For the year ended December 31, 2021, the year-over-year decrease in the Company’s consolidated net benefit
obligations was due to decreases in pension liabilities and increases in pension plan assets. Pension liabilities
decreased primarily due to increases in discount rates used to discount projected benefit payments. The Company’s
pension discount rates are largely determined based on observable yields on investment grade corporate bonds and
govement issued debt-securities which increased in many geographies year-over-year. The fair value of the
Company’s pension assets increased year-over-year as asset returns outpaced pension distributions due to strong
returns for equitities and fixed income investments.
Net Periodic Benefit Costs and Plan Assumptions
Pension and postretirement benefits expense for the Company’s operations were as follows:
U.S. International U.S. Postretirement
Pensions Pensions Benefits
(millions)     2022    2021    2020    2022    2021    2020    2022    2021    2020
Service cost (a) $40.8 $43.9 $68.4 $28.4 $31.4 $30.8 $0.8 $1.0 $1.2
Interest cost on benefit
obligation  65.3  51.4 70.3  22.0  17.3 22.3  3.3  2.9 4.4
Expected return on plan assets (144.4) (152.3)(152.9) (69.8) (70.7) (63.9) (0.3) (0.4) (0.4)
Recognition of net actuarial loss
(gain) 30.2  56.7 51.9  22.8  28.7 26.1  (0.6) 0.7 0.1
Amortization of prior service
benefit (4.5) (6.9) (7.4) (0.1) (0.1) (0.1) - - (11.0)
Curtailments and settlements
(b) 51.6 35.3 2.5 - 3.5 2.2 - - -
Total expense (benefit) $39.0 $28.1 $32.8 $3.3 $10.1 $17.4 $3.2 $4.2 ($5.7)
(a)Service cost includes discontinued operations of $2.5 for the year ended December 31, 2020.
(b)$50.6 and $37.2 of settlement expense was recognized as special charges in 2022 and 2021, respectively.
During 2022 and 2021, the Company incurred settlement expense in the U.S. of $51.6 million ($38.9 million after tax)
and $35.3 million ($26.8 million after tax), respectively, related to lump-sum payments to retirees in its U.S. pension
plans. In addition to the U.S. qualifited plan settlements in 2022 and 2021, we have historically recognized settlements
and curtailment gains and losses associated with our U.S. nonqualified pension plans and International pension plans,
the amounts of which have been historically not material. These charges have been included as a component of other
(income) expense on the Consolidated Statements of Income.
Table of Contents
93Pension and postretirement health care benefits plan assumptions for the Company were as follows:
Plan Assumptions U.S. International U.S. Postretirement
Pensions Pensions Benefits
(percent)     2022 20212020    202220212020 2022 2021 2020
Weighted-average actuarial
assumptions
used to determine benefit
obligations
as of year end:
Discount rate 5.17%  2.86%2.48% 3.70%  1.45%1.13%5.14%  2.75%2.37%
Projected salary increase 4.03 4.03 4.03 2.81 2.42 2.12
Weighted-average actuarial
assumptions
used to determine net cost:
Interest credit rate for cash
balance plans 1.56 0.87 1.81 N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A
Discount rate 2.86 2.49 3.20 1.46 1.37 1.84 2.75 2.37 3.16
Expected return on plan
assets 7.00 7.00 7.25 6.18 6.24 6.24 7.00 7.00 7.25
Projected salary increase 4.03 4.03 4.03 2.47 2.31 2.81
Discount rate assumptions for the U.S. plans are developed using a bond yield curve constructed from a population of
high-quality, non-callable, corporate bonds with maturities ranging from six months to thirty years. Discount rates are
estimated for the U.S. plans based on the timing of the expected benefit payments.
The Company measures service and interest costs by applying the specific spot rates along that yield curve to the
plans’ liability cash flows. The Company believes this approach provides a more precise measurement of service and
interest costs by aligning the timing of the plans’ liability cash flows to the corresponding spot rates on the yield curve.
The expected long-term rate of return used for the U.S. plans is based on the respective pension plan’s asset mix. The
Company considers expected long-term real returns on asset categories, expectations for inflation, and estimates of
the impact of active management of the assets in determining the expected long-term rate of return to use. The
Company also considers historical returns.
The expected long-term rate of return used for the Company’s international plans is determined in each local
jurisdiction and is based on the assets held in that jurisdiction, the expected rate of returns for the type of assets held
and any guaranteed rate of return provided by the investment. The other assumptions used to measure the
international pension obligations, including discount rate, vary by country based on specific local requirements and
information.
The Company uses mortality tables appropriate in the circumstances, which generally are the recent available
mortality tables as of the respective U.S. and international measurement dates. The Company’s year-end U.S.
valuations reflect mortality tables that estimate the impacts of COVID in an endemic state. This represents a change
from prior year when the impact of COVID on future mortality could not be reasonably estimated.
For postretirement benefit measurement purposes as of December 31, 2022, the annual rates of increase in the per
capita cost of covered health care were assumed to be 6.75% for pre-65 costs. Post-65 costs are no longer used. The
rates are assumed to decrease each year until they reach 4.5% in 2032 and remain at those levels thereafter. Health
care costs for certain employees which are eligible for subsidy by the Company are limited by a cap on the subsidy.
Plan Asset Management
The Company’s U.S. investment strategy and policies are designed to maximize the possibility of having sufficient
funds to meet the long-term liabilities of the qualified pension plan, while achieving a balance between the goals of
asset growth of the qualified pension plan and keeping risk at a reasonable level. Investment income is not a primary
goal of the policy.
The asset allocation position reflects the Company’s ability and willingness to accept relatively more short-term
variability in the performance of the qualified pension plan asset portfolio in exchange for the expectation of better
long-term returns, lower pension costs and better funded status in the long run. The U.S. qualified pension plan’s
asset are diversified across a number of asset classes and securities. Selected individual portfolios within the asset
classes may be undiversified while maintaining the diversified nature of total plan assets. The Company has no
significant concentration of risk in its U.S. qualified pension plan assets.
Assets of funded international retirement plans are managed in each local jurisdiction and asset allocation strategy is
set in accordance with local rules, regulations and practices; therefore, no overall target asset allocation is presented.
Although foreign equity securities are all considered international for the Company, some equity securities are
considered domestic for the local plan. The funds are invested in a variety of equities, bonds and real estate
investments and, in some cases, the assets are managed by insurance companies which may offer a guaranteed rate
of return. The Company has no significant concentration of risk in the assets of its international pension plans.
The fair value hierarchy is used to categorize investments measured at fair value in one of three levels in the fair value
hierarchy. This categorization is based on the observability of the inputs used in valuing the investments. Refer to Note
8 for definitions of these levels.
Table of Contents
94The fair value of the Company’s U.S. qualified pension plan assets were as follows:
Fair Value as of Fair Value as of
(millions) December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
    Level 1    Level 2    Total Level 1    Level 2    Total
Cash $54.8 $- $54.8 $43.6 $- $43.6
Equity securities:   
Large cap equity   237.1 - 237.1  412.2 - 412.2
Small cap equity   15.4 25.1 40.5  21.3 40.7 62.0
International equity   37.4 17.2 54.6  62.9 28.0 90.9
Fixed income:
Core fixed income   145.5 646.5 792.0  510.7 589.7 1,100.4
High-yield bonds   33.4 - 33.4  49.0 - 49.0
Emerging markets   - 25.4 25.4  - 36.6 36.6
Total investments at fair value  523.6 714.2  1,237.8  1,099.7 695.0  1,794.7
Investments measured at net asset
value   433.9 587.3
Total $523.6 $714.2 $1,671.7 $1,099.7 $695.0 $2,382.0
The Company had no Level 3 assets as part of its U.S. qualified pension plan assets as of December 31, 2022 or
2021.
The allocation of the Company’s U.S. qualified pension plan assets plans were as follows:
Target Asset  
Asset Category Allocation Percentage
Percentage of Plan Assets
December 31     2022 2021    2022 2021
Cash -%  -% 3%  2%
Equity securities:
Large cap equity 21 21 14 17
Small cap equity 3 3 2 3
International equity 13 10 9 10
Fixed income:
Core fixed income 48 48 47 46
High-yield bonds 3 3 2 2
Emerging markets 2 4 2 2
Other:
Real estate 3 3 4 4
Private equity 5 5 15 11
Distressed debt 2 3 2 3
Total 100% 100% 100% 100%
The fair value of the Company’s international plan assets for its defined benefit pension plans were as follows:
Fair Value as of  Fair Value as of
(millions) December 31, 2022  December 31, 2021
    Level 1    Level 2    Total   Level 1    Level 2    Total
Cash $9.9 $- $9.9 $7.2 $- $7.2
Equity securities:
International equity - 219.3 219.3 - 490.1 490.1
Fixed income:
Corporate bonds  - 158.5 158.5 9.7 220.0 229.7
Government bonds  - 365.9 365.9 7.2 298.5 305.7
Insurance company accounts - 106.2 106.2 - 121.2 121.2
Total investments at fair value 9.9 849.9 859.8 24.1 1,129.8 1,153.9
Investments measured at net asset value 45.3 66.0
Total $9.9 $849.9 $905.1 $24.1 $1,129.8 $1,219.9
Table of Contents
95The Company had no Level 3 assets as part of its international plan assets as of December 31, 2022 or 2021.
The allocation of plan assets of the Company’s international plan assets for its defined benefit pension plans were as
follows:
Percentage
Asset Category of Plan Assets
December 31 2022 2021
Cash 1% 1%
Equity securities:
International equity 24 40
Fixed income:
Corporate bonds 18 19
Government bonds 40 25
Total fixed income 58 44
Other:
Insurance contracts 12 10
Debt securities - 2
Real estate 5 3
Total 100% 100%
Cash Flows
As of year-end 2022, the Company’s estimate of pension and postretirement benefits expected to be paid in each of
the next five fiscal years and in the aggregate for the five fiscal years thereafter are as follows:
(millions) All Plans
2023 $207
2024  220
2025  224
2026  226
2027  229
2028 - 2032  1,151
Depending on plan funding levels, the U.S. qualified pension plan provides certain terminating participants with an
option to receive their pension benefits in the form of a lump sum payout.
The Company is currently in compliance with all funding requirements of its U.S. pension and postretirement benefit
plans. There were no voluntary contributions made to its non-contributory qualified U.S. pension plan. The Company is
required to fund certain international pension benefit plans in accordance with local legal requirements. The Company
estimates contributions to be made to its international plans will approximate $41 million in 2023.
The Company seeks to maintain balance in its U.S. assets that meet the long-term funding requirements identified by
the projections of the pension plans’ actuaries while simultaneously satisfying the fiduciary responsibilities prescribed
in ERISA. The Company also takes into consideration the tax deductibility of contributions to the benefit plans.
Savings Plan and ESOP
The Company provides a 401(k) savings plan for the majority of its U.S. employees under the Company’s 401(k)
savings plans, the Ecolab Savings Plan and ESOP (the “Ecolab Savings Plan”).
Effective December 31, 2020, the Ecolab Savings Plan and ESOP for Traditional Benefit Employees (the “Traditional
Plan”) merged into and became part of the Ecolab Savings Plan. Following the merger, participants in the Traditional
Plan became participants in the Ecolab Savings Plan and $1,710 million of net assets of the Traditional Plan
transferred to the Ecolab Savings Plan.
Under the Ecolab Savings Plan, Employee before-tax contributions of up to 4% of eligible compensation are matched
100% by the Company and employee before-tax contributions over 4% and up to 8% of eligible compensation are
matched 50% by the Company.
The Company’s matching contributions are 100% vested immediately. The Company’s matching contribution expense
was $81.6 million, $78.2 million and $72.4 million in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Table of Contents
9618. REVENUES
Revenue Recognition
Product and Sold Equipment
Product revenue is generated from sales of cleaning, sanitizing, water treatment, process treatment and colloidal silica
products. In addition, the Company sells equipment which may be used in combination with its specialized products.
Revenue recognized from product and sold equipment is recognized at the point in time when the obligations in the
contract with the customer are satisfied, which generally occurs with the transfer of the product or delivery of the
equipment.
Service and Lease Equipment
Service and lease equipment revenue is generated from providing services or leasing equipment to customers.
Service offerings include installing or repairing certain types of equipment, activities that supplement or replace
headcount at the customer location, or fulfilling deliverables included in the contract. Global Industrial segment
services are associated with water treatment and paper process applications. Global Institutional & Specialty services
include cleaning and sanitizing programs and wash process solutions. Global Healthcare & Life Sciences segment
services include pharmaceutical, personal care, infection and containment control solutions. Revenues included in
Other primarily related to services designed to detect, eliminate and prevent pests. Service revenue is recognized over
time utilizing an input method and aligns with when the services are provided. Typically, revenue is recognized over
time using costs incurred to date because the effort provided by the field selling and service organization represents
services provided, which corresponds with the transfer of control. Revenue recognized from leased equipment
primarily relates to warewashing and water treatment equipment recognized on a straight-line basis over the length of
the lease contract pursuant to Topic 842 Leases. In the second quarter ended June 30, 2020, the Company provided a
one-time lease billing suspension of approximately $38 million to certain restaurant customers within the Institutional
Segment, in recognition of the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic. There was no substantial change to the
consideration expected to be received under the lease arrangement. Refer to Note 14 for additional information
related to lease equipment.
Practical Expedients and Exemptions
The revenue standard can be applied to a portfolio of contracts with similar characteristics if it is reasonable that the
effects of applying the standard at the portfolio level would not be significantly different than applying the standard at
the individual contract level. The Company applies the portfolio approach primarily within each operating segment by
geographical region. Application of the portfolio approach was focused on those characteristics that have the most
significant accounting consequences in terms of their effect on the timing of revenue recognition or the amount of
revenue recognized. The Company determined the key criteria to assess with respect to the portfolio approach,
including the related deliverables, the characteristics of the customers and the timing and transfer of goods and
services, which most closely aligned within the operating segments. In addition, the accountability for the business
operations, as well as the operational decisions on how to go to market and the product offerings, are performed at the
operating segment level.
The following table shows principal activities, separated by reportable segments, from which the Company generates
its revenue. The reportable segments have been revised to align with the Company’s reportable segments in the
current year. Corporate segment includes sales to ChampionX under the Master Cross Supply and Product Transfer
agreements entered into as part of the ChampionX Separation. For more information about the Company’s reportable
segments, refer to Note 19.
Net sales at public exchange rates by reportable segment were as follows:
(millions)     2022 2021     2020     
Global Industrial
Product and sold equipment  $5,937.0 $5,372.0 $5,052.3 
Service and lease equipment  868.0 865.8 818.5 
Global Institutional & Specialty   
Product and sold equipment 3,645.1 3,265.5 2,968.7
Service and lease equipment 776.8 690.4 584.5
Global Healthcare & Life Sciences
Product and sold equipment 1,398.3 1,068.9 1,071.4
Service and lease equipment 112.2 112.7 110.5
Other
Product and sold equipment 342.1 308.9 274.5
Service and lease equipment 984.5 909.7 809.8
Corporate
Product and sold equipment 123.7 138.0 99.7
Service and lease equipment 0.1 1.2 0.3
Total
Total product and sold equipment $11,446.2 $10,153.3 $9,466.6
Total service and lease equipment 2,741.6 2,579.8 2,323.6
Table of Contents
97Net sales at public exchange rates by geographic region were as follows:
Global Industrial Global Institutional & Specialty
(millions)     2022 2021    2020    2022 2021    2020    
United States $2,945.1 $2,603.0 $2,564.3 $3,050.0 $2,721.8 $2,400.4 
Europe  1,373.6 1,367.1 1,262.6 624.0 557.9 510.3 
Asia Pacific  830.1 802.5 747.2 212.6 201.2 203.9 
Latin America  621.7 551.5 491.7 162.3 135.0 128.3 
Greater China 419.3 394.9 333.0 124.5 132.3 114.9
India, Middle East and Africa 419.4 344.4 314.1 54.6 44.2 39.8
Canada 195.8 174.4 157.9 193.9 163.5 155.6
Total $6,805.0 $6,237.8 $5,870.8 $4,421.9 $3,955.9 $3,553.2
Global Healthcare & Life Sciences Other
(millions) 2022 2021    2020    2022 2021    2020    
United States $612.5 $442.3 $432.6 $816.0 $719.9 $645.7 
Europe 688.8 647.2 643.6 272.7 264.9 228.8 
Asia Pacific 92.8 59.6 69.8 76.1 72.4 64.8 
Latin America 24.7 1.8 6.1 51.9 50.4 50.3 
Greater China 61.0 6.3 3.6 78.8 80.0 63.4
India, Middle East and Africa 25.0 18.1 19.8 10.3 11.6 14.4
Canada 5.7 6.3 6.4 20.8 19.4 16.9
Total $1,510.5 $1,181.6 $1,181.9 $1,326.6 $1,218.6 $1,084.3
Corporate
(millions) 2022 2021    2020    
United States $107.5 $98.2 $75.2
Europe 3.0 3.9 4.8
Asia Pacific 4.1 5.5 2.8
Latin America 7.3 24.6 13.1
Greater China 0.1 2.3 0.9
India, Middle East and Africa 0.3 3.4 2.5
Canada 1.5 1.3 0.7
Total $123.8 $139.2 $100.0
Net sales by geographic region were determined based on origin of sale. There were no sales from a single foreign
country or individual customer that were material to the Company’s consolidated net sales. Sales of warewashing
products were approximately 12%, 10%, and 11% of consolidated net sales in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. 
Contract Liability
Payments received from customers are based on invoices or billing schedules as established in contracts with
customers. Accounts receivable are recorded when the right to consideration becomes unconditional. The contract
liability relates to billings in advance of performance (primarily service obligations) under the contract. Contract
liabilities are recognized as revenue when the performance obligation has been performed, which primarily occurs
during the subsequent quarter.
December 31December 31
(millions)     2022 2021
Contract liability as of beginning of the year  $91.7 $80.4
Revenue recognized in the year from:  
Amounts included in the contract liability at the beginning of the year  (91.7) (80.4)
Increases due to billings excluding amounts recognized as revenue during the year
ended 116.5 91.6
Business combinations - 0.1
Contract liability as of end of year $116.5 $91.7
Table of Contents
9819. OPERATING SEGMENTS AND GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION
The Company’s organizational structure consists of global business unit and global regional leadership teams. The
Company’s eleven operating segments follow its commercial and product-based activities and are based on
engagement in business activities, availability of discrete financial information and review of operating results by the
Chief Operating Decision Maker at the identified operating segment level.
The Company’s operating segments that share similar economic characteristics and future prospects, nature of the
products and production processes, end-use markets, channels of distribution and regulatory environment have been
aggregated into three reportable segments: Global Industrial, Global Institutional & Specialty and Global Healthcare &
Life Sciences. The Company’s operating segments that do not meet the quantitative criteria to be separately reported
have been combined into Other. The Company provides similar information for Other as the Company considers the
information regarding its underlying operating segments as useful in understanding its consolidated results.
The Company’s operating segments are aggregated as follows:
Global Industrial
Includes the Water, Food & Beverage, Paper, and Downstream operating segments. It provides water treatment and
process applications, and cleaning and sanitizing solutions primarily to large industrial customers within the
manufacturing, food and beverage processing, transportation, chemical, primary metals and mining, power generation,
pulp and paper, commercial laundry, global petroleum and petrochemical industries. The underlying operating
segments exhibit similar manufacturing processes, distribution methods and economic characteristics.
Global Institutional & Specialty
Includes the Institutional and Specialty operating segments. It provides specialized cleaning and sanitizing products to
the foodservice, hospitality, lodging, government and education and retail industries. The underlying operating
segments exhibit similar manufacturing processes, distribution methods and economic characteristics.
Global Healthcare & Life Sciences
Includes the Healthcare and Life Sciences operating segments. It provides specialized cleaning and sanitizing
products to the healthcare, personal care and pharmaceutical industries. The underlying operating segments exhibit
similar manufacturing processes, distribution methods and economic characteristics.
Other
Includes the Pest Elimination operating segment which provides services to detect, eliminate and prevent pests, such
as rodents and insects, the CTG operating segment which produces and sells colloidal silica, which is comprised of
nano-sized particles of silica in water used primarily for binding and polishing applications and the Textile Care
operating segment which provides products and services that manage the entire wash process through custom
designed programs, premium products, dispensing equipment, water and energy management and reduction, and real
time data management.
Corporate
Consistent with the Company’s internal management reporting, Corporate amounts in the table below include sales to
ChampionX under the Master Cross Supply and Product Transfer agreements entered into as part of the ChampionX
Separation, as discussed in Note 5. Corporate also includes intangible asset amortization specifically from the Nalco
and Purloite acquistions and special (gains) and charges, as discussed in Note 3, that are not allocated to the
Company’s reportable segments.
Comparability of Reportable Segments
The Company made immaterial changes, including the movement of certain customers and cost allocations between
reportable segments. These changes are reflected in the “Other” column in the table below.
Table of Contents
99The Company evaluates the performance of its non-U.S. dollar functional currency international operations based on
fixed currency exchange rates, which eliminate the impact of exchange rate fluctuations on its international operations.
Fixed currency amounts are updated annually at the beginning of each year based on translation into U.S. dollars at
foreign currency exchange rates established by management, with all periods presented using such rates. The “Fixed
Currency Rate Change” column shown in the following table reflects the impact on previously reported values related
to fixed currency exchange rates established by management at the beginning of 2022 and have been updated from
the 2021 rates reflected in the Company’s 2021 Form 10-K. The difference between the fixed currency exchange rates
and the actual currency exchanges rates is reported within the “Effect of foreign currency translation” row in the table
below. The “Other” column in the table reflects immaterial changes between segments, primarily cost allocations.
The impact of the preceding changes on previously reported full year 2021 and 2020 reportable segment net sales
and operating income is summarized as follows:
December 31, 2021
        
2021 Reported Fixed 2021 Reported
Valued at 2021    Currency  Valued at 2022
(millions) Management Rates  Other  Rate Change  Management Rates
Net Sales       
Global Industrial $6,304.9 $- ($218.1) $6,086.8
Global Institutional & Specialty 3,978.2 - (69.4) 3,908.8
Global Healthcare & Life Sciences 1,195.4 - (45.8) 1,149.6
Other 1,226.9 - (25.9) 1,201.0
Corporate 139.4 - (2.0) 137.4
Subtotal at fixed currency rates 12,844.8 - (361.2) 12,483.6
Effect of foreign currency translation (111.7) - 361.2 249.5
Consolidated reported GAAP net sales $12,733.1 $- $- $12,733.1
Operating Income
Global Industrial $1,031.0 $4.0 ($49.3) $985.7
Global Institutional & Specialty 556.9 (3.8) (7.4) 545.7
Global Healthcare & Life Sciences 160.9 (0.9) (7.7) 152.3
Other 187.3 0.7 (4.0) 184.0
Corporate (318.6) - 2.0 (316.6)
Subtotal at fixed currency rates 1,617.5 - (66.4) 1,551.1
Effect of foreign currency translation (18.9) - 66.4 47.5
Consolidated reported GAAP operating income $1,598.6 $- $- $1,598.6
December 31, 2020
  2020 Reported    Fixed   2020 Reported
Valued at 2021  Segment  Currency  Valued at 2022
(millions) Management Rates  Change  Rate Change  Management Rates
Net Sales       
Global Industrial $6,048.2 $- ($202.5) $5,845.7
Global Institutional & Specialty 3,629.0 - (69.2) 3,559.8
Global Healthcare & Life Sciences 1,241.1 - (51.0) 1,190.1
Other 1,103.4 - (23.6) 1,079.8
Corporate 100.6 - (1.2) 99.4
Subtotal at fixed currency rates 12,122.3 - (347.5) 11,774.8
Effect of foreign currency translation (332.1) - 347.5 15.4
Consolidated reported GAAP net sales $11,790.2 $- $- $11,790.2
Operating Income
Global Industrial $1,123.1 $1.4 ($45.4) $1,079.1
Global Institutional & Specialty 324.0 (1.6) (6.1) 316.3
Global Healthcare & Life Sciences 218.3 (0.5) (10.2) 207.6
Other 132.8 0.7 (2.9) 130.6
Corporate (349.7) - 2.0 (347.7)
Subtotal at fixed currency rates 1,448.5 - (62.6) 1,385.9
Effect of foreign currency translation (52.8) - 62.6 9.8
Consolidated reported GAAP operating income $1,395.7 $- $- $1,395.7
Table of Contents
100Reportable Segment Information
Financial information for each of the Company’s reportable segments were as follows:
Net Sales Operating Income (Loss)
(millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Global Industrial $6,944.0 $6,086.8 $5,845.7 $977.0 $985.7 $1,079.1
Global Institutional & Specialty 4,480.0 3,908.8 3,559.8 634.5 545.7 316.3
Global Healthcare & Life
Sciences 1,570.0 1,149.6 1,190.1 205.0 152.3 207.6
Other 1,355.0 1,201.0 1,079.8 212.8 184.0 130.6
Corporate 124.1 137.4 99.4 (416.7) (316.6) (347.7)
Subtotal at fixed currency 14,473.1 12,483.6 11,774.8 1,612.6 1,551.1 1,385.9
Effect of foreign currency
translation (285.3) 249.5 15.4 (50.1) 47.5 9.8
Consolidated reported GAAP $14,187.8 $12,733.1 $11,790.2 $1,562.5 $1,598.6 $1,395.7
The profitability of the Company’s operating segments is evaluated by management based on operating income.
The Company has an integrated supply chain function that serves all of its reportable segments. As such, asset and
capital expenditure information by reportable segment has not been provided and is not available, since the Company
does not produce or utilize such information internally. In addition, although depreciation and amortization expense is
a component of each reportable segment’s operating results, it is not discretely identifiable.
Geographic Information
Long-lived assets, which includes property, plant and equipment and right of use assets, at public exchange rates by
geographic region were as follows:
Long-Lived Assets, net
(millions) 2022     2021  
United States $2,508.9 $2,416.4
Europe  574.3 580.7
Asia Pacific 210.3 237.1
Greater China  176.6 186.4
Latin America  146.5 137.9
India, Middle East and Africa 64.1 60.2
Canada  60.9 66.5
Total $3,741.6 $3,685.2
                 
Geographic data for long-lived assets is based on physical location of those assets. Refer to Note 18 for net sales by
geographic region.
Table of Contents
10120. QUARTERLY FINANCIAL DATA (UNAUDITED)
    First    Second    Third     Fourth     
(millions, except per share) Quarter Quarter Quarter Quarter Year
2022                             
Net sales $3,266.7 $3,580.6 $3,669.3 $3,671.2 $14,187.8
Operating expenses
Cost of sales (a) 2,073.4 2,211.1 2,291.6 2,254.9 8,831.0
Selling, general and administrative
expenses 914.7 940.1 876.9 922.1 3,653.8
Special (gains) and charges 24.1 3.6 17.8 95.0 140.5
Operating income 254.5 425.8 483.0 399.2 1,562.5
Other (income) expense (b) (18.8) (19.5) 5.7 8.1 (24.5)
Interest expense, net 53.0 56.0 65.1 69.5 243.6
Income before income taxes 220.3 389.3 412.2 321.6 1,343.4
Provision for income taxes 45.6 76.6 60.2 52.1 234.5
Net income including noncontrolling
interest 174.7 312.7 352.0 269.5 1,108.9
Net income attributable to noncontrolling
interest 2.8 4.4 4.9 5.1 17.2
Net income attributable to Ecolab $171.9 $308.3 $347.1 $264.4 $1,091.7
Earnings attributable to Ecolab per
common share
Basic $ 0.60 $ 1.08 $ 1.22 $ 0.93 $ 3.83
Diluted $ 0.60 $ 1.08 $ 1.21 $ 0.93 $ 3.81
Weighted-average common shares
outstanding
Basic 286.2 285.1 284.9 284.6 285.2
Diluted 288.1 286.6 286.3 285.8 286.6
2021
Net sales $2,885.0 $3,162.7 $3,320.8 $3,364.6 $12,733.1
Operating expenses
Cost of sales (a) 1,712.0 1,844.0 2,016.7 2,043.1 7,615.8
Selling, general and administrative
expenses 862.9 853.3 832.0 867.9 3,416.1
Special (gains) and charges 12.8 17.6 6.3 65.9 102.6
Operating income 297.3 447.8 465.8 387.7 1,598.6
Other (income) expense (b) (17.0) 2.5 (13.0) (6.4) (33.9)
Interest expense, net (c) 51.7 45.6 76.4 44.6 218.3
Income before income taxes 262.6 399.7 402.4 349.5 1,414.2
Provision for income taxes 66.1 86.1 73.8 44.2 270.2
Net income including noncontrolling
interest 196.5 313.6 328.6 305.3 1,144.0
Net income attributable to noncontrolling
interest 2.9 2.8 4.1 4.3 14.1
Net income attributable to Ecolab $193.6 $310.8 $324.5 $301.0 $1,129.9
Earnings attributable to Ecolab per
common share
Basic $ 0.68 $ 1.09 $ 1.13 $ 1.05 $ 3.95
Diluted $ 0.67 $ 1.08 $ 1.12 $ 1.04 $ 3.91
Weighted-average common shares
outstanding
Basic 286.0 286.0 286.4 286.7 286.3
Diluted 288.8 288.8 289.2 289.5 289.1
Per share amounts do not necessarily sum due to changes in the calculation of shares outstanding for each discrete
period and rounding. Gross profit is calculated as net sales minus cost of sales.
(a)Cost of sales includes special charges of $52.9, $1.7, $7.1 and $8.2 in Q1, Q2, Q3 and Q4 of 2022,
respectively, and $19.6, $3.7, $52.9 and $17.7 in Q1, Q2, Q3 and Q4 of 2021, respectively.
(b)Other (income) expense includes special charges of $24.8 and $25.8 in Q3 and Q4 of 2022, respectively,
and $19.6, $7.0 and $10.6 in Q2, Q3 and Q4 of 2021, respectively.
(c)Interest expense, net includes special charges of $32.3 and $0.8 in Q3 and Q4 of 2021, respectively.
Table of Contents
102Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial
Disclosure.
None.
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures.
Conclusion Regarding the Effectiveness of Disclosure Controls and Procedures  
As of December 31, 2022, we carried out an evaluation, under the supervision and with the participation of our
management, including our Chairman and Chief Executive Officer and our Chief Financial Officer, of the effectiveness
of the design and operation of our disclosure controls and procedures (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15(e)
under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 as amended). Based upon that evaluation, our Chairman and Chief
Executive Officer and our Chief Financial Officer concluded that, as of December 31, 2022, our disclosure controls and
procedures were effective.
Management’s Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Refer to page 50 of this Annual Report for “Management’s Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting.”
Report of Registered Public Accounting Firm
Refer to page 51 of this Annual Report for the “Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.”
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting.
During the period October 1 - December 31, 2022 there were no changes in our internal control over financial
reporting that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial
reporting.
We are continuing our implementation of our enterprise resource planning (“ERP”) system upgrades, which are
expected to occur in phases over the next several years. These upgrades, which include supply chain and certain
finance functions, are expected to improve the efficiency of certain financial and related transactional processes.
These upgrades of the ERP systems will affect the processes that constitute our internal control over financial
reporting and will require testing for effectiveness.
Item 9B. Other Information.
None.
Item 9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections.
Not applicable.
Table of Contents
103PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance.
Information about our directors is incorporated by reference from the discussion under the heading “Proposal 1:
Election of Directors” located in the Proxy Statement. Information about our Audit Committee, including the members
of the Committee, and our Audit Committee financial experts, is incorporated by reference from the discussion under
the heading “Corporate Governance,” and sub-headings “Board Committees” and “Audit Committee,” located in the
Proxy Statement. Information about our Code of Conduct is incorporated by reference from the discussion under the
heading “Corporate Governance” located in the Proxy Statement. Information regarding our executive officers is
presented under the heading “Information about our Executive Officers” in Part I, Item 1 of this Form 10-K, and is
incorporated herein by reference.
Item 11. Executive Compensation.
Information appearing under the following headings of the Proxy Statement is incorporated herein by reference:
● Director Compensation for 2022
● Compensation Risk Analysis
● Compensation & Human Capital Management Committee Interlocks and Insider Participation
● Compensation & Human Capital Management Committee Report
● Compensation Discussion and Analysis
● Summary Compensation Table for 2022
● Grants of Plan-Based Awards for 2022
● Outstanding Equity Awards at Fiscal Year End for 2022
● Option Exercises and Stock Vested for 2022
● Pension Benefits for 2022
● Non-Qualified Deferred Compensation for 2022
● Potential Payments Upon Termination or Change in Control
● Pay Ratio Disclosure
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters.
Information appearing under the heading entitled “Security Ownership” located in the Proxy Statement is incorporated
herein by reference. Information appearing under the heading entitled “Equity Compensation Plan Information” located
in the Proxy Statement is incorporated herein by reference.
A total of 286,521 shares of Common Stock held by our directors and executive officers, some of whom may be
deemed to be “affiliates” of the Company, have been excluded from the computation of market value of our Common
Stock on the cover page of this Form 10-K. This total represents that portion of the shares reported as beneficially
owned by our directors and executive officers as of June 30, 2022 which are actually issued and outstanding.
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence.
Information appearing under the headings entitled “Director Independence Standards and Determinations” and
“Related Person Transactions” located in the Proxy Statement is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services.
Information appearing under the heading entitled “Audit Fees” located in the Proxy Statement is incorporated herein
by reference.
Table of Contents
104PART IV
Item 15. Exhibit and Financial Statement Schedules.
The following information required under this item is filed as part of this report:
(a)(1)Financial Statements.
Document: Page:
(i)Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting
Firm. (PCAOB ID 238) 51
(ii)Consolidated Statements of Income for the years ended
December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020. 53
(iii)Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for
the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020. 54
(iv)Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31, 2022
and 2021. 55
(v)Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years
ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020. 56
(vi)Consolidated Statements of Equity for the years ended
December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020. 57
(vii)Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. 58
Exhibit No.:      Document:     Method of Filing:
(a)(2) Financial Statement Schedules.
All financial statement schedules are omitted because they are not applicable or the required
information is shown in the consolidated financial statements or the accompanying notes to the
consolidated financial statements. The separate financial statements and summarized financial
information of subsidiaries not consolidated and of fifty percent or less owned persons have been
omitted because they do not satisfy the requirements for inclusion in this Form 10-K.
(a)(3) The documents below are filed as exhibits to this Report. We will, upon request and payment of a fee
not exceeding the rate at which copies are available from the Securities and Exchange Commission,
furnish copies of any of the following exhibits to stockholders.
(2.1) Agreement and Plan of Merger and
Reorganization, dated December 18, 2019, by and
among Ecolab Inc., ChampionX Holding Inc.,
Apergy Corporation and Athena Merger Sub, Inc.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (2.1) of
our Form 8-K, dated December 18, 2019.
(File No. 001-9328)
(2.2) Separation and Distribution Agreement, dated
December 18, 2019, by and among Ecolab Inc.,
ChampionX Holding Inc. and Apergy Corporation.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (2.2) of
our Form 8-K, dated December 18, 2019.
(File No. 001-9328)
(2.3) Stock and Asset Purchase Agreement, dated
October 28, 2021, by and among Ecolab Inc.,
Purolite Corporation, a Delaware corporation
(“Purolite”), Stefan E. Brodie and Don B. Brodie
(the “Founder Sellers” and together with Purolite,
the “Sellers”) and Stefan E. Brodie, solely in his
capacity as the representative of the Sellers.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (2.1) of
our Form 8-K, dated December 1, 2021. (File
No. 001-9328)
(3.1) Restated Certificate of Incorporation of Ecolab Inc.,
dated January 2, 2013.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (3.2) of
our Form 8-K, dated January 2, 2013. (File
No. 001-9328)
(3.2) By-Laws, as amended through December 3, 2015. Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (3.1) of
our Form 8-K, dated December 3, 2015. (File
No. 001-9328)
Table of Contents
105Exhibit No.:      Document:     Method of Filing:
(4.1) Common Stock. See Exhibits (3.1) and (3.2)
(4.2) Amended and Restated Indenture, dated January
9, 2001, between Ecolab Inc. and The Bank of New
York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. (formerly known
as The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A.) (as
successor in interest to J.P. Morgan Trust
Company, N.A. and Bank One, N.A.), as Trustee.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (4)(A) of
our Form 8-K, dated January 23, 2001. (File
No. 001-9328)
(4.3) Second Supplemental Indenture, dated December 8,
2011, between Ecolab Inc., Computershare Trust
Company, N.A. (as successor to Wells Fargo Bank,
National Association), as Trustee and The Bank of
New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. (formerly
known as The Bank of New York Trust Company,
N.A.) (as successor in interest to J.P. Morgan Trust
Company, N.A. and Bank One, N.A.), as original
trustee.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (4.2) of
our Form 8-K, dated December 5, 2011. (File
No. 001-9328)
(4.4) Form of 5.500% Notes due 2041. Included in Exhibit (4.3) above.
(4.5) Indenture, dated January 12, 2015, between
Ecolab Inc. and Computershare Trust Company,
N.A. (as successor to Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association), as Trustee.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of our
Form 8-K, dated January 15, 2015. (File
No. 001-9328)
(4.6) Second Supplemental Indenture, dated July 8,
2015, by and among Ecolab Inc., Computershare
Trust Company, N.A. (as successor to Wells Fargo
Bank, National Association), as Trustee, Elavon
Financial Services Limited, UK Branch, as paying
agent, and Elavon Financial Services Limited, as
transfer agent and registrar.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (4.2) of
our Form 8-K, dated July 8, 2015. (File
No. 001-9328)
(4.7) Form of 2.625% Euro Notes due 2025. Included in Exhibit (4.6) above.
(4.8) Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated October 18,
2016, between Ecolab Inc. and Computershare
Trust Company, N.A. (as successor to Wells Fargo
Bank, National Association), as Trustee.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (4.2) of
our Form 8-K, dated October 13, 2016. (File
No. 001-9328)
(4.9) Forms of 2.700% Notes due 2026 and 3.700%
Notes due 2046.Included in Exhibit (4.8) above.
(4.10) Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated December 8,
2016, by and among Ecolab Inc., Computershare
Trust Company, N.A. (as successor to Wells Fargo
Bank, National Association), as Trustee, Elavon
Financial Services DAC, UK Branch, as paying
agent, and Elavon Financial Services DAC, as
transfer agent and registrar.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (4.2) of
our Form 8-K, dated December 1, 2016. (File
No. 001-9328)
(4.11) Form of 1.000% Euro Notes due 2024. Included in Exhibit (4.10) above.
(4.12) Seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated
November 27, 2017, between Ecolab Inc. and
Computershare Trust Company, N.A. (as
successor to Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association), as Trustee.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (4.2) of
our Form 8-K, dated November 30, 2017.
(File No. 001-9328)
(4.13) Form of 3.250% Notes due 2027. Included in Exhibit (4.12) above.
(4.14) Form of 3.950% Notes due 2047. Included in Exhibit (4.12) above.
(4.15) Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated March 24,
2020, between Ecolab Inc. and Computershare
Trust Company, N.A. (as successor to Wells Fargo
Bank, National Association), as Trustee.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (4.2) of
our Form 8-K filed on March 24, 2020. (File
No. 001-9328)
(4.16) Form of 4.800% Notes due 2030. Included in Exhibit (4.15) above.
Table of Contents
106Exhibit No.:      Document:     Method of Filing:
(4.17) Ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated August 13,
2020, between Ecolab Inc. and Computershare
Trust Company, N.A. (as successor to Wells Fargo
Bank, National Association), as Trustee.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (4.2) of
our Form 8-K filed by Ecolab Inc. on August
13, 2020. (File No. 001-9328)
(4.18) Form of 1.300% Notes due 2031. Included in Exhibit (4.17) above.
(4.19) Form of 2.125% Notes due 2050. Included in Exhibit (4.17) above.
(4.20) Tenth Supplemental Indenture, dated August 18,
2021, between Ecolab Inc. and Computershare
Trust Company, N.A. (as successor to Wells Fargo
Bank, National Association), as Trustee.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (4.2) of
our Form 8-K filed on August 19, 2021. (File
No. 001-9328)
(4.21) Form of 2.750% Notes due 2055. Included in Exhibit (4.20) above.
(4.22) Eleventh Supplemental Indenture, dated December
15, 2021, between Ecolab Inc. and Computershare
Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (4.2) of
our Form 8-K filed by Ecolab Inc. on
December 15, 2021. (File No. 001-9328)
(4.23) Form of 0.900% Notes due 2023. Included in Exhibit (4.22) above.
(4.24) Form of 1.650% Notes due 2027. Included in Exhibit (4.22) above.
(4.25) Form of 2.125% Notes due 2032. Included in Exhibit (4.22) above.
(4.26) Form of 2.700% Notes due 2051. Included in Exhibit (4.22) above.
(4.27) Twelfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 17, 2022, between Ecolab Inc. and
Computershare Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (4.2) of
our Form 8-K filed by Ecolab Inc. on
November 17, 2022. (File No. 001 9328)
(4.28) Form of 5.250% Notes due 2028. Included in Exhibit (4.27) above.
(4.29) Description of Securities. Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (4.20) of
our Form 10-K Annual Report for the year
ended December 31, 2019. (File No. 001-
9328)
Copies of other constituent instruments defining the rights of holders of our long-term debt are not
filed herewith, pursuant to Section (b)(4)(iii) of Item 601 of Regulation S-K, because the aggregate
amount of securities authorized under each of such instruments is less than 10% of our total assets
on a consolidated basis. We will, upon request by the Securities and Exchange Commission, furnish
to the Commission a copy of each such instrument.
(10.1) Third Amended and Restated $2.0 billion 5-Year
Revolving Credit Facility, dated as of April 16,
2021, among Ecolab Inc., the lenders party thereto,
the issuing lenders party thereto, Bank of America,
N.A., as administrative agent and swing line bank,
and Citibank, N.A., JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
and MUFG Bank, Ltd., as co-syndication agents.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.1) of
our Form 8-K, dated April 20, 2021. (File
No. 001-9328)
Table of Contents
Exhibit No.:      Document:     Method of Filing:
(10.2) Documents comprising global Commercial Paper
Programs.
(i) U.S. $2,000,000,000 Euro-Commercial Paper Programme.
(a)  Amended and Restated Dealer
Agreement, dated 9 June 2017,
between Ecolab Inc., Ecolab Lux 1 S.À
R.L., Ecolab Lux 2 S.À R.L., Ecolab
NL 10 B.V. and Ecolab NL 11 B.V. (as
Issuers), Ecolab Inc. (as Guarantor in
respect of the notes issued by Ecolab
Lux 1 S.À R.L., Ecolab Lux 2 S.À R.L.
and Ecolab NL 10 B.V. and Ecolab NL
11 B.V.), Credit Suisse Securities
(Europe) Limited (as Arranger), and
Citibank Europe plc, UK Branch,
Credit Suisse Securities (Europe)
Limited, Citigroup Global Markets
Europe AG, Credit Suisse Securities
Sociedad de Valores S.A. and Credit
Suisse International (as Dealers).Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.1)(a)
of our Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
June 30, 2017. (File No. 001-9328)
(b)Amended and Restated Note Agency
Agreement, dated 9 June 2017,
between Ecolab Inc., Ecolab Lux 1 S.À
R.L., Ecolab Lux 2 S.À R.L., Ecolab
NL 10 B.V. Ecolab NL 11 B.V. (as
Issuers), Ecolab Inc. (as Guarantor in
respect of the notes issued by Ecolab
Lux 1 S.À R.L., Ecolab Lux 2 S.À R.L.,
Ecolab NL 10 B.V. and Ecolab NL 11
B.V.), and Citibank, N.A., London
Branch (as Issue and Paying Agent).Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.1)(b)
of our Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
June 30, 2017. (File No. 001-9328)
(c)Deed of Covenant made on 9 June
2017 by Ecolab Inc., Ecolab Lux 1 S.À
R.L., Ecolab Lux 2 S.À R.L., Ecolab
NL 10 B.V. and Ecolab NL 11 B.V. (as
Issuers).Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.1)(c)
of our Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
June 30, 2017. (File No. 001-9328)
(d)Deed of Guarantee made on 9 June
2017 by Ecolab Inc. (in respect of
notes issued by Ecolab Lux 1 S.À
R.L., Ecolab Lux 2 S.À R.L., Ecolab
NL 10 B.V. and Ecolab NL 11 B.V.).Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.1)(d)
of our Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
June 30, 2017. (File No. 001-9328)
(ii) U.S. $2,000,000,000 U.S. Commercial Paper Program.
(a)Form of Commercial Paper Dealer
Agreement for 4(a)(2) Program, dated
September 22, 2014. The dealers for
the program are Barclays Capital Inc.,
Citigroup Global Markets Inc., Credit
Suisse Securities (USA) LLC, BofA
Securities, Inc., Mizuho Securities
USA LLC, and Wells Fargo Securities,
LLC.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.1)(a)
of our Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2014. (File No. 001-9328)
(b)Issuing and Paying Agent Agreement,
dated September 18, 2017, between
Ecolab Inc. and U.S. Bank National
Association, as Issuing and Paying
Agent (as successor, effective as of
June 7, 2021, to MUFG Union Bank,
N.A.).Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.1)(a)
of our Form 10 Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2017. (File No. 001-9328)
(c)Corporate Commercial Paper – Master
Note, dated June 7, 2021, together
with annex thereto.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.3)(ii)
of our Form 10 Q for the quarter ended June
30, 2021. (File No. 001-9328)
(10.3) †(i) Ecolab Inc. 2001 Non-Employee Director
Stock Option and Deferred Compensation
Plan, as amended and restated, effective
as of August 1, 2013.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.6) of
our Form 10-K Annual Report for the year
ended December 31, 2013. (File No. 001-
9328)
107
Table of Contents
108Exhibit No.:      Document:     Method of Filing:
†(ii) Declaration of Amendment, dated May 5,
2016, to Ecolab Inc. 2001 Non-Employee
Director Stock Option and Deferred
Compensation Plan, as amended and
restated, effective as of August 1, 2013.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.1) of
our Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30,
2016. (File No. 001-9328)
†(iii) Master Agreement Relating to Periodic
Options, as amended, effective as of
May 1, 2004.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10)D(ii)
of our Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
June 30, 2004. (File No. 001-9328)
†(iv) Amendment No. 1 to Master Agreement
Relating to Periodic Options, as amended,
effective as of May 2, 2008.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10)B of
our Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2008. (File No. 001-9328)
(10.4) †Form of Director Indemnification Agreement.
Substantially identical agreements are in effect as
to each of our directors.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10)I of
our Form 10-K Annual Report for the year
ended December 31, 2003. (File No. 001-
9328)
(10.5) †(i) Ecolab Executive Death Benefits Plan, as
amended and restated, effective as of
March 1, 1994.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10)H(i)
of our Form 10-K Annual Report for the year
ended December 31, 2006. See also
Exhibit (10.12) hereof. (File No. 001-9328)
†(ii) Amendment No. 1 to Ecolab Executive
Death Benefits Plan, effective as of July 1,
1997.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10)H(ii)
of our Form 10-K Annual Report for the year
ended December 31, 1998. (File No. 001-
9328)
†(iii) Second Declaration of Amendment to
Ecolab Executive Death Benefits Plan,
effective as of March 1, 1998.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10)H(iii)
of our Form 10-K Annual Report for the year
ended December 31, 1998. (File No. 001-
9328)
†(iv) Amendment No. 3 to the Ecolab Executive
Death Benefits Plan, effective as of August
12, 2005.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10)B of
our Form 8-K, dated December 13, 2005.
(File No. 001-9328)
†(v) Amendment No. 4 to the Ecolab Executive
Death Benefits Plan, effective as of
January 1, 2005.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10)H(v)
of our Form 10-K Annual Report for the year
ended December 31, 2009. (File No. 001-
9328)
†(vi) Amendment No. 5 to the Ecolab Executive
Death Benefits Plan, effective as of May 6,
2015.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of
our Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30,
2015. (File No. 001-9328)
†(vii) Amendment No. 6 to the Ecolab Executive
Death Benefits Plan, effective as of
June 23, 2017.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1(vii)
of Ecolab’s Form 8-K dated June 23, 2017.
(File No. 001-9328)
(10.6) †(i) Ecolab Executive Long-Term Disability
Plan, as amended and restated, effective
as of January 1, 1994.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10)I of
our Form 10-K Annual Report for the year
ended December 31, 2004. See also
Exhibit (10.12) hereof. (File No. 001-9328).
†(ii) Amendment No. 1 to the Ecolab Executive
Long-Term Disability Plan, effective as of
August 21, 2015.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of
our Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2015. (File No. 001-9328)
(10.7) †(i) Ecolab Supplemental Executive
Retirement Plan, as amended and
restated, effective as of January 1, 2022.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.7)(i)
of our Form 10-K Annual Report for the year
ended December 31, 2021. (File No. 001
9328).
(10.8) †(i) Ecolab Mirror Savings Plan, as amended
and restated, effective as of January 1,
2022.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.8)(i)
of our Form 10-K Annual Report for the year
ended December 31, 2021. (File No. 001
9328).
Table of Contents
109Exhibit No.:      Document:     Method of Filing:
(10.9) †(i) Ecolab Mirror Pension Plan, as amended
and restated, effective as of January 1,
2022.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.9)(i)
of our Form 10-K Annual Report for the year
ended December 31, 2021. (File No. 001
9328).
(10.10) †(i) Ecolab Inc. Administrative Document for
Non-Qualified Plans, as amended and
restated, effective as of January 1, 2022.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.10)(i)
of our Form 10-K Annual Report for the year
ended December 31, 2021. (File No. 001
9328).
(10.11) †(i) Ecolab Inc. Change in Control Severance
Compensation Policy, as amended and
restated, effective as of February 26, 2010.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10) of
our Form 8-K, dated February 26, 2010. (File
No. 001-9328)
†(ii) Amendment No. 1 to Ecolab Inc. Change-
in-Control Severance Policy, as amended
and restated, effective as of February 26,
2010.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.18)
(ii) of our Form 10-K Annual Report for the
year ended December 31, 2011. (File
No. 001-9328)
(10.12) †Description of Ecolab Management Incentive Plan. Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.16)
of our Form 10-K Annual Report for the year
ended December 31, 2015. (File No. 001-
9328)
(10.13) †(i) Ecolab Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive Plan, as
amended and restated, effective as of
May 2, 2013.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.1) of
our Form 8-K, dated May 2, 2013. (File
No. 001-9328)
†(ii) Declaration of Amendment, effective as of
February 22, 2019, to Ecolab Inc. 2010
Stock Incentive Plan, as amended and
restated, effective as of May 2, 2013.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.3) of
our Form 10-Q, dated May 2, 2019. (File
No. 001-9328)
†(iii) Sample form of Non-Statutory Stock
Option Agreement under the Ecolab Inc.
2010 Stock Incentive Plan, adopted May 6,
2010.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10)B of
our Form 8-K, dated May 6, 2010. (File
No. 001-9328)
†(iv) Sample form of Restricted Stock Award
Agreement under the Ecolab Inc. 2010
Stock Incentive Plan, adopted May 6,
2010.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10)C of
our Form 8-K, dated May 6, 2010. (File
No. 001-9328)
†(v) Sample form of Restricted Stock Unit
Award Agreement under the Ecolab Inc.
2010 Stock Incentive Plan, adopted August
4, 2010.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10)A of
our Form 10-Q, for the quarter ended
September 30, 2010. (File No. 001-9328)
†(vi)  Sample form of Performance-Based
Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement
under the Ecolab Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive
Plan, adopted December 3, 2019.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.15)
(ix) of our Form 10-K Annual Report for the
year ended December 31, 2019. (File
No. 001-9328)
†(vii)  Sample form of Performance-Based
Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement
under the Ecolab Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive
Plan, adopted December 3, 2020.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.13)
(ix) of our Form 10-K Annual Report for the
year ended December 31, 2020. (File
No. 001-9328)
†(viii)  Sample form of Performance-Based
Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement
under the Ecolab Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive
Plan, adopted December 1, 2021.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.13)
(ix) of our Form 10-K Annual Report for the
year ended December 31, 2021. (File No.
001 9328).
(10.14) †Policy on Reimbursement of Incentive Payments,
as amended February 22, 2019.Incorporated by reference to Exhibit (10.16)
of our Form 10-K Annual Report for the year
ended December 31, 2018. (File No. 001-
9328)
(10.15) †Form of Nalco Company Death Benefit Agreement
and Addendum to Death Benefit Agreement.Incorporated by reference from Exhibit (99.2)
on Form 8-K of Nalco Holding Company filed
on May 11, 2005. (File No. 001-32342)
Table of Contents
110Exhibit No.:      Document:     Method of Filing:
(10.16) †Employment Transition Severance Agreement,
dated November 16, 2022 between Ecolab Inc. and
Timothy Mulhere.Filed herewith electronically.
(21.1) List of Subsidiaries. Filed herewith electronically.
(23.1) Consent of Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm.Filed herewith electronically.
(24.1) Powers of Attorney. Filed herewith electronically.
(31.1) Rule 13a-14(a) CEO Certification. Filed herewith electronically.
(31.2) Rule 13a-14(a) CFO Certification. Filed herewith electronically.
(32.1) Section 1350 CEO and CFO Certifications. Filed herewith electronically.
(101.INS) Inline XBRL Instance Document – the instance
document does not appear in the Interactive Data
File because its XBRL tags are embedded within
the Inline XBRL document.Filed herewith electronically.
(101.SCH) Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema. Filed herewith electronically.
(101.CAL) Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation
Linkbase.Filed herewith electronically.
(101.DEF) Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition
Linkbase.Filed herewith electronically.
(101.LAB) Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase. Filed herewith electronically.
(101.PRE) Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation
Linkbase.Filed herewith electronically.
(104) Cover Page Interactive Data File. Formatted as Inline XBRL and contained in
Exhibit 101.
† This exhibit is an executive compensation plan or arrangement.
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary.
None.
Table of Contents
111SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, Ecolab Inc. has duly
caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized, on the 24th day of
February, 2023.
ECOLAB INC.
(Registrant)
By:/s/ Christophe Beck
Christophe Beck
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the
following persons on behalf of Ecolab Inc. and in the capacities indicated, on the 24th day of February, 2023.
/s/ Christophe Beck Chairman and Chief Executive Officer
Christophe Beck (Principal Executive Officer and Director)
/s/ Scott D. Kirkland Chief Financial Officer
Scott D. Kirkland (Principal Financial Officer)
/s/ Jennifer J. Bradway Senior Vice President and Corporate Controller
Jennifer J. Bradway (duly authorized officer and Principal Accounting Officer)
/s/ Lanesha T. Minnix Directors
Lanesha T. Minnix
as attorney-in-fact for:
Shari L. Ballard, Barbara J. Beck, Jeffrey M. Ettinger, Eric
M. Green, Arthur J. Higgins, Michael Larson, David W.
MacLennan, Tracy B. McKibben, Lionel L. Nowell, III,
Victoria J. Reich, Suzanne M. Vautrinot and John J. Zillmer
